Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds:(a) The title "physician assistant" does not adequately reflect the current education, training, or medical role associated with these health care professionals; and(b) The American academy of physician associates supports changing the profession's name to "physician associate" to better represent the responsibilities and collaborative role of these health care professionals in medical care and to clarify their essential contributions within the health care team.(2) The legislature, therefore, intends to:(a) Modernize terminology while ensuring continuity in patient care and administrative processes, in alignment with national standards and professional identity; and(b) Expedite the recognition of the term "physician associate" in professional licensing programs, clinical settings, billing arrangements, and contracting provisions.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) The authority shall revise all rules and official materials to change the term "physician assistant" to "physician associate" consistent with the provisions of this act.(b) Health plans shall revise all contracts, insurance documents, forms, and other official materials and communications to change the term "physician assistant" to "physician associate" consistent with the provisions of this act.(2) The terms "physician assistant" and "physician associate" may be used interchangeably by the authority, health plans, contractors, health care providers, health care facilities, and employers for all statutory, regulatory, credentialing, billing, clinical, and administrative purposes until the transition to the term "physician associate" has been completed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) The commissioner shall revise all rules and official materials to change the term "physician assistant" to "physician associate" consistent with the provisions of this act.(b) Carriers shall revise all contracts, insurance documents, forms, and other official materials and communications to change the term "physician assistant" to "physician associate" consistent with the provisions of this act.(2) The terms "physician assistant" and "physician associate" may be used interchangeably by the commissioner, carriers, contractors, health care providers, health care facilities, and employers for all statutory, regulatory, credentialing, billing, clinical, and administrative purposes until the transition to the term "physician associate" has been completed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) The authority shall revise all rules and official materials to change the term "physician assistant" to "physician associate" consistent with the provisions of this act.(b) Managed care organizations shall revise all contracts, insurance documents, forms, and other official materials and communications to change the term "physician assistant" to "physician associate" consistent with the provisions of this act.(2) The terms "physician assistant" and "physician associate" may be used interchangeably by the authority, managed care organizations, contractors, health care providers, health care facilities, and employers for all statutory, regulatory, credentialing, billing, clinical, and administrative purposes until the transition to the term "physician associate" has been completed.Sec. 5. RCW 18.71A.010 and 2024 c 62 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Collaboration" means how physician ((assistants))associates shall interact with, consult with, or refer to a physician or other appropriate member or members of the health care team as indicated by the patient's condition, the education, experience, and competencies of the physician ((assistant))associate, and the standard of care. The degree of collaboration must be determined by the practice, which may include decisions made by the physician ((assistant's))associate's employer, group, hospital service, and credentialing and privileging systems of licensed facilities.(2) "Collaboration agreement" means a written agreement that describes the manner in which the physician ((assistant))associate is supervised by or collaborates with at least one physician and that is signed by the physician ((assistant))associate and one or more physicians or the physician ((assistant's))associate's employer.(3) "Commission" means the Washington medical commission.(4) "Department" means the department of health.(5) "Employer" means the scope appropriate clinician, such as a medical director, who is authorized to enter into the collaboration agreement with a physician ((assistant))associate on behalf of the facility, group, clinic, or other organization that employs the physician ((assistant))associate.(6) "Participating physician" means a physician that supervises or collaborates with a physician ((assistant))associate pursuant to a collaboration agreement.(7) "Physician" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.(8) "Physician ((assistant))associate" means a person who is licensed by the commission to practice medicine according to a collaboration agreement with one or more participating physicians and who is academically and clinically prepared to provide health care services and perform diagnostic, therapeutic, preventative, and health maintenance services.(9) "Practice medicine" has the meaning defined in RCW 18.71.011 and also includes the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery as defined in RCW 18.57.001.(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.Sec. 6. RCW 18.71A.020 and 2024 c 62 s 3 and 2024 c 15 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The commission shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational and training requirements for licensure as a physician ((assistant))associate or for those enrolled in any physician ((assistant))associate training program. The requirements shall include completion of an accredited physician ((assistant))associate training program approved by the commission and within one year successfully take and pass an examination approved by the commission, if the examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician ((assistant))associate training program. An interim permit may be granted by the department of health for one year provided the applicant meets all other requirements. Physician ((assistants))associates licensed by the board of medical examiners, or the commission as of July 1, 1999, shall continue to be licensed.(2)(a) The commission shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:(i) Physician ((assistant))associate students may practice medicine during training; and(ii) Physician ((assistants))associates may practice after successful completion of a physician ((assistant))associate training course.(b) Such rules shall provide:(i) That the practice of a physician ((assistant))associate shall be limited to the performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and(ii) That each physician ((assistant))associate shall practice medicine only under the terms of one or more collaboration agreements, each signed by the physician ((assistant))associate and one or more physicians licensed in this state or the physician ((assistant's))associate's employer. A collaboration agreement may be signed electronically using a method for electronic signatures approved by the commission.(3) Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the commission on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the commission, detailing the education, training, and experience of the physician ((assistant))associate and such other information as the commission may require. The application shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A surcharge of $70 per year shall be charged on each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the department and deposited into the impaired physician account for physician ((assistant))associate participation in the physician health program. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:(a) That the applicant has completed an accredited physician ((assistant))associate program approved by the commission and is eligible to take the examination approved by the commission;(b) That the applicant is of good moral character; and(c) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing medicine as a physician ((assistant))associate with reasonable skill and safety. The commission may require an applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical or mental capability, or both, to safely practice as a physician ((assistant))associate.(4)(a) The commission may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the application for license as provided in the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW.(b) The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission shall request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, or other relevant data determined by the commission.(5) All funds in the impaired physician account shall be paid to the contract entity within ((sixty))60 days of deposit.Sec. 7. RCW 18.71A.030 and 2024 c 62 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A physician ((assistant))associate may practice medicine in this state to the extent permitted by the collaboration agreement. A physician ((assistant))associate shall be subject to discipline under chapter 18.130 RCW.(2)(a) A physician ((assistant))associate who has completed fewer than 4,000 hours of postgraduate clinical practice must work under the supervision of a participating physician, as described in the collaboration agreement and determined at the practice site. A physician ((assistant))associate with 4,000 or more hours of postgraduate clinical practice may work in collaboration with a participating physician, if the physician ((assistant))associate has completed 2,000 or more supervised hours in the physician ((assistant's))associate's chosen specialty.(b) If a physician ((assistant))associate chooses to change specialties after the completion of 4,000 hours of postgraduate clinical practice, the first 2,000 hours of postgraduate clinical practice in the new specialty must be completed under the supervision of a participating physician, as described in the collaboration agreement and determined at the practice site.(c) Supervision shall not be construed to necessarily require the personal presence of the participating physician or physicians at the place where services are rendered.(3)(a) Physician ((assistants))associates may provide services that they are competent to perform based on their education, training, and experience and that are consistent with their collaboration agreement. The participating physician or physicians, or the physician ((assistant's))associate's employer, and the physician ((assistant))associate shall determine which procedures may be performed and the degree of autonomy under which the procedure is performed.(b) Physician ((assistants))associates may practice in any area of medicine or surgery as long as the practice is not beyond the scope of expertise and clinical practice of the participating physician or physicians or the group of physicians within the department or specialty areas in which the physician ((assistant))associate practices.(c) A physician ((assistant))associate who has at least 10 years or 20,000 hours of postgraduate clinical experience in a specialty may continue to provide those specialty services if the physician ((assistant))associate is employed in a practice setting where those services are outside the specialty of the physician ((assistant's))associate's participating physician or physicians, as outlined in the collaboration agreement, if the practice is located in a rural area as identified by the department under RCW 70.180.011 or in an underserved area as designated by the health resources and services administration as a medically underserved area or having a medically underserved population. The physician ((assistant))associate must complete continuing education related to that specialty while performing services outside the specialty of the physician ((assistant's))associate's participating physician or physicians.(4) A physician ((assistant))associate working with an anesthesiologist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010 to deliver general anesthesia or intrathecal anesthesia pursuant to a collaboration agreement shall show evidence of adequate education and training in the delivery of the type of anesthesia being delivered on the physician ((assistant's))associate's collaboration agreement as stipulated by the commission.Sec. 8. RCW 18.71A.045 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 322 are each amended to read as follows:Foreign medical school graduates shall not be eligible for licensing as physician ((assistants))associates after July 1, 1989.Sec. 9. RCW 18.71A.050 and 2024 c 62 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:No physician or employer who enters into a collaboration agreement with a licensed physician ((assistant))associate in accordance with and within the terms of any permission granted by the commission is considered as aiding and abetting an unlicensed person to practice medicine. The physician ((assistant))associate shall retain responsibility for any act which constitutes the practice of medicine as defined in RCW 18.71.011 or the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery as defined in RCW 18.57.001 when performed by the physician ((assistant))associate.Sec. 10. RCW 18.71A.060 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 324 are each amended to read as follows:No health care services may be performed under this chapter in any of the following areas:(1) The measurement of the powers or range of human vision, or the determination of the accommodation and refractive state of the human eye or the scope of its functions in general, or the fitting or adaptation of lenses or frames for the aid thereof.(2) The prescribing or directing the use of, or using, any optical device in connection with ocular exercises, visual training, vision training, or orthoptics.(3) The prescribing of contact lenses for, or the fitting or adaptation of contact lenses to, the human eye.(4) Nothing in this section shall preclude the performance of routine visual screening.(5) The practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as defined in chapters 18.32 and 18.29 RCW respectively. The exemptions set forth in RCW 18.32.030 (1) and (8), shall not apply to a physician ((assistant))associate.(6) The practice of chiropractic as defined in chapter 18.25 RCW including the adjustment or manipulation of the articulations of the spine.(7) The practice of podiatric medicine and surgery as defined in chapter 18.22 RCW.Sec. 11. RCW 18.71A.085 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 325 are each amended to read as follows:Any physician ((assistant))associate acupuncturist currently licensed by the commission may continue to perform acupuncture under the physician ((assistant))associate license as long as he or she maintains licensure as a physician ((assistant))associate.Sec. 12. RCW 18.71A.090 and 2024 c 62 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A physician ((assistant))associate may sign and attest to any certificates, cards, forms, or other required documentation that the physician ((assistant's))associate's participating physician or physician group may sign, provided that it is within the physician ((assistant's))associate's scope of practice and is consistent with the terms of the physician ((assistant's))associate's collaboration agreement as required by this chapter.(2) Notwithstanding any federal law, rule, or medical staff bylaw provision to the contrary, a physician is not required to countersign orders written in a patient's clinical record or an official form by a physician ((assistant))associate with whom the physician has a collaboration agreement.Sec. 13. RCW 18.71A.100 and 2010 c 209 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) By June 30, 2011, the commission shall adopt new rules on chronic, noncancer pain management that contain the following elements:(a)(i) Dosing criteria, including:(A) A dosage amount that must not be exceeded unless a physician ((assistant))associate first consults with a practitioner specializing in pain management; and(B) Exigent or special circumstances under which the dosage amount may be exceeded without consultation with a practitioner specializing in pain management.(ii) The rules regarding consultation with a practitioner specializing in pain management must, to the extent practicable, take into account:(A) Circumstances under which repeated consultations would not be necessary or appropriate for a patient undergoing a stable, ongoing course of treatment for pain management;(B) Minimum training and experience that is sufficient to exempt a physician ((assistant))associate from the specialty consultation requirement;(C) Methods for enhancing the availability of consultations;(D) Allowing the efficient use of resources; and(E) Minimizing the burden on practitioners and patients;(b) Guidance on when to seek specialty consultation and ways in which electronic specialty consultations may be sought;(c) Guidance on tracking clinical progress by using assessment tools focusing on pain interference, physical function, and overall risk for poor outcome; and(d) Guidance on tracking the use of opioids, particularly in the emergency department.(2) The commission shall consult with the agency medical directors' group, the department of health, the University of Washington, and the largest professional association of physician ((assistants))associates in the state.(3) The rules adopted under this section do not apply:(a) To the provision of palliative, hospice, or other end-of-life care; or(b) To the management of acute pain caused by an injury or a surgical procedure.Sec. 14. RCW 18.71A.110 and 2016 c 70 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:A physician ((assistant))associate who provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under RCW 43.70.738 at the time the physician ((assistant))associate provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.Sec. 15. RCW 18.71A.120 and 2024 c 62 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Prior to commencing practice, a physician ((assistant))associate licensed in Washington state must enter into a collaboration agreement that identifies at least one participating physician and that is signed by one or more participating physicians or the physician ((assistant's))associate's employer.(b) A collaboration agreement must be signed by a physician if the physician ((assistant's))associate's employer is not a physician.(c) If a participating physician is not a signatory to the collaboration agreement, the participating physician must be provided notice of the agreement and an opportunity to decline participation. Entering into a collaboration agreement is voluntary for the physician ((assistant))associate and the participating physician or employer. A physician may not be compelled to participate in a collaboration agreement as a condition of employment.(d) Prior to entering into the collaboration agreement, the participating physician or physicians, employer, or their designee must verify the physician ((assistant's))associate's credentials.(e) The protections of RCW 43.70.075 apply to any participating physician or employer who reports to the commission acts of retaliation or reprisal for declining to sign a collaboration agreement.(f) The collaboration agreement must be available either electronically or on paper at the physician ((assistant's))associate's primary location of practice and made available to the commission upon request.(g) The commission shall develop a model collaboration agreement.(h) The commission shall establish administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.(2) A collaboration agreement must include all of the following:(a) The duties and responsibilities of the physician ((assistant))associate and the participating physician or physicians. The collaboration agreement must describe the supervision or collaboration requirements for specified procedures or areas of practice, depending on the number of postgraduate clinical practice hours completed. The collaboration agreement may only include acts, tasks, or functions that the physician ((assistant))associate is qualified to perform by education, training, or experience. The acts, tasks, or functions included in the collaboration agreement must also be within the scope of expertise and clinical practice of either the participating physician or physicians or the group of physicians within the department or specialty areas in which the physician ((assistant))associate is practicing, unless otherwise authorized by law, rule, or the commission;(b) A process between the physician ((assistant))associate and participating physician or physicians for communication, availability, and decision making when providing medical treatment to a patient or in the event of an acute health care crisis not previously covered by the collaboration agreement, such as a flu pandemic or other unforeseen emergency. Communications may occur in person, electronically, by telephone, or by an alternate method;(c) If there is only one participating physician identified in the collaboration agreement, a protocol for designating another participating physician for consultation in situations in which the physician is not available;(d) The signature of the physician ((assistant))associate and the signature or signatures of the participating physician or physicians, or employer;(e) If the physician ((assistant))associate is working under the supervision of a participating physician, in accordance with RCW 18.71A.030, a plan for how the physician ((assistant))associate will be supervised;(f) An attestation by the physician ((assistant))associate of the number of postgraduate clinical practice hours completed, including the number of hours completed in a chosen specialty, at the time the physician ((assistant))associate signs the collaboration agreement; and(g) A termination provision. A physician ((assistant))associate or physician may terminate the collaboration agreement as it applies to a single participating physician without terminating the agreement with respect to the remaining participating physicians.Â If the termination results in no participating physician being designated on the agreement, a new participating physician must be designated for the agreement to be valid.(i) Except as provided in (g)(ii) of this subsection, the physician ((assistant))associate or participating physician must provide written notice at least ((thirty))30 days prior to the termination.(ii) The physician ((assistant))associate or participating physician may terminate the collaboration agreement immediately due to good faith concerns regarding unprofessional conduct or failure to practice medicine while exercising reasonable skill and safety.(3) The physician ((assistant))associate is responsible for tracking the number of postgraduate clinical hours completed, including the number of hours completed in a chosen specialty.(4) A collaboration agreement may be amended for any reason.(5) Whenever a physician ((assistant))associate is practicing in a manner inconsistent with the collaboration agreement, the commission may take disciplinary action under chapter 18.130 RCW.(6) Whenever a physician is subject to disciplinary action under chapter 18.130 RCW related to the practice of a physician ((assistant))associate, the case must be referred to the appropriate disciplining authority.(7) A physician ((assistant))associate, physician, or employer may participate in more than one collaboration agreement if the physician or employer is reasonably able to fulfill the duties and responsibilities in each agreement.(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting physician ((assistants))associates from owning their own practice or clinic.Sec. 16. RCW 18.71A.800 and 2017 c 297 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) By January 1, 2019, the commission must adopt rules establishing requirements for prescribing opioid drugs. The rules may contain exemptions based on education, training, amount of opioids prescribed, patient panel, and practice environment.(2) In developing the rules, the commission must consider the agency medical directors' group and centers for disease control guidelines, and may consult with the department of health, the University of Washington, and the largest professional association of physician ((assistants))associates in the state.Sec. 17. RCW 18.71A.810 and 2019 c 314 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:By January 1, 2020, the commission must adopt or amend its rules to require physician ((assistants))associates who prescribe opioids to inform patients of their right to refuse an opioid prescription or order for any reason. If a patient indicates a desire to not receive an opioid, the physician ((assistant))associate must document the patient's request and avoid prescribing or ordering opioids, unless the request is revoked by the patient.Sec. 18. RCW 18.71A.820 and 2024 c 62 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:A physician ((assistant))associate practicing under a practice agreement that was entered into before July 1, 2025, may continue to practice under the practice agreement until the physician ((assistant))associate enters into a collaboration agreement, as defined in RCW 18.71A.010. A physician ((assistant))associate described in this section shall enter into a collaboration agreement not later than the date on which the physician ((assistant's))associate's license is due for renewal or July 1, 2025, whichever is later.Sec. 19. RCW 4.24.240 and 2019 c 308 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or related services including, but not limited to, an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, a physician, osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician, physician ((assistant, osteopathic physician's assistant))associate, nurse practitioner, including, in the event such person is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative;(b) An employee or agent of a person described in ((subparagraph)) (a) of this subsection, acting in the course and scope of his or her employment, including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or(c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or institution employing one or more persons described in ((subparagraph)) (a) of this subsection, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer, director, trustee, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of his or her employment, including in the event such officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative;shall be immune from civil action for damages arising out of the good faith performance of their duties on such committees, where such actions are being brought by or on behalf of the person who is being evaluated.(2) No member, employee, staff person, or investigator of a professional review committee shall be liable in a civil action as a result of acts or omissions made in good faith on behalf of the committee; nor shall any person be so liable for filing charges with or supplying information or testimony in good faith to any professional review committee; nor shall a member, employee, staff person, or investigator of a professional society, of a professional examining or licensing board, of a professional disciplinary board, of a governing board of any institution, or of any employer of professionals be so liable for good faith acts or omissions made in full or partial reliance on recommendations or decisions of a professional review committee or examining board.Sec. 20. RCW 7.68.030 and 2025 c 58 s 5058 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It shall be the duty of the director to establish and administer a program of benefits to innocent victims of criminal acts within the terms and limitations of this chapter. The director may apply for and, subject to appropriation, expend federal funds under ((Public Law [P.L.]))P.L. 98-473 and any other federal program providing financial assistance to state crime victim compensation programs. The federal funds shall be deposited in the state general fund and may be expended only for purposes authorized by applicable federal law.(2) The director shall:(a) Establish and adopt rules governing the administration of this chapter in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;(b) Regulate the proof of accident and extent thereof, the proof of death, and the proof of relationship and the extent of dependency;(c) Supervise the medical, surgical, and hospital treatment to the intent that it may be in all cases efficient and up to the recognized standard of modern surgery;(d) Issue proper receipts for moneys received and certificates for benefits accrued or accruing;(e) Designate a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW;(f) Supervise the providing of prompt and efficient care and treatment, including care provided by physician ((assistants))associates governed by the provisions of chapter 18.71A RCW, including chiropractic care, and including care provided by licensed advanced practice registered nurses, to victims at the least cost consistent with promptness and efficiency, without discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity as the various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time, establish and adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms, electronic communications, rules, regulations, and practices for the furnishing of such care and treatment. The medical coverage decisions of the department do not constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor are such decisions subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW except that criteria for establishing medical coverage decisions shall be adopted by rule. The department may recommend to a victim particular health care services and providers where specialized treatment is indicated or where cost-effective payment levels or rates are obtained by the department, and the department may enter into contracts for goods and services including, but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as statewide access to quality service is maintained for injured victims;(g) In consultation with interested persons, establish and, in his or her discretion, periodically change as may be necessary, and make available a fee schedule of the maximum charges to be made by any physician, surgeon, chiropractor, hospital, druggist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician ((assistants))associates as defined in chapter 18.71A RCW, acting under the supervision of or in coordination with a participating physician, as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, or other agency or person rendering services to victims. The department shall coordinate with other state purchasers of health care services to establish as much consistency and uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible, taking into account the unique requirements and differences between programs. No service covered under this title, including services provided to victims, whether aliens or other victims, who are not residing in the United States at the time of receiving the services, shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates exceeding those specified in such fee schedule, and no contract providing for greater fees shall be valid as to the excess. The establishment of such a schedule, exclusive of conversion factors, does not constitute "agency action" as used in RCW 34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16). Payments for providers' services under the fee schedule established pursuant to this subsection (2) may not be less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program under Title 51 RCW, provided:(i) If the department, using caseload estimates, projects a deficit in funding for the program by July 15th for the following fiscal year, the director shall notify the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature and request funding sufficient to continue payments to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program. If sufficient funding is not provided to continue payments to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program, the director shall reduce the payments under the fee schedule for the following fiscal year based on caseload estimates and available funding, except payments may not be reduced to less than seventy percent of payments for comparable services under the workers' compensation program;(ii) If an unforeseeable catastrophic event results in insufficient funding to continue payments to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program, the director shall reduce the payments under the fee schedule to not less than seventy percent of payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program, provided that the reduction may not be more than necessary to fund benefits under the program; and(iii) Once sufficient funding is provided or otherwise available, the director shall increase the payments under the fee schedule to not less than payments provided for comparable services under the workers' compensation program;(h) Make a record of the commencement of every disability and the termination thereof and, when bills are rendered for the care and treatment of injured victims, shall approve and pay those which conform to the adopted rules, regulations, established fee schedules, and practices of the director and may reject any bill or item thereof incurred in violation of the principles laid down in this section or the rules, regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and regulations adopted under it.(3) The director and his or her authorized assistants:(a) Have power to issue subpoenas to enforce the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production and examination of books, papers, photographs, tapes, and records before the department in connection with any claim made to the department or any billing submitted to the department. The superior court has the power to enforce any such subpoena by proper proceedings;(b)(i) May apply for and obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the county where the subpoenaed records or documents are located, or in Thurston county. The application must (A) state that an order is sought pursuant to this subsection; (B) adequately specify the records, documents, or testimony; and (C) declare under oath that an investigation is being conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the department's authority and that the subpoenaed documents or testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the department's authority.(ii) Where the application under this subsection (3)(b) is made to the satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law for the agency to subpoena the records or testimony.(iii) The director and his or her authorized assistants may seek approval and a court may issue an order under this subsection without prior notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation.(4) In all hearings, actions, or proceedings before the department, any physician or licensed advanced practice registered nurse having theretofore examined or treated the claimant may be required to testify fully regarding such examination or treatment, and shall not be exempt from so testifying by reason of the relation of the physician or licensed advanced practice registered nurse to the patient.Sec. 21. RCW 7.70.020 and 2019 c 308 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:As used in this chapter "health care provider" means either:(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or related services including, but not limited to, an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, a physician, osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician, physician ((assistant))associate, midwife, ((osteopathic physician's assistant,)) nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative;(2) An employee or agent of a person described in ((part (1) above))subsection (1) of this section, acting in the course and scope of his (([or her]))or her employment, including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or institution employing one or more persons described in ((part (1) above,))subsection (1) of this section including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of his or her employment, including in the event such officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative.Sec. 22. RCW 9.02.110 and 2025 c 58 s 5061 are each amended to read as follows:The state may not deny or interfere with a pregnant individual's right to choose to have an abortion prior to viability of the fetus, or to protect the pregnant individual's life or health.A physician, physician ((assistant))associate, advanced practice registered nurse, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice may terminate and a health care provider may assist a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, advanced practice registered nurse, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice in terminating a pregnancy as permitted by this section.Sec. 23. RCW 9.02.130 and 2025 c 58 s 5062 are each amended to read as follows:The good faith judgment of a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, advanced practice registered nurse, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice as to viability of the fetus or as to the risk to life or health of a pregnant individual and the good faith judgment of a health care provider as to the duration of pregnancy shall be a defense in any proceeding in which a violation of this chapter is an issue.Sec. 24. RCW 9.02.170 and 2025 c 58 s 5063 are each amended to read as follows:For purposes of this chapter:(1) "Abortion" means any medical treatment intended to induce the termination of a pregnancy except for the purpose of producing a live birth.(2) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.(3) "Health care provider" means a person regulated under Title 18 RCW to practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this state consistent with state law.(4) "Physician" means a physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW in the state of Washington.(5) "Physician ((assistant))associate" means a physician ((assistant))associate licensed to practice under chapter 18.71A RCW in the state of Washington.(6) "Pregnancy" means the reproductive process beginning with the implantation of an embryo.(7) "Private medical facility" means any medical facility that is not owned or operated by the state.(8) "State" means the state of Washington and counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal corporations in the state of Washington.(9) "Viability" means the point in the pregnancy when, in the judgment of the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, advanced practice registered nurse, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice on the particular facts of the case before such physician, physician ((assistant))associate, advanced practice registered nurse, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice, there is a reasonable likelihood of the fetus's sustained survival outside the uterus without the application of extraordinary medical measures.Sec. 25. RCW 9.41.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5064 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Antique firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not designed or redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898, including any matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system and also any firearm using fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for which ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.(2)(a) "Assault weapon" means:(i) Any of the following specific firearms regardless of which company produced and manufactured the firearm:AK-47 in all formsAK-74 in all formsAlgimec AGM-1 type semiautomaticAmerican Arms Spectre da semiautomatic carbineAR15, M16, or M4 in all formsAR 180 type semiautomaticArgentine L.S.R. semiautomaticAustralian AutomaticAuto-Ordnance Thompson M1 and 1927 semiautomaticsBarrett .50 cal light semiautomaticBarrett .50 cal M87Barrett .50 cal M107A1Barrett REC7Beretta AR70/S70 type semiautomaticBushmaster Carbon 15Bushmaster ACRBushmaster XM-15Bushmaster MOECalico models M100 and M900CETME SporterCIS SR 88 type semiautomaticColt CAR 15Daewoo K-1Daewoo K-2Dragunov semiautomaticFabrique Nationale FAL in all formsFabrique Nationale F2000Fabrique Nationale L1A1 SporterFabrique Nationale M249SFabrique Nationale PS90Fabrique Nationale SCARFAMAS .223 semiautomaticGalilHeckler & Koch G3 in all formsHeckler & Koch HK-41/91Heckler & Koch HK-43/93Heckler & Koch HK94A2/3Heckler & Koch MP-5 in all formsHeckler & Koch PSG-1Heckler & Koch SL8Heckler & Koch UMPManchester Arms Commando MK-45Manchester Arms MK-9SAR-4800SIG AMT SG510 in all formsSIG SG550 in all formsSKSSpectre M4Springfield Armory BM-59Springfield Armory G3Springfield Armory SAR-8Springfield Armory SAR-48Springfield Armory SAR-3Springfield Armory M-21 sniperSpringfield Armory M1ASmith & Wesson M&P 15Sterling Mk 1Sterling Mk 6/7Steyr AUGTNW M230FAMAS F11Uzi 9mm carbine/rifle(ii) A semiautomatic rifle that has an overall length of less than 30 inches;(iii) A conversion kit, part, or combination of parts, from which an assault weapon can be assembled or from which a firearm can be converted into an assault weapon if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person; or(iv) A semiautomatic, center fire rifle that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following:(A) A grip that is independent or detached from the stock that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon. The addition of a fin attaching the grip to the stock does not exempt the grip if it otherwise resembles the grip found on a pistol;(B) Thumbhole stock;(C) Folding or telescoping stock;(D) Forward pistol, vertical, angled, or other grip designed for use by the nonfiring hand to improve control;(E) Flash suppressor, flash guard, flash eliminator, flash hider, sound suppressor, silencer, or any item designed to reduce the visual or audio signature of the firearm;(F) Muzzle brake, recoil compensator, or any item designed to be affixed to the barrel to reduce recoil or muzzle rise;(G) Threaded barrel designed to attach a flash suppressor, sound suppressor, muzzle break, or similar item;(H) Grenade launcher or flare launcher; or(I) A shroud that encircles either all or part of the barrel designed to shield the bearer's hand from heat, except a solid forearm of a stock that covers only the bottom of the barrel;(v) A semiautomatic, center fire rifle that has a fixed magazine with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds;(vi) A semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to accept a detachable magazine and has one or more of the following:(A) A threaded barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer;(B) A second hand grip;(C) A shroud that encircles either all or part of the barrel designed to shield the bearer's hand from heat, except a solid forearm of a stock that covers only the bottom of the barrel; or(D) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol grip;(vii) A semiautomatic shotgun that has any of the following:(A) A folding or telescoping stock;(B) A grip that is independent or detached from the stock that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon. The addition of a fin attaching the grip to the stock does not exempt the grip if it otherwise resembles the grip found on a pistol;(C) A thumbhole stock;(D) A forward pistol, vertical, angled, or other grip designed for use by the nonfiring hand to improve control;(E) A fixed magazine in excess of seven rounds; or(F) A revolving cylinder shotgun.(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "fixed magazine" means an ammunition feeding device contained in, or permanently attached to, a firearm in such a manner that the device cannot be removed without disassembly of the firearm action.(c) "Assault weapon" does not include antique firearms, any firearm that has been made permanently inoperable, or any firearm that is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action.(3) "Assemble" means to fit together component parts.(4) "Barrel length" means the distance from the bolt face of a closed action down the length of the axis of the bore to the crown of the muzzle, or in the case of a barrel with attachments to the end of any legal device permanently attached to the end of the muzzle.(5) "Bump-fire stock" means a butt stock designed to be attached to a semiautomatic firearm with the effect of increasing the rate of fire achievable with the semiautomatic firearm to that of a fully automatic firearm by using the energy from the recoil of the firearm to generate reciprocating action that facilitates repeated activation of the trigger.(6) "Conviction" or "convicted" means, whether in an adult court or adjudicated in a juvenile court, that a plea of guilty has been accepted or a verdict of guilty has been filed, or a finding of guilt has been entered, notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings including, but not limited to, sentencing or disposition, posttrial or post-fact-finding motions, and appeals. "Conviction" includes a dismissal entered after a period of probation, suspension, or deferral of sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in jurisdictions other than Washington state.(7) "Crime of violence" means:(a) Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, burglary in the second degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second degree;(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, which is comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in (a) of this subsection; and(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence under (a) or (b) of this subsection.(8) "Curio or relic" has the same meaning as provided in 27 C.F.R. Sec. 478.11.(9) "Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling firearms at wholesale or retail who has, or is required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who does not have, and is not required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer if that person makes only occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms for the enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or part of his or her personal collection of firearms.(10) "Detachable magazine" means an ammunition feeding device that can be loaded or unloaded while detached from a firearm and readily inserted into a firearm.(11) "Distribute" means to give out, provide, make available, or deliver a firearm or large capacity magazine to any person in this state, with or without consideration, whether the distributor is in-state or out-of-state. "Distribute" includes, but is not limited to, filling orders placed in this state, online or otherwise. "Distribute" also includes causing a firearm or large capacity magazine to be delivered in this state.(12) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 10.99.020.(13) "Family or household member" has the same meaning as in RCW 7.105.010.(14) "Federal firearms dealer" means a licensed dealer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(11).(15) "Federal firearms importer" means a licensed importer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(9).(16) "Federal firearms manufacturer" means a licensed manufacturer as defined in 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(10).(17) "Felony" means any felony offense under the laws of this state or any federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense under the laws of this state.(18) "Felony firearm offender" means a person who has previously been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state of any felony firearm offense. A person is not a felony firearm offender under this chapter if any and all qualifying offenses have been the subject of an expungement, pardon, annulment, certificate, or rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person convicted or a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of innocence.(19) "Felony firearm offense" means:(a) Any felony offense that is a violation of this chapter;(b) A violation of RCW 9A.36.045;(c) A violation of RCW 9A.56.300;(d) A violation of RCW 9A.56.310;(e) Any felony offense if the offender was armed with a firearm in the commission of the offense.(20) "Firearm" means a weapon or device from which a projectile or projectiles may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder. For the purposes of RCW 9.41.040, "firearm" also includes frames and receivers. "Firearm" does not include a flare gun or other pyrotechnic visual distress signaling device, or a powder-actuated tool or other device designed solely to be used for construction purposes.(21)(a) "Frame or receiver" means a part of a firearm that, when the complete firearm is assembled, is visible from the exterior and provides housing or a structure designed to hold or integrate one or more fire control components, even if pins or other attachments are required to connect the fire control components. Any such part identified with a serial number shall be presumed, absent an official determination by the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives or other reliable evidence to the contrary, to be a frame or receiver.(b) For purposes of this subsection, "fire control component" means a component necessary for the firearm to initiate, complete, or continue the firing sequence, including any of the following: Hammer, bolt, bolt carrier, breechblock, cylinder, trigger mechanism, firing pin, striker, or slide rails.(22) "Gun" has the same meaning as firearm.(23) "Import" means to move, transport, or receive an item from a place outside the territorial limits of the state of Washington to a place inside the territorial limits of the state of Washington. "Import" does not mean situations where an individual possesses a large capacity magazine or assault weapon when departing from, and returning to, Washington state, so long as the individual is returning to Washington in possession of the same large capacity magazine or assault weapon the individual transported out of state.(24) "Intimate partner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 7.105.010.(25) "Large capacity magazine" means an ammunition feeding device with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds of ammunition, or any conversion kit, part, or combination of parts, from which such a device can be assembled if those parts are in possession of or under the control of the same person, but shall not be construed to include any of the following:(a) An ammunition feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it cannot accommodate more than 10 rounds of ammunition;(b) A 22 caliber tube ammunition feeding device; or(c) A tubular magazine that is contained in a lever-action firearm.(26) "Law enforcement officer" includes a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially commissioned Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. "Law enforcement officer" also includes a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 if such officer is duly authorized by his or her employer to carry a concealed pistol.(27) "Lawful permanent resident" has the same meaning afforded a person "lawfully admitted for permanent residence" in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(20).(28) "Licensed collector" means a person who is federally licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(b).(29) "Licensed dealer" means a person who is federally licensed under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a).(30) "Loaded" means:(a) There is a cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;(b) Cartridges are in a clip that is locked in place in the firearm;(c) There is a cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the firearm is a revolver;(d) There is a cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted in the action; or(e) There is a ball in the barrel and the firearm is capped or primed if the firearm is a muzzle loader.(31) "Machine gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun, mechanical rifle, submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument not requiring that the trigger be pressed for each shot and having a reservoir clip, disc, drum, belt, or other separable mechanical device for storing, carrying, or supplying ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and fired therefrom at the rate of five or more shots per second.(32) "Manufacture" means, with respect to a firearm or large capacity magazine, the fabrication, making, formation, production, or construction of a firearm or large capacity magazine, by manual labor or by machinery.(33) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist, psychologist, or physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, psychiatric nurse, social worker, mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, or such other mental health professionals as may be defined in statute or by rules adopted by the department of health pursuant to the provisions of chapter 71.05 RCW.(34) "Nonimmigrant alien" means a person defined as such in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15).(35) "Person" means any individual, corporation, company, association, firm, partnership, club, organization, society, joint stock company, or other legal entity.(36) "Pistol" means any firearm with a barrel less than 16 inches in length, or is designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.(37) "Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.(38) "Sale" and "sell" mean the actual approval of the delivery of a firearm in consideration of payment or promise of payment.(39) "Secure gun storage" means:(a) A locked box, gun safe, or other secure locked storage space that is designed to prevent unauthorized use or discharge of a firearm; and(b) The act of keeping an unloaded firearm stored by such means.(40) "Semiautomatic" means any firearm which utilizes a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next round, and which requires a separate pull of the trigger to fire each cartridge.(41)(a) "Semiautomatic assault rifle" means any rifle which utilizes a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract the fired cartridge case and chamber the next round, and which requires a separate pull of the trigger to fire each cartridge.(b) "Semiautomatic assault rifle" does not include antique firearms, any firearm that has been made permanently inoperable, or any firearm that is manually operated by bolt, pump, lever, or slide action.(42) "Serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended:(a) Any crime of violence;(b) Any felony violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50 RCW, that is classified as a class B felony or that has a maximum term of imprisonment of at least 10 years;(c) Child molestation in the second degree;(d) Incest when committed against a child under age 14;(e) Indecent liberties;(f) Leading organized crime;(g) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;(h) Rape in the third degree;(i) Drive-by shooting;(j) Sexual exploitation;(k) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner;(l) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;(m) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as "sexual motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;(n) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825;(o) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, that is comparable to a serious offense, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious offense;(p) Any felony conviction under RCW 9.41.115; or(q) Any felony charged under RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6).(43) "Sex offense" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9.94A.030.(44) "Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels less than 16 inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than 26 inches.(45) "Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more barrels less than 18 inches in length and any weapon made from a shotgun by any means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than 26 inches.(46) "Shotgun" means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of ball shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.(47) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified under chapter 18.205 RCW.(48) "Transfer" means the intended delivery of a firearm to another person without consideration of payment or promise of payment including, but not limited to, gifts and loans. "Transfer" does not include the delivery of a firearm owned or leased by an entity licensed or qualified to do business in the state of Washington to, or return of such a firearm by, any of that entity's employees or agents, defined to include volunteers participating in an honor guard, for lawful purposes in the ordinary course of business.(49) "Undetectable firearm" means any firearm that is not as detectable as 3.7 ounces of 17-4 PH stainless steel by walk-through metal detectors or magnetometers commonly used at airports or any firearm where the barrel, the slide or cylinder, or the frame or receiver of the firearm would not generate an image that accurately depicts the shape of the part when examined by the types of X-ray machines commonly used at airports.(50)(a) "Unfinished frame or receiver" means a frame or receiver that is partially complete, disassembled, or inoperable, that: (i) Has reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be completed, assembled, converted, or restored to a functional state; or (ii) is marketed or sold to the public to become or be used as the frame or receiver of a functional firearm once finished or completed, including without limitation products marketed or sold to the public as an 80 percent frame or receiver or unfinished frame or receiver.(b) For purposes of this subsection:(i) "Readily" means a process that is fairly or reasonably efficient, quick, and easy, but not necessarily the most efficient, speedy, or easy process. Factors relevant in making this determination, with no single one controlling, include the following: (A) Time, i.e., how long it takes to finish the process; (B) ease, i.e., how difficult it is to do so; (C) expertise, i.e., what knowledge and skills are required; (D) equipment, i.e., what tools are required; (E) availability, i.e., whether additional parts are required, and how easily they can be obtained; (F) expense, i.e., how much it costs; (G) scope, i.e., the extent to which the subject of the process must be changed to finish it; and (H) feasibility, i.e., whether the process would damage or destroy the subject of the process, or cause it to malfunction.(ii) "Partially complete," as it modifies frame or receiver, means a forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar article that has reached a stage in manufacture where it is clearly identifiable as an unfinished component part of a firearm.(51) "Unlicensed person" means any person who is not a licensed dealer under this chapter.(52) "Untraceable firearm" means any firearm manufactured after July 1, 2019, that is not an antique firearm and that cannot be traced by law enforcement by means of a serial number affixed to the firearm by a federal firearms manufacturer, federal firearms importer, or federal firearms dealer in compliance with all federal laws and regulations.(53) "Washington state patrol firearms background check program" means the division within the state patrol that conducts background checks for all firearm transfers and the disposition of firearms.Sec. 26. RCW 9.97.020 and 2021 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in this section, no state, county, or municipal department, board, officer, or agency authorized to assess the qualifications of any applicant for a license, certificate of authority, qualification to engage in the practice of a profession or business, or for admission to an examination to qualify for such a license or certificate may disqualify a qualified applicant, solely based on the applicant's criminal history, if the qualified applicant has obtained a certificate of restoration of opportunity and the applicant meets all other statutory and regulatory requirements, except as required by federal law or exempted under this subsection. Nothing in this section is interpreted as restoring or creating a means to restore any firearms rights or eligibility to obtain a firearm dealer license pursuant to RCW 9.41.110 or requiring the removal of a protection order.(a)(i) Criminal justice agencies, as defined in RCW 10.97.030, and the Washington state bar association are exempt from this section.(ii) This section does not apply to the licensing, certification, or qualification of the following professionals: Accountants, RCW 18.04.295; bail bond agents, RCW 18.185.020; escrow agents, RCW 18.44.241; nursing home administrators, RCW 18.52.071; nursing, chapter 18.79 RCW; physicians and physician ((assistants))associates, chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; private investigators, RCW 18.165.030; receivers, RCW 7.60.035; teachers, chapters 28A.405 and 28A.410 RCW; notaries public, chapter 42.45 RCW; private investigators, chapter 18.165 RCW; real estate brokers and salespersons, chapters 18.85 and 18.86 RCW; security guards, chapter 18.170 RCW; and vulnerable adult care providers, RCW 43.43.842, who are not home care aides, chapter 18.88B RCW, or contracted providers or licensees as defined in RCW 43.20A.715.(iii) To the extent this section conflicts with the requirements for receipt of federal funding under the adoption and safe families act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 671, this section does not apply.(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, in cases where an applicant would be disqualified under RCW 43.216.170, and the applicant has obtained a certificate of restoration of opportunity for a disqualifying conviction, the department of children, youth, and families may, after review of relevant factors, including the nature and seriousness of the offense, time that has passed since conviction, changed circumstances since the offense occurred, and the nature of the employment or license sought, at their discretion:(i) Allow the applicant to have unsupervised access to children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities if the applicant is otherwise qualified and suitable; or(ii) Disqualify the applicant solely based on the applicant's criminal history.(c) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, in cases in which an applicant would be disqualified under RCW 43.20A.710, 43.43.842, or department rule, and the applicant has obtained a certificate of restoration of opportunity for a disqualifying conviction, the department of social and health services may, after review of relevant factors, including the nature and seriousness of the offense, time that has passed since conviction, changed circumstances since the offense occurred, and the nature of the employment or license sought, at its discretion:(i) Allow the applicant to have unsupervised access to children, vulnerable adults, or individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities if the applicant is otherwise qualified and suitable; or(ii) Disqualify the applicant solely based on the applicant's criminal history.(d) If the practice of a profession or business involves unsupervised contact with vulnerable adults, children, or individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities, or populations otherwise defined by statute as vulnerable, the department of health may, after review of relevant factors, including the nature and seriousness of the offense, time that has passed since conviction, changed circumstances since the offense occurred, and the nature of the employment or license sought, at its discretion:(i) Disqualify an applicant who has obtained a certificate of restoration of opportunity, for a license, certification, or registration to engage in the practice of a health care profession or business solely based on the applicant's criminal history; or(ii) If such applicant is otherwise qualified and suitable, credential or credential with conditions an applicant who has obtained a certificate of restoration of opportunity for a license, certification, or registration to engage in the practice of a health care profession or business.(e) The state of Washington, any of its counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations, the department of health, the department of social and health services, and its officers, employees, contractors, and agents are immune from suit in law, equity, or any action under the administrative procedure act based upon its exercise of discretion under this section. This section does not create a protected class; private right of action; any right, privilege, or duty; or change to any right, privilege, or duty existing under law. This section does not modify a licensing or certification applicant's right to a review of an agency's decision under the administrative procedure act or other applicable statute or agency rule. A certificate of restoration of opportunity does not remove or alter citizenship or legal residency requirements already in place for state agencies and employers.(2) A qualified court has jurisdiction to issue a certificate of restoration of opportunity to a qualified applicant.(a) A court must determine, in its discretion whether the certificate:(i) Applies to all past criminal history; or(ii) Applies only to the convictions or adjudications in the jurisdiction of the court.(b) The certificate does not apply to any future criminal justice involvement that occurs after the certificate is issued.(c) A court must determine whether to issue a certificate by determining whether the applicant is a qualified applicant as defined in RCW 9.97.010.(3) An employer or housing provider may, in its sole discretion, determine whether to consider a certificate of restoration of opportunity issued under this chapter in making employment or rental decisions. An employer or housing provider is immune from suit in law, equity, or under the administrative procedure act for damages based upon its exercise of discretion under this section or the refusal to exercise such discretion. In any action at law against an employer or housing provider arising out of the employment of or provision of housing to the recipient of a certificate of restoration of opportunity, evidence of the crime for which a certificate of restoration of opportunity has been issued may not be introduced as evidence of negligence or intentionally tortious conduct on the part of the employer or housing provider. This subsection does not create a protected class, private right of action, any right, privilege, or duty, or to change any right, privilege, or duty existing under law related to employment or housing except as provided in RCW 7.60.035.(4) The department of social and health services, and contracted providers and licensees as defined in RCW 43.20A.715, when hiring, licensing, certifying, contracting with, permitting, or continuing to permit a person to be employed in any position caring for or having unsupervised access to vulnerable adults or children, may, in their sole discretion, determine whether to consider a certificate of restoration of opportunity issued under this chapter. If the department or a consumer directed employer as defined in RCW 74.39A.009 determines that an individual with a certificate of restoration of opportunity is qualified to work as an individual provider as defined in RCW 74.39A.240, the department or the consumer directed employer must provide the client, and their guardian if any, with the results of the state background check for their determination of character, suitability, and competence of the individual before the individual begins providing services. The department of social and health services, or contracted providers or licensees as defined in RCW 43.20A.715, when hiring, licensing, certifying, contracting with, permitting, or continuing to permit a person to be employed in any position caring for or having unsupervised access to vulnerable adults or children, have a rebuttable presumption that their exercise of discretion under this subsection or the refusal to exercise such discretion was appropriate. This subsection does not create a protected class, a private right of action, or any right, privilege, or duty, or to change any right, privilege, or duty existing under law related to the department of social and health services, contracted providers, and licensees as defined in RCW 43.20A.715.(5)(a) Department of social and health services:Â A certificate of restoration of opportunity does not apply to the state abuse and neglect registry.Â No finding of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of property may be removed from the registry based solely on a certificate.Â The department must include such certificates as part of its criminal history record reports, qualifying letters, or other assessments pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.838. The department shall adopt rules to implement this subsection.(b) Washington state patrol:Â The Washington state patrol is not required to remove any records based solely on a certificate of restoration of opportunity.Â The state patrol must include a certificate as part of its criminal history record report.(c) Court records:(i) A certificate of restoration of opportunity has no effect on any other court records, including records in the judicial information system.Â The court records related to a certificate of restoration of opportunity must be processed and recorded in the same manner as any other record.(ii) The qualified court where the applicant seeks the certificate of restoration of opportunity must administer the court records regarding the certificate in the same manner as it does regarding all other proceedings.(d) Effect in other judicial proceedings: A certificate of restoration of opportunity may only be submitted to a court to demonstrate that the individual met the specific requirements of this section and not for any other procedure, including evidence of character, reputation, or conduct. A certificate is not an equivalent procedure under Rule of Evidence 609(c).(e) Department of health: The department of health must include a certificate of restoration of opportunity on its public website if:(i) Its website includes an order, stipulation to informal disposition, or notice of decision related to the conviction identified in the certificate of restoration of opportunity; and(ii) The credential holder has provided a certified copy of the certificate of restoration of opportunity to the department of health.(f) Department of children, youth, and families: A certificate of restoration of opportunity does not apply to founded findings of child abuse or neglect. No finding of child abuse or neglect may be destroyed based solely on a certificate. The department of children, youth, and families must include such certificates as part of its criminal history record reports, qualifying letters, or other assessments pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.838. The department of children, youth, and families shall adopt rules to implement this subsection (5)(f).(6) In all cases, an applicant must provide notice to the prosecutor in the county where he or she seeks a certificate of restoration of opportunity of the pendency of such application. If the applicant has been sentenced by any other jurisdiction in the five years preceding the application for a certificate, the applicant must also notify the prosecuting attorney in those jurisdictions. The prosecutor in the county where an applicant applies for a certificate shall provide the court with a report of the applicant's criminal history.(7) Application for a certificate of restoration of opportunity must be filed as a civil action.(8) A superior court in the county in which the applicant resides may decline to consider the application for certificate of restoration of opportunity. If the superior court in which the applicant resides declines to consider the application, the court must dismiss the application without prejudice and the applicant may refile the application in another qualified court. The court must state the reason for the dismissal on the order. If the court determines that the applicant does not meet the required qualifications, then the court must dismiss the application without prejudice and state the reason(s) on the order. The superior court in the county of the applicant's conviction or adjudication may not decline to consider the application.(9) Unless the qualified court determines that a hearing on an application for certificate of restoration is necessary, the court must decide without a hearing whether to grant the certificate of restoration of opportunity based on a review of the application filed by the applicant and pleadings filed by the prosecuting attorney.(10) The clerk of the court in which the certificate of restoration of opportunity is granted shall transmit the certificate of restoration of opportunity to the Washington state patrol identification section, which holds criminal history information for the person who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol shall update its records to reflect the certificate of restoration of opportunity.(11)(a) The administrative office of the courts shall develop and prepare instructions, forms, and an informational brochure designed to assist applicants applying for a certificate of restoration of opportunity.(b) The instructions must include, at least, a sample of a standard application and a form order for a certificate of restoration of opportunity.(c) The administrative office of the courts shall distribute a master copy of the instructions, informational brochure, and sample application and form order to all county clerks and a master copy of the application and order to all superior courts by January 1, 2017.(d) The administrative office of the courts shall determine the significant non-English-speaking or limited English-speaking populations in the state. The administrator shall then arrange for translation of the instructions, which shall contain a sample of the standard application and order, and the informational brochure into languages spoken by those significant non-English-speaking populations and shall distribute a master copy of the translated instructions and informational brochures to the county clerks by January 1, 2017.(e) The administrative office of the courts shall update the instructions, brochures, standard application and order, and translations when changes in the law make an update necessary.Sec. 27. RCW 10.77.575 and 2025 c 58 s 5066 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Conditional release planning should start at admission and proceed in coordination between the department and the person's managed care organization, or behavioral health administrative services organization if the person is not eligible for medical assistance under chapter 74.09 RCW. If needed, the department shall assist the person to enroll in medical assistance in suspense status under RCW 74.09.670. The state hospital liaison for the managed care organization or behavioral health administrative services organization shall facilitate conditional release planning in collaboration with the department.(2) Less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order, at a minimum, includes the following services:(a) Assignment of a care coordinator;(b) An intake evaluation with the provider of the conditional treatment;(c) A psychiatric evaluation or a substance use disorder evaluation, or both;(d) A schedule of regular contacts with the provider of the less restrictive alternative treatment services for the duration of the order;(e) A transition plan addressing access to continued services at the expiration of the order;(f) An individual crisis plan;(g) Consultation about the formation of a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW;(h) Appointment of a transition team under RCW 10.77.550; and(i) Notification to the care coordinator assigned in (a) of this subsection and to the transition team as provided in RCW 10.77.550 if reasonable efforts to engage the client fail to produce substantial compliance with court-ordered treatment conditions.(3) Less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order may additionally include requirements to participate in the following services:(a) Medication management;(b) Psychotherapy;(c) Nursing;(d) Substance use disorder counseling;(e) Residential treatment;(f) Partial hospitalization;(g) Intensive outpatient treatment;(h) Support for housing, benefits, education, and employment; and(i) Periodic court review.(4) Nothing in this section prohibits items in subsection (2) of this section from beginning before the conditional release of the individual.(5) If the person was provided with involuntary medication under RCW 10.77.525 or pursuant to a judicial order during the involuntary commitment period, the less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to the conditional release order may authorize the less restrictive alternative treatment provider or its designee to administer involuntary antipsychotic medication to the person if the provider has attempted and failed to obtain the informed consent of the person and there is a concurring medical opinion approving the medication by a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or physician or physician ((assistant))associate in consultation with an independent mental health professional with prescribing authority.(6) Less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order must be administered by a provider that is certified or licensed to provide or coordinate the full scope of services required under the less restrictive alternative order and that has agreed to assume this responsibility.(7) The care coordinator assigned to a person ordered to less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order must submit an individualized plan for the person's treatment services to the court that entered the order. An initial plan must be submitted as soon as possible following the intake evaluation and a revised plan must be submitted upon any subsequent modification in which a type of service is removed from or added to the treatment plan.(8) A care coordinator may disclose information and records related to mental health treatment under RCW 70.02.230(2)(k) for purposes of implementing less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order.(9) For the purpose of this section, "care coordinator" means a representative from the department of social and health services who coordinates the activities of less restrictive alternative treatment pursuant to a conditional release order. The care coordinator coordinates activities with the person's transition team that are necessary for enforcement and continuation of the conditional release order and is responsible for coordinating service activities with other agencies and establishing and maintaining a therapeutic relationship with the individual on a continuing basis.Sec. 28. RCW 11.130.290 and 2025 c 58 s 5067 are each amended to read as follows:(1) On receipt of a petition under RCW 11.130.270 and at the time the court appoints a court visitor under RCW 11.130.280, the court shall order a professional evaluation of the respondent.(2) The respondent must be examined by a physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, or physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW selected by the court visitor who is qualified to evaluate the respondent's alleged cognitive and functional abilities and limitations and will not be advantaged or disadvantaged by a decision to grant the petition or otherwise have a conflict of interest. If the respondent opposes the professional selected by the court visitor, the court visitor shall obtain a professional evaluation from the professional selected by the respondent. The court visitor, after receiving a professional evaluation from the individual selected by the respondent, may obtain a supplemental evaluation from a different professional.(3) The individual conducting the evaluation shall provide the completed evaluation report to the court visitor within thirty days of the examination of the respondent. The court visitor shall file the report in a sealed record with the court. Unless otherwise directed by the court, the report must contain:(a) The professional's name, address, education, and experience;(b) A description of the nature, type, and extent of the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities and limitations;(c) An evaluation of the respondent's mental and physical condition and, if appropriate, educational potential, adaptive behavior, and social skills;(d) A prognosis for improvement and recommendation for the appropriate treatment, support, or habilitation plan;(e) A description of the respondent's current medications, and the effect of the medications on the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities;(f) Identification or persons with whom the professional has met or spoken with regarding the respondent; and(g) The date of the examination on which the report is based.(4) If the respondent declines to participate in an evaluation ordered under subsection (1) of this section, the court may proceed with the hearing under RCW 11.130.275 if the court finds that it has sufficient information to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the professional evaluation.Sec. 29. RCW 11.130.390 and 2025 c 58 s 5068 are each amended to read as follows:(1) On receipt of a petition under RCW 11.130.360 and at the time the court appoints a court visitor under RCW 11.130.380, the court shall order a professional evaluation of the respondent.(2) The respondent must be examined by a physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, or physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, selected by the court visitor who is qualified to evaluate the respondent's alleged cognitive and functional abilities and limitations and will not be advantaged or disadvantaged by a decision to grant the petition or otherwise have a conflict of interest. If the respondent opposes the professional selected by the court visitor, the court visitor shall obtain a professional evaluation from the professional selected by the respondent. The court visitor, after receiving a professional evaluation from the individual selected by the respondent, may obtain a supplemental evaluation from a different professional.(3) The individual conducting the evaluation shall promptly provide the completed evaluation report to the court visitor who shall file the report in a sealed record with the court. Unless otherwise directed by the court, the report must contain:(a) The professional's name, address, education, and experience;(b) A description of the nature, type, and extent of the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities and limitations with regard to the management of the respondent's property and financial affairs;(c) An evaluation of the respondent's mental and physical condition and, if appropriate, educational potential, adaptive behavior, and social skills;(d) A prognosis for improvement with regard to the ability to manage the respondent's property and financial affairs;(e) A description of the respondent's current medications, and the effect of the medications on the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities;(f) Identification or persons with whom the professional has met or spoken with regarding the respondent; and(g) The date of the examination on which the report is based.(4) If the respondent declines to participate in an evaluation ordered under subsection (1) of this section, the court may proceed with the hearing under RCW 11.130.370 if the court finds that it has sufficient information to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the professional evaluation.(5) A professional evaluation is not required if a petition for appointment of a conservator under RCW 11.130.360 is for a conservator for the property or financial affairs of a minor or for an adult missing, detained, or unable to return to the United States.Sec. 30. RCW 11.130.615 and 2025 c 58 s 5069 are each amended to read as follows:(1) On receipt of a petition under RCW 11.130.595 and at the time the court appoints a court visitor under RCW 11.130.605, the court shall order a professional evaluation of the respondent.(2) The respondent must be examined by a physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, or physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW selected by the court visitor who is qualified to evaluate the respondent's alleged cognitive and functional abilities and limitations and will not be advantaged or disadvantaged by a decision to grant the petition or otherwise have a conflict of interest. If the respondent opposes the professional selected by the court visitor, the court visitor shall obtain a professional evaluation from the professional selected by the respondent. The court visitor, after receiving a professional evaluation from the individual selected by the respondent, may obtain a supplemental evaluation from a different professional.(3) The individual conducting the evaluation shall provide the completed evaluation report to the court visitor within thirty days of the examination of the respondent. The court visitor shall file the report in a sealed record with the court. Unless otherwise directed by the court, the report must contain:(a) The professional's name, address, education, and experience;(b) A description of the nature, type, and extent of the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities and limitations;(c) An evaluation of the respondent's mental and physical condition and, if appropriate, education potential, adaptive behavior, and social skills;(d) A prognosis for improvement and recommendation for the appropriate treatment, support, or habilitation plan;(e) A description of the respondent's current medications, and the effect of the medications on the respondent's cognitive and functional abilities;(f) Identification or persons with whom the professional has met or spoken with regarding the respondent; and(g) The date of the examination on which the report is based.(4) If the respondent declines to participate in an evaluation ordered under subsection (1) of this section, the court may proceed with the hearing under RCW 11.130.600 if the court finds that it has sufficient information to determine the respondent's needs and abilities without the professional evaluation.Sec. 31. RCW 18.16.260 and 2025 c 58 s 5070 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Prior to July 1, 2005, (i) a cosmetology licensee who held a license in good standing between June 30, 1999, and June 30, 2003, may request a renewal of the license or an additional license in barbering, manicuring, and/or esthetics; and (ii) a licensee who held a barber, manicurist, or esthetics license between June 30, 1999, and June 30, 2003, may request a renewal of such licenses held during that period.(b) A license renewal fee, including, if applicable, a renewal fee, at the current rate, for each year the licensee did not hold a license in good standing between July 1, 2001, and the date of the renewal request, must be paid prior to issuance of each type of license requested. After June 30, 2005, any cosmetology licensee wishing to renew an expired license or obtain additional licenses must meet the applicable renewal, training, and examination requirements of this chapter.(2)(a) Any person holding an active license in good standing as an esthetician prior to January 1, 2015, may be licensed as an esthetician licensee after paying the appropriate license fee.(b) Prior to January 1, 2015, an applicant for a master esthetician license must have an active license in good standing as an esthetician, pay the appropriate license fee, and provide the department with proof of having satisfied one or more of the following requirements:(i)(A)(I) A minimum of thirty-five hours employment as a provider of medium depth peels under the delegation or supervision of a licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate, or other licensed professional whose licensure permits such delegation or supervision; or(II) Seven hours of training in theory and application of medium depth peels; and(B)(I) A minimum of one hundred fifty hours employment as a laser operator under the delegation or supervision of a licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate, or other licensed professional whose licensure permits such delegation or supervision; or(II) Seventy-five hours of laser training;(ii) A national or international diploma or certification in esthetics that is recognized by the department by rule;(iii) An instructor in esthetics who has been licensed as an instructor in esthetics by the department for a minimum of three years; or(iv) Completion of one thousand two hundred hours of an esthetic curriculum approved by the department.(3) The director may, as provided in RCW 43.24.140, modify the duration of any additional license granted under this section to make all licenses issued to a person expire on the same date.Sec. 32. RCW 18.50.005 and 2025 c 58 s 5071 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:(1) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.(2) "Department" means the department of health.(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.(4) "Midwife" means a midwife licensed under this chapter.(5) "Naturopath" means a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW.(6) "Physician" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.(7) "Physician ((assistant))associate" means a physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.Sec. 33. RCW 18.50.115 and 2025 c 58 s 5072 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A midwife licensed under this chapter may obtain and administer prophylactic ophthalmic medication, postpartum oxytocic, vitamin K, Rho immune globulin (human), and local anesthetic and may administer such other drugs or medications as prescribed by a physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, a naturopath, or a physician ((assistant))associate acting within the practitioner's scope of practice. A pharmacist who dispenses such drugs to a licensed midwife shall not be liable for any adverse reactions caused by any method of use by the midwife.(2) A midwife licensed under this chapter who has been granted a limited prescriptive license extension by the secretary may prescribe, obtain, and administer:(a) Antibiotic, antiemetic, antiviral, antifungal, low-potency topical steroid, and antipruritic medications and therapies, and other medications and therapies as defined in the midwifery legend drugs and devices rule for the prevention and treatment of conditions that do not constitute a significant deviation from normal in pregnancy or postpartum; and(b) Hormonal and nonhormonal family planning methods.(3) A midwife licensed under this chapter who has been granted an additional license extension to include medical devices and implants by the secretary may prescribe, obtain, and administer hormonal and nonhormonal family planning medical devices, as prescribed in rule.(4) The secretary, after collaboration with representatives of the midwifery advisory committee, the pharmacy quality assurance commission, and the Washington medical commission, may adopt rules that authorize licensed midwives to prescribe, obtain, and administer legend drugs and devices in addition to the drugs authorized in this chapter.Sec. 34. RCW 18.57.040 and 2025 c 58 s 5073 are each amended to read as follows:Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit:(1) Service in the case of emergency;(2) The domestic administration of family remedies;(3) The practice of midwifery as permitted under chapter 18.50 RCW;(4) The practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery by any commissioned medical officer in the United States government or military service or by any osteopathic physician and surgeon employed by a federal agency, in the discharge of his or her official duties;(5) Practice by a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW when engaged exclusively in the practice of dentistry;(6) The consultation through telemedicine or other means by a practitioner, licensed by another state or territory in which he or she resides, with a practitioner licensed in this state who has responsibility for the diagnosis and treatment of the patient within this state;(7) In-person practice by any osteopathic physician and surgeon from any other state or territory in which he or she resides: PROVIDED, That such practitioner shall not open an office or appoint a place of meeting patients or receive calls within the limits of this state;(8) Practice by a person who is a student enrolled in an accredited school of osteopathic medicine and surgery approved by the board if:(a) The performance of such services is only pursuant to a course of instruction or assignments from his or her instructor or school, and such services are performed only under the supervision of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW; or(b)(i) Such services are performed without compensation or expectation of compensation as part of a volunteer activity;(ii) The student is under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW, a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter, or a registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;(iii) The services the student performs are within the scope of practice of:Â (A) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter; and (B) the person supervising the student;(iv) The school in which the student is enrolled verifies the student has demonstrated competency through his or her education and training to perform the services; and(v) The student provides proof of current malpractice insurance to the volunteer activity organizer prior to performing any services;(9) Practice by an osteopathic physician and surgeon serving a period of clinical postgraduate medical training in a postgraduate program approved by the board: PROVIDED, That the performance of such services be only pursuant to a course of instruction in said program, and said services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW; or(10) Practice by a person who is enrolled in a physician ((assistant))associate program approved by the board who is performing such services only pursuant to a course of instruction in said program: PROVIDED, That such services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW.This chapter shall not be construed to apply in any manner to any other system or method of treating the sick or afflicted or to apply to or interfere in any way with the practice of religion or any kind of treatment by prayer.Sec. 35. RCW 18.59.100 and 2025 c 58 s 5074 are each amended to read as follows:An occupational therapist shall, after evaluating a patient and if the case is a medical one, refer the case to a physician for appropriate medical direction if such direction is lacking. Treatment by an occupational therapist of such a medical case may take place only upon the referral of a physician, osteopathic physician, podiatric physician and surgeon, naturopath, chiropractor, physician ((assistant))associate, psychologist, optometrist, or advanced practice registered nurse licensed to practice in this state.Sec. 36. RCW 18.71.015 and 2022 c 240 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington medical commission is established, consisting of thirteen individuals licensed to practice medicine in the state of Washington under this chapter, two individuals who are licensed in the state of Washington as physician ((assistants))associates under chapter 18.71A RCW, and six individuals who are members of the public. At least two of the public members shall not be from the health care industry. Each congressional district now existing or hereafter created in the state must be represented by at least one physician member of the commission. The terms of office of members of the commission are not affected by changes in congressional district boundaries. Public members of the commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the commission, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health services regulated by the commission.The members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor, and all terms of appointment shall be for four years. The governor shall consider such physician and physician ((assistant))associate members who are recommended for appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the state. No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Each member shall hold office until a successor is appointed.Each member of the commission must be an actual resident of this state, and, if a physician or physician ((assistant))associate, must have been licensed to practice medicine in this state for at least five years.The commission shall meet as soon as practicable after appointment and elect officers each year. Meetings shall be held at least four times a year and at such place as the commission determines and at such other times and places as the commission deems necessary. A majority of the commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business.The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is required to carry any motion or resolution, to adopt any rule, or to pass any measure. The commission may appoint panels consisting of at least three members. A quorum for the transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business delegated to it by the commission.Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and in addition thereto shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the commission in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Any such expenses shall be paid from funds appropriated to the department of health.Whenever the governor is satisfied that a member of a commission has been guilty of neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a certified copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office address of the member.Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.The members of the commission are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal, based on its disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good faith as members of the commission.Whenever the workload of the commission requires, the commission may request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members of the commission. When serving, pro tempore members of the commission have all of the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to all of the emoluments, including travel expenses, of regularly appointed members of the commission.Sec. 37. RCW 18.71.030 and 2025 c 58 s 5077 are each amended to read as follows:Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to or interfere in any way with the practice of religion or any kind of treatment by prayer; nor shall anything in this chapter be construed to prohibit:(1) The furnishing of medical assistance in cases of emergency requiring immediate attention;(2) The domestic administration of family remedies;(3) The administration of oral medication of any nature to students by public school district employees or private elementary or secondary school employees as provided for in chapter 28A.210 RCW;(4) The practice of dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, nursing, chiropractic, podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry, naturopathy, or any other healing art licensed under the methods or means permitted by such license;(5) The practice of medicine in this state by any commissioned medical officer serving in the armed forces of the United States or public health service or any medical officer on duty with the United States veterans administration while such medical officer is engaged in the performance of the duties prescribed for him or her by the laws and regulations of the United States;(6) The consultation through telemedicine or other means by a practitioner, licensed by another state or territory in which he or she resides, with a practitioner licensed in this state who has responsibility for the diagnosis and treatment of the patient within this state;(7) The in-person practice of medicine by any practitioner licensed by another state or territory in which he or she resides, provided that such practitioner shall not open an office or appoint a place of meeting patients or receiving calls within this state;(8) The practice of medicine by a person who is a regular student in a school of medicine approved and accredited by the commission if:(a) The performance of such services is only pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from his or her instructor; or(b) Such services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter; or(c)(i) Such services are performed without compensation or expectation of compensation as part of a volunteer activity;(ii) The student is under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, or a registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;(iii) The services the student performs are within the scope of practice of: (A) A physician licensed under this chapter; and (B) the person supervising the student;(iv) The school in which the student is enrolled verifies the student has demonstrated competency through his or her education and training to perform the services; and(v) The student provides proof of current malpractice insurance to the volunteer activity organizer prior to performing any services;(9) The practice of medicine by a person serving a period of postgraduate medical training in a program of clinical medical training sponsored by a college or university in this state or by a hospital accredited in this state, however, the performance of such services shall be only pursuant to his or her duties as a trainee;(10) The practice of medicine by a person who is regularly enrolled in a physician ((assistant))associate program approved by the commission, however, the performance of such services shall be only pursuant to a regular course of instruction in said program and such services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter;(11) The practice of medicine by a licensed physician ((assistant))associate which practice is performed under the supervision of or in collaboration with a physician licensed pursuant to this chapter;(12) The practice of medicine, in any part of this state which shares a common border with Canada and which is surrounded on three sides by water, by a physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery in Canada or any province or territory thereof;(13) The administration of nondental anesthesia by a dentist who has completed a residency in anesthesiology at a school of medicine approved by the commission, however, a dentist allowed to administer nondental anesthesia shall do so only under authorization of the patient's attending surgeon, obstetrician, or psychiatrist, and the commission has jurisdiction to discipline a dentist practicing under this exemption and enjoin or suspend such dentist from the practice of nondental anesthesia according to this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW;(14) Emergency lifesaving service rendered by a physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician and paramedic, as defined in RCW 18.71.200, if the emergency lifesaving service is rendered under the responsible supervision and control of a licensed physician;(15) The provision of clean, intermittent bladder catheterization for students by public school district employees or private school employees as provided for in RCW 18.79.290 and 28A.210.280.Sec. 38. RCW 18.71.310 and 2024 c 15 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The commission shall enter into a contract with the entity to implement a physician health program. The commission may enter into a contract with the entity for up to six years in length. The physician health program may include any or all of the following:(a) Entering into relationships supportive of the physician health program with professionals who provide either evaluation or treatment services, or both;(b) Receiving and assessing reports of suspected impairment from any source;(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment, or in cases where there is reasonable cause to suspect impairment;(d) Upon reasonable cause, referring suspected or verified impaired physicians for evaluation or treatment;(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of participants including those ordered by the commission;(f) Providing monitoring and care management support of program participants;(g) Performing such other activities as agreed upon by the commission and the entity; and(h) Providing prevention and education services.(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section shall be financed by a surcharge of $70 per year or equivalent on each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the department of health from every physician, surgeon, and physician ((assistant))associate licensed under this chapter in addition to other license fees. These moneys shall be placed in the impaired physician account to be used solely to support the physician health program.(3) All funds in the impaired physician account shall be paid to the contract entity within sixty days of deposit.Sec. 39. RCW 18.71.315 and 2022 c 43 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:The impaired physician account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 18.71.310 from license surcharges on physicians and physician ((assistants))associates shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the physician health program under this chapter. Only the secretary of health or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. No appropriation is required for expenditures from this account.Sec. 40. RCW 18.71.360 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 334 are each amended to read as follows:To assist in identifying impairment related to alcohol abuse, the commission may obtain a copy of the driving record of a physician or a physician ((assistant))associate maintained by the department of licensing.Sec. 41. RCW 18.71C.010 and 2024 c 53 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:In this compact:(1) "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action permitted by a state's laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against a physician assistant license or license application or compact privilege such as license denial, censure, revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, or restriction on the licensee's practice.(2) "Compact privilege" means the authorization granted by a remote state to allow a licensee from another participating state to practice as a physician assistant to provide medical services and other licensed activity to a patient located in the remote state under the remote state's laws and regulations.(3) "Conviction" means a finding by a court that an individual is guilty of a felony or misdemeanor offense through adjudication or entry of a plea of guilt or no contest to the charge by the offender.(4) "Criminal background check" means the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information for a license applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant's criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. Sec. 20.3(d), from the state's criminal history record repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. Sec. 20.3(f).(5) "Data system" means the repository of information about licensees, including but not limited to license status and adverse actions, which is created and administered under the terms of this compact.(6) "Executive committee" means a group of directors and ex officio individuals elected or appointed pursuant to RCW 18.71C.060(6)(b).(7) "Impaired practitioner" means a physician assistant whose practice is adversely affected by health-related condition(s) that impact their ability to practice.(8) "Investigative information" means information, records, or documents received or generated by a licensing board pursuant to an investigation.(9) "Jurisprudence requirement" means the assessment of an individual's knowledge of the laws and rules governing the practice of a physician assistant in a state.(10) "License" means current authorization by a state, other than authorization pursuant to a compact privilege, for a physician assistant to provide medical services, which would be unlawful without current authorization.(11) "Licensee" means an individual who holds a license from a state to provide medical services as a physician assistant.(12) "Licensing board" means any state entity authorized to license and otherwise regulate physician assistants.(13) "Medical services" means health care services provided for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a health condition, injury, or disease, as defined by a state's laws and regulations.(14) "Model compact" means the model for the physician assistant licensure compact on file with the council of state governments or other entity as designated by the commission.(15) "Participating state" means a state that has enacted this compact.(16) "Physician assistant" means an individual who is licensed as a physician assistant in a state. For purposes of this compact, any other title or status adopted by a state to replace the term "physician assistant" shall be deemed synonymous with "physician assistant" and shall confer the same rights and responsibilities to the licensee under the provisions of this compact at the time of its enactment. For the purposes of applying this compact to persons licensed in Washington, the term "physician assistant" means a physician associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.(17) "Physician assistant licensure compact commission," "compact commission," or "commission" mean the national administrative body created pursuant to RCW 18.71C.060(1).(18) "Qualifying license" means an unrestricted license issued by a participating state to provide medical services as a physician assistant.(19) "Remote state" means a participating state where a licensee who is not licensed as a physician assistant is exercising or seeking to exercise the compact privilege.(20) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the force and effect of law.(21) "Significant investigative information" means investigative information that a licensing board, after an inquiry or investigation that includes notification and an opportunity for the physician assistant to respond if required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proven true, would indicate more than a minor infraction.(22) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States.Sec. 42. RCW 18.79.040 and 2024 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) "Registered nursing practice" means the performance of acts requiring substantial specialized knowledge, judgment, and skill based on the principles of the biological, physiological, behavioral, and sociological sciences in either:(a) The observation, assessment, diagnosis, care or counsel, and health teaching of individuals with illnesses, injuries, or disabilities, or in the maintenance of health or prevention of illness of others;(b) The performance of such additional acts requiring education and training and that are recognized by the medical and nursing professions as proper and recognized by the board to be performed by registered nurses licensed under this chapter and that are authorized by the board through its rules;(c) The administration, supervision, delegation, and evaluation of nursing practice. However, nothing in this subsection affects the authority of a hospital, hospital district, in-home service agency, community-based care setting, medical clinic, or office, concerning its administration and supervision;(d) The teaching of nursing;(e) The executing of medical regimen as prescribed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and surgeon, podiatric physician and surgeon, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse, or as directed by a licensed midwife within his or her scope of practice.(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a person from practicing a profession for which a license has been issued under the laws of this state or specifically authorized by any other law of the state of Washington.(3) This section does not prohibit (a) the nursing care of the sick, without compensation, by an unlicensed person who does not hold himself or herself out to be a registered nurse, (b) the practice of licensed practical nursing by a licensed practical nurse, or (c) the practice of a nursing assistant, providing delegated nursing tasks under chapter 18.88A RCW.Sec. 43. RCW 18.79.060 and 2024 c 239 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:"Licensed practical nursing practice" means the performance of services requiring the knowledge, skill, and judgment necessary for carrying out selected aspects of the designated nursing regimen under the direction and supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and surgeon, physician ((assistant))associate, podiatric physician and surgeon, advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, or midwife.Nothing in this section prohibits a person from practicing a profession for which a license has been issued under the laws of this state or specifically authorized by any other law of the state of Washington.This section does not prohibit the nursing care of the sick, without compensation, by an unlicensed person who does not hold himself or herself out to be a licensed practical nurse.Sec. 44. RCW 18.79.260 and 2024 c 239 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A registered nurse under his or her license may perform for compensation nursing care, as that term is usually understood, to individuals with illnesses, injuries, or disabilities.(2) A registered nurse may, at or under the general direction of a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and surgeon, naturopathic physician, optometrist, podiatric physician and surgeon, physician ((assistant))associate, advanced practice registered nurse, or midwife acting within the scope of his or her license, administer medications, treatments, tests, and inoculations, whether or not the severing or penetrating of tissues is involved and whether or not a degree of independent judgment and skill is required. Such direction must be for acts which are within the scope of registered nursing practice.(3) A registered nurse may delegate tasks of nursing care to other individuals where the registered nurse determines that it is in the best interest of the patient.(a) The delegating nurse shall:(i) Determine the competency of the individual to perform the tasks;(ii) Evaluate the appropriateness of the delegation;(iii) Supervise the actions of the person performing the delegated task; and(iv) Delegate only those tasks that are within the registered nurse's scope of practice.(b) A registered nurse, working for a home health or hospice agency regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW, may delegate the application, instillation, or insertion of medications to a registered or certified nursing assistant under a plan of care.(c) Except as authorized in (b) or (e) of this subsection, a registered nurse may not delegate the administration of medications. Except as authorized in (e) or (f) of this subsection, a registered nurse may not delegate acts requiring substantial skill, and may not delegate piercing or severing of tissues. Acts that require nursing judgment shall not be delegated.(d) No person may coerce a nurse into compromising patient safety by requiring the nurse to delegate if the nurse determines that it is inappropriate to do so. Nurses shall not be subject to any employer reprisal or disciplinary action by the board for refusing to delegate tasks or refusing to provide the required training for delegation if the nurse determines delegation may compromise patient safety.(e) For delegation in community-based care settings or in-home care settings, a registered nurse may delegate nursing care tasks only to registered or certified nursing assistants under chapter 18.88A RCW or home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW. Simple care tasks such as blood pressure monitoring, personal care service, diabetic insulin device set up, verbal verification of insulin dosage for sight-impaired individuals, or other tasks as defined by the board are exempted from this requirement.(i) "Community-based care settings" includes: Community residential programs for people with developmental disabilities, certified by the department of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities.(ii) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of temporary or permanent residence, but does not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care settings as defined in (e)(i) of this subsection.(iii) Delegation of nursing care tasks in community-based care settings and in-home care settings is only allowed for individuals who have a stable and predictable condition. "Stable and predictable condition" means a situation in which the individual's clinical and behavioral status is known and does not require the frequent presence and evaluation of a registered nurse.(iv) The determination of the appropriateness of delegation of a nursing task is at the discretion of the registered nurse. Other than delegation of the administration of insulin by injection for the purpose of caring for individuals with diabetes, the administration of medications by injection, sterile procedures, and central line maintenance may never be delegated.(v) When delegating insulin injections under this section, the registered nurse delegator must instruct the individual regarding proper injection procedures and the use of insulin, demonstrate proper injection procedures, and must supervise and evaluate the individual performing the delegated task as required by the board by rule. If the registered nurse delegator determines that the individual is competent to perform the injection properly and safely, supervision and evaluation shall occur at an interval determined by the board by rule.(vi)(A) The registered nurse shall verify that the nursing assistant or home care aide, as the case may be, has completed the required core nurse delegation training required in chapter 18.88A or 18.88B RCW prior to authorizing delegation.(B) Before commencing any specific nursing tasks authorized to be delegated in this section, a home care aide must be certified pursuant to chapter 18.88B RCW and must comply with RCW 18.88B.070.(vii) The nurse is accountable for his or her own individual actions in the delegation process. Nurses acting within the protocols of their delegation authority are immune from liability for any action performed in the course of their delegation duties.(viii) Nursing task delegation protocols are not intended to regulate the settings in which delegation may occur, but are intended to ensure that nursing care services have a consistent standard of practice upon which the public and the profession may rely, and to safeguard the authority of the nurse to make independent professional decisions regarding the delegation of a task.(f) The delegation of nursing care tasks only to registered or certified nursing assistants under chapter 18.88A RCW or to home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW may include glucose monitoring and testing.(g) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.(4) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may instruct nurses in technical subjects pertaining to nursing.(5) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may hold herself or himself out to the public or designate herself or himself as a registered nurse.Sec. 45. RCW 18.79.270 and 2024 c 239 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:A licensed practical nurse under his or her license may perform nursing care, as that term is usually understood, of the ill, injured, or infirm, and in the course thereof may, under the direction of a licensed physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, dentist, naturopathic physician, podiatric physician and surgeon, physician ((assistant))associate, advanced practice registered nurse, or midwife acting under the scope of his or her license, or at the direction and under the supervision of a registered nurse, administer drugs, medications, treatments, tests, injections, and inoculations, whether or not the piercing of tissues is involved and whether or not a degree of independent judgment and skill is required, when selected to do so by one of the licensed practitioners designated in this section, or by a registered nurse who need not be physically present; if the order given is reduced to writing within a reasonable time and made a part of the patient's record. Such direction must be for acts within the scope of licensed practical nurse practice.Sec. 46. RCW 18.89.020 and 2025 c 58 s 5079 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Department" means the department of health.(2) "Direct supervision" means a health care practitioner is continuously on-site and physically present in the treatment operatory while the procedures are performed by the respiratory care practitioner.(3) "Health care practitioner" means:(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;(b) An osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; or(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, or a physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.(4) "Respiratory care practitioner" means an individual licensed under this chapter.(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.Sec. 47. RCW 18.130.020 and 2025 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Board" means any of those boards specified in RCW 18.130.040.(2) "Clinical expertise" means the proficiency or judgment that a license holder in a particular profession acquires through clinical experience or clinical practice and that is not possessed by a lay person.(3) "Commission" means any of the commissions specified in RCW 18.130.040.(4)(a) "Conversion therapy" means a regime that seeks to change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity. The term includes efforts to change behaviors or gender expressions, or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or feelings toward individuals of the same sex. The term includes, but is not limited to, practices commonly referred to as "reparative therapy."(b) "Conversion therapy" does not include counseling or psychotherapies that provide acceptance, support, and understanding of clients or the facilitation of clients' coping, social support, and identity exploration and development that do not seek to change sexual orientation or gender identity.(5) "Department" means the department of health.(6) "Disciplinary action" means sanctions identified in RCW 18.130.160.(7) "Disciplining authority" means the agency, board, or commission having the authority to take disciplinary action against a holder of, or applicant for, a professional or business license upon a finding of a violation of this chapter or a chapter specified under RCW 18.130.040.(8) "Health agency" means city and county health departments and the department of health.(9) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" shall be deemed equivalent to the terms "license," "licensing," "licensure," "certificate," "certification," and "registration" as those terms are defined in RCW 18.120.020.(10)(a) "Physician well-being program" means a formal program established for the purpose of addressing issues related to career fatigue and well-being in physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, osteopathic physicians and surgeons licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, physicians licensed under chapter 18.71B RCW, and physician ((assistants))associates licensed under chapters 18.71A and 18.71C RCW, that:(i) Uses one-on-one, peer-to-peer interactions and connects participants to physical and behavioral health resources and professional supports when appropriate;(ii) Is limited to no more than three sessions per participant every 12 months;(iii) May include discussions pertaining to general career fatigue and well-being arising from the physician's or physician ((assistant's))associate's professional obligations, but not for other purposes such as evaluation of specific care or harm of specific patients, discipline, quality improvement, or the identification and prevention of medical malpractice or misconduct of specific providers;(iv) Is established in writing and contracted for, in advance of any peer-to-peer interactions or referrals, by an employer of physicians and physician ((assistants))associates, a nonprofit professional medical organization representing a specialty of physicians, or a statewide organization representing physicians and physician ((assistants))associates;(v) Does not allow as participants any person employed by, or with a financial ownership interest in, the program; and(vi) Does not include the monitoring of physicians or physician ((assistants))associates who may be unable to practice medicine with reasonable skill and safety.(b) A quality improvement plan established under RCW 43.70.510 or 70.41.200 is not a physician well-being program for purposes of this section. RCW 43.70.510 and 70.41.200 therefore do not apply to a physician well-being program established under this section.(11) "Practice review" means an investigative audit of records related to the complaint, without prior identification of specific patient or consumer names, or an assessment of the conditions, circumstances, and methods of the professional's practice related to the complaint, to determine whether unprofessional conduct may have been committed.(12) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.(13) "Standards of practice" means the care, skill, and learning associated with the practice of a profession.(14) "Unlicensed practice" means:(a) Practicing a profession or operating a business identified in RCW 18.130.040 without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, and unsuspended license to do so; or(b) Representing to a consumer, through offerings, advertisements, or use of a professional title or designation, that the individual is qualified to practice a profession or operate a business identified in RCW 18.130.040, without holding a valid, unexpired, unrevoked, and unsuspended license to do so.Sec. 48. RCW 18.130.410 and 2025 c 58 s 5080 are each amended to read as follows:It is not professional misconduct for a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW; or medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-phlebotomist, or forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, or person holding another credential under Title 18 RCW whose scope of practice includes performing venous blood draws, or hospital, or duly licensed clinical laboratory employing or utilizing services of such licensed or certified health care provider, to collect a blood sample without a person's consent when the physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW; or medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-phlebotomist, or forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, or person holding another credential under Title 18 RCW whose scope of practice includes performing venous blood draws, or hospital, or duly licensed clinical laboratory employing or utilizing services of such licensed or certified health care provider withdrawing blood was directed by a law enforcement officer to do so for the purpose of a blood test under the provisions of a search warrant or exigent circumstances: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section shall relieve a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW; or medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-phlebotomist, or forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, or person holding another credential under Title 18 RCW whose scope of practice includes performing venous blood draws, or hospital, or duly licensed clinical laboratory employing or utilizing services of such licensed or certified health care provider withdrawing blood from professional discipline arising from the use of improper procedures or from failing to exercise the required standard of care.Sec. 49. RCW 18.134.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5081 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Disciplining authority" means an entity to which a state has granted the authority to license, certify, or discipline individuals who provide health care.(2) "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.(3) "Health care" means care, treatment, or a service or procedure, to maintain, monitor, diagnose, or otherwise affect an individual's physical or behavioral health, injury, or condition.(4)(a) "Health care practitioner" means:(i) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;(ii) An osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW;(iii) A podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW;(iv) An advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;(v) A naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;(vi) A physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; or(vii) A person who is otherwise authorized to practice a profession regulated under the authority of RCW 18.130.040 to provide health care in this state, to the extent the profession's scope of practice includes health care that can be provided through telehealth.(b) "Health care practitioner" does not include a veterinarian licensed under chapter 18.92 RCW.(5) "Professional practice standard" includes:(a) A standard of care;(b) A standard of professional ethics; and(c) A practice requirement imposed by a disciplining authority.(6) "Scope of practice" means the extent of a health care practitioner's authority to provide health care.(7) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any other territory or possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe.(8) "Telecommunication technology" means technology that supports communication through electronic means. The term is not limited to regulated technology or technology associated with a regulated industry.(9) "Telehealth" includes telemedicine and means the use of synchronous or asynchronous telecommunication technology by a practitioner to provide health care to a patient at a different physical location than the practitioner. "Telehealth" does not include the use, in isolation, of email, instant messaging, text messaging, or fax.(10) "Telehealth services" means health care provided through telehealth.Sec. 50. RCW 18.250.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5083 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Athlete" means a person who participates in exercise, recreation, activities, sport, or games requiring physical strength, range-of-motion, flexibility, body awareness and control, speed, stamina, or agility, and the exercise, recreation, activities, sports, or games are of a type conducted for the benefits of health and wellness in association with an educational institution or professional, amateur, recreational sports club or organization, hospital, or industrial-based organization.(2) "Athletic injury" means an injury or condition sustained by an athlete that affects the person's participation or performance in exercise, recreation, activities, sport, or games and the injury or condition is within the professional preparation and education of an athletic trainer.(3) "Athletic trainer" means a health care provider who is licensed under this chapter. An athletic trainer can practice athletic training through the consultation, referral, or guidelines of a licensed health care provider as defined in subsection (7) of this section working within their scope of practice.(4)(a) "Athletic training" means the application of the following principles and methods as provided by a licensed athletic trainer:(i) Risk management and prevention of athletic injuries through preactivity screening and evaluation, educational programs, physical conditioning and reconditioning programs, application of commercial products, use of protective equipment, promotion of healthy behaviors, and reduction of environmental risks;(ii) Recognition, evaluation, and assessment of athletic injuries by obtaining a history of the athletic injury, inspection and palpation of the injured part and associated structures, and performance of specific testing techniques related to stability and function to determine the extent of an injury;(iii) Immediate care of athletic injuries, including emergency medical situations through the application of first-aid and emergency procedures and techniques for nonlife-threatening or life-threatening athletic injuries;(iv) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of athletic injuries through the application of physical agents and modalities, therapeutic activities and exercise, standard reassessment techniques and procedures, commercial products, and educational programs, in accordance with guidelines established with a licensed health care provider as provided in RCW 18.250.070;(v) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of work-related injuries through the application of physical agents and modalities, therapeutic activities and exercise, standard reassessment techniques and procedures, commercial products, and educational programs, under the direct supervision of and in accordance with a plan of care for an individual worker established by a provider authorized to provide physical medicine and rehabilitation services for injured workers; and(vi) Referral of an athlete to an appropriately licensed health care provider if the athletic injury requires further definitive care or the injury or condition is outside an athletic trainer's scope of practice, in accordance with RCW 18.250.070.(b) "Athletic training" does not include:(i) The use of spinal adjustment or manipulative mobilization of the spine and its immediate articulations;(ii) Orthotic or prosthetic services with the exception of evaluation, measurement, fitting, and adjustment of temporary, prefabricated or direct-formed orthosis as defined in chapter 18.200 RCW;(iii) The practice of occupational therapy as defined in chapter 18.59 RCW;(iv) The practice of acupuncture and Eastern medicine as defined in chapter 18.06 RCW;(v) Any medical diagnosis; and(vi) Prescribing legend drugs or controlled substances, or surgery.(5) "Committee" means the athletic training advisory committee.(6) "Department" means the department of health.(7) "Licensed health care provider" means a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, osteopathic physician, advanced practice registered nurse, naturopath, physical therapist, chiropractor, dentist, massage therapist, acupuncturist, occupational therapist, or podiatric physician and surgeon.(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.Sec. 51. RCW 18.360.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5084 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Administer" means the retrieval of medication, and its application to a patient, as authorized in RCW 18.360.050.(2) "Delegation" means direct authorization granted by a licensed health care practitioner to a medical assistant to perform the functions authorized in this chapter which fall within the scope of practice of the health care provider and the training and experience of the medical assistant.(3) "Department" means the department of health.(4) "Forensic phlebotomist" means a police officer, law enforcement officer, or employee of a correctional facility or detention facility, who is certified under this chapter and meets any additional training and proficiency standards of his or her employer to collect a venous blood sample for forensic testing pursuant to a search warrant, a waiver of the warrant requirement, or exigent circumstances.(5) "Health care practitioner" means:(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;(b) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; or(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, a registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW.(6) "Medical assistant-certified" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who assists a health care practitioner with patient care, executes administrative and clinical procedures, and performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of the health care practitioner.(7) "Medical assistant-EMT" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner and holds: An emergency medical technician certification under RCW 18.73.081; an advanced emergency medical technician certification under RCW 18.71.205; or a paramedic certification under RCW 18.71.205.(8) "Medical assistant-hemodialysis technician" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs hemodialysis and other functions pursuant to RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner.(9) "Medical assistant-phlebotomist" means a person certified under RCW 18.360.040 who performs capillary, venous, and arterial invasive procedures for blood withdrawal and other functions pursuant to RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of a health care practitioner.(10) "Medical assistant-registered" means a person registered under RCW 18.360.040 who, pursuant to an endorsement by a health care practitioner, clinic, or group practice, assists a health care practitioner with patient care, executes administrative and clinical procedures, and performs functions as provided in RCW 18.360.050 under the supervision of the health care practitioner.(11) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.(12)(a) "Supervision" means supervision of procedures permitted pursuant to this chapter by a health care practitioner who is physically present and is immediately available in the facility, except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection.(b) The health care practitioner does not need to be present during procedures to withdraw blood, administer vaccines, or obtain specimens for or perform diagnostic testing, but must be immediately available.(c)(i) During a telemedicine visit, supervision over a medical assistant assisting a health care practitioner with the telemedicine visit may be provided through interactive audio and video telemedicine technology.(ii) When administering intramuscular injections for the purposes of treating a known or suspected syphilis infection in accordance with RCW 18.360.050, a medical assistant-certified or medical assistant-registered may be supervised through interactive audio or video telemedicine technology.Sec. 52. RCW 28A.210.090 and 2025 c 58 s 5086 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any child shall be exempt in whole or in part from the immunization measures required by RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170 upon the presentation of any one or more of the certifications required by this section, on a form prescribed by the department of health:(a) A written certification signed by a health care practitioner that a particular vaccine required by rule of the state board of health is, in his or her judgment, not advisable for the child: PROVIDED, That when it is determined that this particular vaccine is no longer contraindicated, the child will be required to have the vaccine;(b) A written certification signed by any parent or legal guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child that the religious beliefs of the signator are contrary to the required immunization measures; or(c) A written certification signed by any parent or legal guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child that the signator has either a philosophical or personal objection to the immunization of the child. A philosophical or personal objection may not be used to exempt a child from the measles, mumps, and rubella vaccine.(2)(a) The form presented on or after July 22, 2011, must include a statement to be signed by a health care practitioner stating that he or she provided the signator with information about the benefits and risks of immunization to the child. The form may be signed by a health care practitioner at any time prior to the enrollment of the child in a school or licensed day care. Photocopies of the signed form or a letter from the health care practitioner referencing the child's name shall be accepted in lieu of the original form.(b) A health care practitioner who, in good faith, signs the statement provided for in (a) of this subsection is immune from civil liability for providing the signature.(c) Any parent or legal guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child who exempts the child due to religious beliefs pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section is not required to have the form provided for in (a) of this subsection signed by a health care practitioner if the parent or legal guardian demonstrates membership in a religious body or a church in which the religious beliefs or teachings of the church preclude a health care practitioner from providing medical treatment to the child.(3) For purposes of this section, "health care practitioner" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.Sec. 53. RCW 41.05.177 and 2025 c 58 s 5091 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that is not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW and is issued or renewed after December 31, 2006, shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate.(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the health care authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplemental policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.Sec. 54. RCW 41.05.180 and 2025 c 58 s 5092 are each amended to read as follows:Each health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under this chapter that is not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW and is established or renewed after January 1, 1990, and that provides benefits for hospital or medical care shall provide benefits for screening or diagnostic mammography services, provided that such services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or advanced practice registered nurse as authorized by the state board of nursing pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician ((assistant))associate pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard health plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the state health care authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of mammography services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.Sec. 55. RCW 43.70.110 and 2025 c 19 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The secretary shall charge fees to the licensee for obtaining a license. Physicians regulated pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW who reside and practice in Washington and obtain or renew a retired active license are exempt from such fees. Municipal corporations providing emergency medical care and transportation services pursuant to chapter 18.73 RCW shall be exempt from such fees, provided that such other emergency services shall only be charged for their pro rata share of the cost of licensure and inspection, if appropriate. The secretary may charge different fees for registered nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, and nurses who hold a valid multistate license issued by the state of Washington under chapter 18.80 RCW. The secretary may waive the fees when, in the discretion of the secretary, the fees would not be in the best interest of public health and safety, or when the fees would be to the financial disadvantage of the state.(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, fees charged shall be based on, but shall not exceed, the cost to the department for the licensure of the activity or class of activities and may include costs of necessary inspection.(3) License fees shall include amounts in addition to the cost of licensure activities in the following circumstances:(a) For registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, and for nurses who hold a valid multistate license issued by the state of Washington under chapter 18.80 RCW, support of a central nursing resource center as provided in RCW 18.79.202;(b) For all health care providers licensed under RCW 18.130.040, the cost of regulatory activities for retired volunteer medical worker licensees as provided in RCW 18.130.360; and(c) For physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, physician ((assistants))associates licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, osteopathic physicians licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, podiatrists licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, chiropractors licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW, psychologists and psychological associates licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW, registered nurses and licensed practical nurses licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, nurses who hold a valid multistate license issued by the state of Washington under chapter 18.80 RCW, optometrists licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW, mental health counselors and mental health counselor associates licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, massage therapists licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW, advanced social workers licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, independent clinical social workers and independent clinical social worker associates licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW, marriage and family therapists and marriage and family therapist associates licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW, occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW, dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW, speech-language pathologists licensed under chapter 18.35 RCW, acupuncturists or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW, and veterinarians and veterinary technicians licensed under chapter 18.92 RCW, the license fees shall include up to an additional twenty-five dollars to be transferred by the department to the University of Washington for the purposes of RCW 43.70.112.(4) Department of health advisory committees may review fees established by the secretary for licenses and comment upon the appropriateness of the level of such fees.Sec. 56. RCW 43.70.442 and 2025 c 58 s 5094 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Each of the following professionals certified or licensed under Title 18 RCW shall, at least once every six years, complete training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved, in rule, by the relevant disciplining authority:(i) An adviser or counselor certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;(ii) A substance use disorder professional licensed under chapter 18.205 RCW;(iii) A marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(iv) A mental health counselor licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW;(v) An occupational therapy practitioner licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW;(vi) A psychologist licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW;(vii) An advanced social worker or independent clinical social worker licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW; and(viii) A social worker associateâadvanced or social worker associateâindependent clinical licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.(b) The requirements in (a) of this subsection apply to a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions in (a) of this subsection.(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (1)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection:(i) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section must complete the first training required by this section by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2014, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure or certification, whichever occurs later.(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, the second training for a psychologist, a marriage and family therapist, a mental health counselor, an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a social worker associate-advanced, or a social worker associate-independent clinical must be either: (A) An advanced training focused on suicide management, suicide care protocols, or effective treatments; or (B) a training in a treatment modality shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal, including dialectical behavior therapy, collaborative assessment and management of suicide risk, or cognitive behavior therapy-suicide prevention. If a professional subject to the requirements of this subsection has already completed the professional's second training prior to July 1, 2021, the professional's next training must comply with this subsection. This subsection (2)(a)(ii) does not apply if the licensee demonstrates that the training required by this subsection (2)(a)(ii) is not reasonably available.(b)(i) A professional listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section applying for initial licensure may delay completion of the first training required by this section for six years after initial licensure if he or she can demonstrate successful completion of the training required in subsection (1) of this section no more than six years prior to the application for initial licensure.(ii) Beginning July 1, 2021, a psychologist, a marriage and family therapist, a mental health counselor, an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a social worker associate-advanced, or a social worker associate-independent clinical exempt from his or her first training under (b)(i) of this subsection must comply with the requirements of (a)(ii) of this subsection for his or her first training after initial licensure. If a professional subject to the requirements of this subsection has already completed the professional's first training after initial licensure, the professional's next training must comply with this subsection (2)(b)(ii). This subsection (2)(b)(ii) does not apply if the licensee demonstrates that the training required by this subsection (2)(b)(ii) is not reasonably available.(3) The hours spent completing training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management under this section count toward meeting any applicable continuing education or continuing competency requirements for each profession.(4)(a) A disciplining authority may, by rule, specify minimum training and experience that is sufficient to exempt an individual professional from the training requirements in subsections (1) and (5) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (4)(a) allows a disciplining authority to provide blanket exemptions to broad categories or specialties within a profession.(b) A disciplining authority may exempt a professional from the training requirements of subsections (1) and (5) of this section if the professional has only brief or limited patient contact.(5)(a) Each of the following professionals credentialed under Title 18 RCW shall complete a one-time training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management that is approved by the relevant disciplining authority:(i) A chiropractor licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW;(ii) A naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;(iii) A licensed practical nurse, registered nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse, other than a certified registered nurse anesthetist, licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;(iv) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, other than a holder of a postgraduate osteopathic medicine and surgery license issued under RCW 18.57.035;(v) A physical therapist or physical therapist assistant licensed under chapter 18.74 RCW;(vi) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, other than a resident holding a limited license issued under RCW 18.71.095(3);(vii) A physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW;(viii) A pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW;(ix) A dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW;(x) A dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;(xi) An athletic trainer licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;(xii) An optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW;(xiii) An acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;(xiv) A dental therapist licensed under chapter 18.265 RCW; and(xv) A person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (xiv) of this subsection.(b)(i) A professional listed in (a)(i) through (vii) of this subsection or a person holding a retired active license for one of the professions listed in (a)(i) through (vii) of this subsection must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2016, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between June 12, 2014, and January 1, 2016, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).(ii) A licensed pharmacist or a person holding a retired active pharmacist license must complete the one-time training by the end of the first full continuing education reporting period after January 1, 2017, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later.(iii) A licensed dentist, a licensed dental hygienist, or a person holding a retired active license as a dentist shall complete the one-time training by the end of the full continuing education reporting period after August 1, 2020, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between July 23, 2017, and August 1, 2020, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b)(iii), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).(iv) A licensed optometrist or a licensed acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, or a person holding a retired active license as an optometrist or an acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, shall complete the one-time training by the end of the full continuing education reporting period after August 1, 2021, or during the first full continuing education reporting period after initial licensure, whichever is later. Training completed between August 1, 2020, and August 1, 2021, that meets the requirements of this section, other than the timing requirements of this subsection (5)(b)(iv), must be accepted by the disciplining authority as meeting the one-time training requirement of this subsection (5).(c) The training required by this subsection must be at least six hours in length, unless a disciplining authority has determined, under subsection (10)(b) of this section, that training that includes only screening and referral elements is appropriate for the profession in question, in which case the training must be at least three hours in length.(d) Beginning July 1, 2017, the training required by this subsection must be on the model list developed under subsection (6) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (5)(d) affects the validity of training completed prior to July 1, 2017.(6)(a) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall work collaboratively to develop a model list of training programs in suicide assessment, treatment, and management. Beginning July 1, 2021, for purposes of subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section, the model list must include advanced training and training in treatment modalities shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal.(b) The secretary and the disciplining authorities shall update the list at least once every two years.(c) By June 30, 2016, the department shall adopt rules establishing minimum standards for the training programs included on the model list. The minimum standards must require that six-hour trainings include content specific to veterans and the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means or self-injurious behaviors and that three-hour trainings for pharmacists or dentists include content related to the assessment of issues related to imminent harm via lethal means. By July 1, 2024, the minimum standards must be updated to require that both the six-hour and three-hour trainings include content specific to the availability of and the services offered by the 988 crisis hotline and the behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention system and best practices for assisting persons with accessing the 988 crisis hotline and the system. Beginning September 1, 2024, trainings submitted to the department for review and approval must include the updated information in the minimum standards for the model list as well as all subsequent submissions. When adopting the rules required under this subsection (6)(c), the department shall:(i) Consult with the affected disciplining authorities, public and private institutions of higher education, educators, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, the Washington department of veterans affairs, and affected professional associations; and(ii) Consider standards related to the best practices registry of the American foundation for suicide prevention and the suicide prevention resource center.(d) Beginning January 1, 2017:(i) The model list must include only trainings that meet the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection and any three-hour trainings that met the requirements of this section on or before July 24, 2015;(ii) The model list must include six-hour trainings in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, and three-hour trainings that include only screening and referral elements; and(iii) A person or entity providing the training required in this section may petition the department for inclusion on the model list. The department shall add the training to the list only if the department determines that the training meets the minimum standards established in the rules adopted under (c) of this subsection.(e) By January 1, 2021, the department shall adopt minimum standards for advanced training and training in treatment modalities shown to be effective in working with people who are suicidal. Beginning July 1, 2021, all such training on the model list must meet the minimum standards. When adopting the minimum standards, the department must consult with the affected disciplining authorities, public and private institutions of higher education, educators, experts in suicide assessment, treatment, and management, the Washington department of veterans affairs, and affected professional associations.(7) The department shall provide the health profession training standards created in this section to the professional educator standards board as a model in meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.410.226 and provide technical assistance, as requested, in the review and evaluation of educator training programs. The educator training programs approved by the professional educator standards board may be included in the department's model list.(8) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to expand or limit the scope of practice of any profession regulated under chapter 18.130 RCW.(9) The secretary and the disciplining authorities affected by this section shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.(10) For purposes of this section:(a) "Disciplining authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.130.020.(b) "Training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management" means empirically supported training approved by the appropriate disciplining authority that contains the following elements: Suicide assessment, including screening and referral, suicide treatment, and suicide management. However, the disciplining authority may approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for the profession in question based on the profession's scope of practice. The board of occupational therapy may also approve training that includes only screening and referral elements if appropriate for occupational therapy practitioners based on practice setting.(11) A state or local government employee is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.(12) An employee of a community mental health agency licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW or a chemical dependency program certified under chapter 71.24 RCW is exempt from the requirements of this section if he or she receives a total of at least six hours of training in suicide assessment, treatment, and management from his or her employer every six years. For purposes of this subsection, the training may be provided in one six-hour block or may be spread among shorter training sessions at the employer's discretion.Sec. 57. RCW 43.70.470 and 2025 c 58 s 5095 are each amended to read as follows:The department may establish by rule the conditions of participation in the liability insurance program by retired health care providers at clinics utilizing retired health care providers for the purposes of this section and RCW 43.70.460. These conditions shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(1) The participating health care provider associated with the clinic shall hold a valid license to practice as a physician under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, a naturopath under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician ((assistant))associate under chapter 18.71A RCW, an advanced practice registered nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, or other health professionals as may be deemed in short supply by the department. All health care providers must be in conformity with current requirements for licensure, including continuing education requirements;(2) Health care shall be limited to noninvasive procedures and shall not include obstetrical care. Noninvasive procedures include injections, suturing of minor lacerations, and incisions of boils or superficial abscesses. Primary dental care shall be limited to diagnosis, oral hygiene, restoration, and extractions and shall not include orthodontia, or other specialized care and treatment;(3) The provision of liability insurance coverage shall not extend to acts outside the scope of rendering health care services pursuant to this section and RCW 43.70.460;(4) The participating health care provider shall limit the provision of health care services to primarily low-income persons provided that clinics may, but are not required to, provide means tests for eligibility as a condition for obtaining health care services;(5) The participating health care provider shall not accept compensation for providing health care services from patients served pursuant to this section and RCW 43.70.460, nor from clinics serving these patients. "Compensation" shall mean any remuneration of value to the participating health care provider for services provided by the health care provider, but shall not be construed to include any nominal copayments charged by the clinic, nor reimbursement of related expenses of a participating health care provider authorized by the clinic in advance of being incurred; and(6) The use of mediation or arbitration for resolving questions of potential liability may be used, however any mediation or arbitration agreement format shall be expressed in terms clear enough for a person with a sixth grade level of education to understand, and on a form no longer than one page in length.Sec. 58. RCW 46.19.010 and 2025 c 295 s 1 and 2025 c 58 s 5096 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) A natural person who has a disability that meets one of the following criteria may apply for special parking privileges:(a) Cannot walk 200 feet without stopping to rest;(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition;(c) Has such a severe disability that the person cannot walk without the use of or assistance from a brace, cane, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;(d) Uses portable oxygen;(e) Is restricted by lung disease to an extent that forced expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry, is less than one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than 60 mm/hg on room air at rest;(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as class III or IV under standards accepted by the American heart association;(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to automobile emissions that limits or impairs the ability to walk. The personal physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate of the applicant shall document that the disability is comparable in severity to the others listed in this subsection;(h) Has limited mobility and has no vision or whose vision with corrective lenses is so limited that the person requires alternative methods or skills to do efficiently those things that are ordinarily done with sight by persons with normal vision;(i) Has an eye condition of a progressive nature that may lead to blindness; (j) Is restricted by a form of porphyria to the extent that the applicant would significantly benefit from a decrease in exposure to light; or(k) Is a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, who has a 70 percent or higher disability rating from the United States armed forces or United States department of veterans affairs and uses a service animal as defined in 28 C.F.R. 35.104.(2) The disability in subsection (1)(a) through (j) of this section must be determined by either:(a) A licensed physician;(b) An advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; or(c) A physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.(3) A health care practitioner listed under subsection (2) of this section who is authorizing a parking permit for purposes of this chapter must provide a signed written authorization: On a prescription pad or paper, as defined in RCW 18.64.500; on office letterhead; or by electronic means, as described by the director in rule.Sec. 59. RCW 46.19.010 and 2020 c 80 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A natural person who has a disability that meets one of the following criteria may apply for special parking privileges:(a) Cannot walk ((two hundred))200 feet without stopping to rest;(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition;(c) Has such a severe disability that the person cannot walk without the use of or assistance from a brace, cane, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;(d) Uses portable oxygen;(e) Is restricted by lung disease to an extent that forced expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry, is less than one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than ((sixty))60 mm/hg on room air at rest;(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as class III or IV under standards accepted by the American heart association;(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to automobile emissions that limits or impairs the ability to walk. The personal physician, advanced practice registered nurse ((practitioner)), or physician ((assistant))associate of the applicant shall document that the disability is comparable in severity to the others listed in this subsection;(h) Has limited mobility and has no vision or whose vision with corrective lenses is so limited that the person requires alternative methods or skills to do efficiently those things that are ordinarily done with sight by persons with normal vision;(i) Has an eye condition of a progressive nature that may lead to blindness; or(j) Is restricted by a form of porphyria to the extent that the applicant would significantly benefit from a decrease in exposure to light.(2) The disability must be determined by either:(a) A licensed physician;(b) An advanced practice registered nurse ((practitioner)) licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; or(c) A physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.(3) A health care practitioner listed under subsection (2) of this section who is authorizing a parking permit for purposes of this chapter must provide a signed written authorization: On a prescription pad or paper, as defined in RCW 18.64.500; on office letterhead; or by electronic means, as described by the director in rule.(4) The application for special parking privileges for persons with disabilities must contain:(a) The following statement immediately below the physician's, advanced practice registered nurse's((practitioner's)), or physician ((assistant's))associate's signature: "A parking permit for a person with disabilities may be issued only for a medical necessity that severely affects mobility or involves acute sensitivity to light (RCW 46.19.010). An applicant or health care practitioner who knowingly provides false information on this application is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is up to ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both. In addition, the health care practitioner may be subject to sanctions under chapter 18.130 RCW, the Uniform Disciplinary Act"; and(b) Other information as required by the department.(5) A natural person who has a disability described in subsection (1) of this section and is expected to improve within ((twelve))12 months may be issued a temporary placard for a period not to exceed ((twelve))12 months. If the disability exists after ((twelve))12 months, a new temporary placard must be issued upon receipt of a new application with certification from the person's physician as prescribed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section. Special license plates for persons with disabilities may not be issued to a person with a temporary disability.(6) A natural person who qualifies for special parking privileges under this section must receive an identification card showing the name and date of birth of the person to whom the parking privilege has been issued and the serial number of the placard.(7) A natural person who qualifies for permanent special parking privileges under this section may receive one of the following:(a) Up to two parking placards;(b) One set of special license plates for persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed;(c) One parking placard and one set of special license plates for persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed; or(d) One special parking year tab for persons with disabilities and one parking placard.(8) Parking placards and identification cards described in this section must be issued free of charge.(9) The parking placard and identification card must be immediately returned to the department upon the placard holder's death.Sec. 60. RCW 46.19.080 and 2025 c 295 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The application for special parking privileges for persons with disabilities must contain:(a) The following statement immediately below the physician's, advanced practice registered nurse's((practitioner's)), or physician ((assistant's))associate's signature: "A parking permit for a person with disabilities may be issued only for a medical necessity that severely affects mobility or involves acute sensitivity to light (RCW 46.19.010). An applicant or health care practitioner who knowingly provides false information on this application is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is up to 364 days in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both. In addition, the health care practitioner may be subject to sanctions under chapter 18.130 RCW, the Uniform Disciplinary Act"; and(b) Other information as required by the department.(2) A natural person who has a disability described in RCW 46.19.010(1) and is expected to improve within 12 months may be issued a temporary placard for a period not to exceed 12 months. If the disability exists after 12 months, a new temporary placard must be issued upon receipt of a new application with certification from the person's physician as prescribed in RCW 46.19.010(3) and subsection (1) of this section. Special license plates for persons with disabilities may not be issued to a person with a temporary disability.(3) A natural person or veteran who qualifies for special parking privileges under this section must receive an identification card showing the name and date of birth of the person to whom the parking privilege has been issued and the serial number of the placard.(4) A natural person or veteran who qualifies for permanent special parking privileges under RCW 46.19.010 may receive one of the following:(a) Up to two parking placards;(b) One set of special license plates for persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed;(c) One parking placard and one set of special license plates for persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed; or(d) One special parking year tab for persons with disabilities and one parking placard.(5) Parking placards and identification cards described in this section must be issued free of charge.(6) The parking placard and identification card must be immediately returned to the department upon the placard holder's death.(7) This section expires October 1, 2035.Sec. 61. RCW 46.61.506 and 2025 c 58 s 5097 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any person while driving or in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, if the person's alcohol concentration is less than 0.08 or the person's THC concentration is less than 5.00, it is evidence that may be considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.(2)(a) The breath analysis of the person's alcohol concentration shall be based upon grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath.(b) The blood analysis of the person's THC concentration shall be based upon nanograms per milliliter of whole blood.(c) The foregoing provisions of this section shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether the person was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.(3) Analysis of the person's blood or breath to be considered valid under the provisions of this section or RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall have been performed according to methods approved by the state toxicologist and by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by the state toxicologist for this purpose. The state toxicologist is directed to approve satisfactory techniques or methods, to supervise the examination of individuals to ascertain their qualifications and competence to conduct such analyses, and to issue permits which shall be subject to termination or revocation at the discretion of the state toxicologist.(4)(a) A breath test performed by any instrument approved by the state toxicologist shall be admissible at trial or in an administrative proceeding if the prosecution or department produces prima facie evidence of the following:(i) The person who performed the test was authorized to perform such test by the state toxicologist;(ii) The person being tested did not vomit or have anything to eat, drink, or smoke for at least fifteen minutes prior to administration of the test;(iii) The person being tested did not have any foreign substances, not to include dental work or piercings, fixed or removable, in his or her mouth at the beginning of the fifteen-minute observation period;(iv) Prior to the start of the test, the temperature of any liquid simulator solution utilized as an external standard, as measured by a thermometer approved of by the state toxicologist was thirty-four degrees centigrade plus or minus 0.3 degrees centigrade;(v) The internal standard test resulted in the message "verified";(vi) The two breath samples agree to within plus or minus ten percent of their mean to be determined by the method approved by the state toxicologist;(vii) The result of the test of the liquid simulator solution external standard or dry gas external standard result did lie between .072 to .088 inclusive; and(viii) All blank tests gave results of .000.(b) For purposes of this section, "prima facie evidence" is evidence of sufficient circumstances that would support a logical and reasonable inference of the facts sought to be proved. In assessing whether there is sufficient evidence of the foundational facts, the court or administrative tribunal is to assume the truth of the prosecution's or department's evidence and all reasonable inferences from it in a light most favorable to the prosecution or department.(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent the subject of the test from challenging the reliability or accuracy of the test, the reliability or functioning of the instrument, or any maintenance procedures. Such challenges, however, shall not preclude the admissibility of the test once the prosecution or department has made a prima facie showing of the requirements contained in (a) of this subsection. Instead, such challenges may be considered by the trier of fact in determining what weight to give to the test result.(5) When a blood test is administered under the provisions of RCW 46.20.308, the withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its alcohol or drug content may be performed only by a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; a physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; an advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW; or a medical assistant-certified or medical assistant-phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, a person holding another credential under Title 18 RCW whose scope of practice includes performing venous blood draws, or a forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW. When the blood test is performed outside the state of Washington, the withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its alcohol or drug content may be performed by any person who is authorized by the out-of-state jurisdiction to perform venous blood draws. Proof of qualification to draw blood may be established through the department of health's provider credential search. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath specimens.(6) When a venous blood sample is performed by a forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, it must be done under the following conditions:(a) If taken at the scene, it must be performed in an ambulance or aid service vehicle licensed by the department of health under chapter 18.73 RCW.(b) The collection of blood samples must not interfere with the provision of essential medical care.(c) The blood sample must be collected using sterile equipment and the skin area of puncture must be thoroughly cleansed and disinfected.(d) The person whose blood is collected must be seated, reclined, or lying down when the blood is collected.(7) The person tested may have a licensed or certified health care provider listed in subsection (5) of this section, or a qualified technician, chemist, or other qualified person of his or her own choosing administer one or more tests in addition to any administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. The test will be admissible if the person establishes the general acceptability of the testing technique or method. The failure or inability to obtain an additional test by a person shall not preclude the admission of evidence relating to the test or tests taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer.(8) Upon the request of the person who shall submit to a test or tests at the request of a law enforcement officer, full information concerning the test or tests shall be made available to him or her or his or her attorney.Sec. 62. RCW 46.61.508 and 2025 c 58 s 5098 are each amended to read as follows:No physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW; or medical assistant-certified or medical assistant-phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, person holding another credential under Title 18 RCW whose scope of practice includes performing venous blood draws, or forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, or hospital, or duly licensed clinical laboratory employing or utilizing services of such licensed or certified health care provider, shall incur any civil or criminal liability as a result of the act of withdrawing blood from any person when directed by a law enforcement officer to do so for the purpose of a blood test under the provisions of a search warrant, a waiver of the search warrant requirement, exigent circumstances, or any other authority of law: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section shall relieve such licensed or certified health care provider, hospital or duly licensed clinical laboratory, or forensic phlebotomist from civil liability arising from the use of improper procedures or failing to exercise the required standard of care.Sec. 63. RCW 48.20.392 and 2025 c 58 s 5099 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each disability insurance policy issued or renewed after December 31, 2006, that provides coverage for hospital or medical expenses shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate.(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of an insurer to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplemental policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.Sec. 64. RCW 48.20.393 and 2025 c 58 s 5100 are each amended to read as follows:Each disability insurance policy issued or renewed after January 1, 1990, that provides coverage for hospital or medical expenses shall provide coverage for screening or diagnostic mammography services, provided that such services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or advanced practice registered nurse as authorized by the state board of nursing pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician ((assistant))associate pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard policy provisions, other than the cost-sharing prohibition provided in RCW 48.43.076, that are applicable to other benefits. This section does not limit the authority of an insurer to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of mammography services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.Sec. 65. RCW 48.21.225 and 2025 c 58 s 5101 are each amended to read as follows:Each group disability insurance policy issued or renewed after January 1, 1990, that provides coverage for hospital or medical expenses shall provide coverage for screening or diagnostic mammography services, provided that such services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or advanced practice registered nurse as authorized by the state board of nursing pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician ((assistant))associate pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard policy provisions, other than the cost-sharing prohibition provided in RCW 48.43.076, that are applicable to other benefits. This section does not limit the authority of an insurer to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of mammography services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.Sec. 66. RCW 48.21.227 and 2025 c 58 s 5102 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each group disability insurance policy issued or renewed after December 31, 2006, that provides coverage for hospital or medical expenses shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate.(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of an insurer to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplemental policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.Sec. 67. RCW 48.43.835 and 2024 c 62 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:This chapter authorizes carriers to reimburse employers of physician ((assistants))associates for covered services rendered by licensed physician ((assistants))associates. Payment for services within the physician ((assistant's))associate's scope of practice must be made when ordered or performed by a physician ((assistant))associate if the same services would have been covered if ordered or performed by a physician. Physician ((assistants))associates or their employers, who are billing on behalf of the physician ((assistant))associate, are authorized to bill for and receive direct payment for the services delivered by physician ((assistants))associates. A carrier may not impose a practice, education, or collaboration requirement that is inconsistent with or more restrictive than state laws or regulations governing physician ((assistants))associates.Sec. 68. RCW 48.44.325 and 2025 c 58 s 5106 are each amended to read as follows:Each health care service contract issued or renewed after January 1, 1990, that provides benefits for hospital or medical care shall provide benefits for screening or diagnostic mammography services, provided that such services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or advanced practice registered nurse as authorized by the state board of nursing pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician ((assistant))associate pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard contract provisions, other than the cost-sharing prohibition provided in RCW 48.43.076, that are applicable to other benefits. This section does not limit the authority of a contractor to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of mammography services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.Sec. 69. RCW 48.44.327 and 2025 c 58 s 5107 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each health care service contract issued or renewed after December 31, 2006, that provides coverage for hospital or medical expenses shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate.(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of a contractor to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplemental policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.Sec. 70. RCW 48.46.275 and 2025 c 58 s 5108 are each amended to read as follows:Each health maintenance agreement issued or renewed after January 1, 1990, that provides benefits for hospital or medical care shall provide benefits for screening or diagnostic mammography services, provided that such services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or advanced practice registered nurse as authorized by the state board of nursing pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician ((assistant))associate pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.All services must be provided by the health maintenance organization or rendered upon referral by the health maintenance organization. This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard agreement provisions, other than the cost-sharing prohibition provided in RCW 48.43.076, that are applicable to other benefits. This section does not limit the authority of a health maintenance organization to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of mammography services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.Sec. 71. RCW 48.46.277 and 2025 c 58 s 5109 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each health maintenance agreement issued or renewed after December 31, 2006, that provides coverage for hospital or medical expenses shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate.(2) All services must be provided by the health maintenance organization or rendered upon a referral by the health maintenance organization.(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of a health maintenance organization to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services. This section shall not apply to medicare supplemental policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited benefits.Sec. 72. RCW 48.125.200 and 2025 c 58 s 5110 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement established, operated, providing benefits, or maintained in this state after December 31, 2006, that provides coverage for hospital or medical expenses shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate.(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services.Sec. 73. RCW 51.04.030 and 2025 c 58 s 5112 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The director shall supervise the providing of prompt and efficient care and treatment, including care provided by physician ((assistants))associates governed by the provisions of chapter 18.71A RCW, including chiropractic care, and including care provided by licensed advanced practice registered nurses, to workers injured during the course of their employment at the least cost consistent with promptness and efficiency, without discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity as the various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time, establish and adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms, rules, regulations, and practices for the furnishing of such care and treatment: PROVIDED, That the medical coverage decisions of the department do not constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor are such decisions subject to the rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW except that criteria for establishing medical coverage decisions shall be adopted by rule after consultation with the workers' compensation advisory committee established in RCW 51.04.110: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department may recommend to an injured worker particular health care services and providers where specialized treatment is indicated or where cost-effective payment levels or rates are obtained by the department: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department may enter into contracts for goods and services including, but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as statewide access to quality service is maintained for injured workers.(2) The director shall, in consultation with interested persons, establish and, in his or her discretion, periodically change as may be necessary, and make available a fee schedule of the maximum charges to be made by any physician, surgeon, chiropractor, hospital, druggist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician ((assistants))associates as defined in chapter 18.71A RCW, acting under the supervision of or in coordination with a participating physician, as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, or other agency or person rendering services to injured workers. The department shall coordinate with other state purchasers of health care services to establish as much consistency and uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible, taking into account the unique requirements and differences between programs. No service covered under this title, including services provided to injured workers, whether aliens or other injured workers, who are not residing in the United States at the time of receiving the services, shall be charged or paid at a rate or rates exceeding those specified in such fee schedule, and no contract providing for greater fees shall be valid as to the excess. The establishment of such a schedule, exclusive of conversion factors, does not constitute "agency action" as used in RCW 34.05.010(3), nor does such a fee schedule and its associated billing or payment instructions and policies constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16).(3) The director or self-insurer, as the case may be, shall make a record of the commencement of every disability and the termination thereof and, when bills are rendered for the care and treatment of injured workers, shall approve and pay those which conform to the adopted rules, regulations, established fee schedules, and practices of the director and may reject any bill or item thereof incurred in violation of the principles laid down in this section or the rules, regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and regulations adopted under it.Sec. 74. RCW 51.08.200 and 2023 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:"Attending provider" means a person who is a member of the health care provider network established under RCW 51.36.010, is treating injured workers within the person's scope of practice, and is licensed under Title 18 RCW in one of the following professions: Physicians, chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathy, chapter 18.57 RCW; chiropractic, chapter 18.25 RCW; naturopathy, chapter 18.36A RCW; podiatric medicine and surgery, chapter 18.22 RCW; dentistry, chapter 18.32 RCW; optometry, chapter 18.53 RCW; in the case of claims solely for mental health conditions, psychology, chapter 18.83 RCW; physician ((assistants))associates, chapter 18.71A RCW; and licensed advanced practice registered nurses((practitioners)), chapter 18.79 RCW.Sec. 75. RCW 51.28.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5113 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Whenever any accident occurs to any worker it shall be the duty of such worker or someone in his or her behalf to forthwith report such accident to his or her employer, superintendent, or supervisor in charge of the work, and of the employer to at once report such accident and the injury resulting therefrom to the department pursuant to RCW 51.28.025 where the worker has received treatment from a physician, osteopathic physician, chiropractor, naturopath, podiatric physician, optometrist, dentist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychologist in claims solely for mental health conditions, has been hospitalized, disabled from work, or has died as the apparent result of such accident and injury.(2) Upon receipt of such notice of accident, the department shall immediately forward to the worker or his or her beneficiaries or dependents notification, in nontechnical language, of their rights under this title. The notice must specify the worker's right to receive health services from a provider of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010(2)(a), including chiropractic services under RCW 51.36.015, and must list the types of providers authorized to provide these services.(3) Employers shall not engage in claim suppression.(4) For the purposes of this section, "claim suppression" means intentionally:(a) Inducing employees to fail to report injuries;(b) Inducing employees to treat injuries in the course of employment as off-the-job injuries; or(c) Acting otherwise to suppress legitimate industrial insurance claims.(5) In determining whether an employer has engaged in claim suppression, the department shall consider the employer's history of compliance with industrial insurance reporting requirements, and whether the employer has discouraged employees from reporting injuries or filing claims. The department has the burden of proving claim suppression by a preponderance of the evidence.(6) Claim suppression does not include bona fide workplace safety and accident prevention programs or an employer's provision at the worksite of first aid as defined by the department. The department shall adopt rules defining bona fide workplace safety and accident prevention programs and defining first aid.Sec. 76. RCW 51.28.020 and 2025 c 58 s 5114 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Where a worker is entitled to compensation under this title he or she shall file with the department or his or her self-insured employer, as the case may be, his or her application for such, together with the certificate of the physician, osteopathic physician, chiropractor, naturopath, podiatric physician, optometrist, dentist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychologist in claims solely for mental health conditions, who attended him or her. An application form developed by the department shall include a notice specifying the worker's right to receive health services from a provider of the worker's choice under RCW 51.36.010(2)(a), and listing the types of providers authorized to provide these services.(b) The physician, osteopathic physician, chiropractor, naturopath, podiatric physician, optometrist, dentist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychologist in claims solely for mental health conditions, who attended the injured worker shall inform the injured worker of his or her rights under this title and lend all necessary assistance in making this application for compensation and such proof of other matters as required by the rules of the department without charge to the worker. The department shall provide a manual which outlines the procedures to be followed in applications for compensation involving occupational diseases, and which describes claimants' rights and responsibilities related to occupational disease claims.(2) If the application required by this section is:(a) Made to the department and the employer has not received a copy of the application, the department shall immediately send a copy of the application to the employer; or(b) Made to a self-insured employer, the employer shall forthwith send a copy of the application to the department.(3) The application required by this section may be transmitted to the department electronically.Sec. 77. RCW 51.28.100 and 2024 c 62 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:The department shall accept the signature of a physician ((assistant))associate on any certificate, card, form, or other documentation required by the department that the physician ((assistant's))associate's participating physician or physicians, as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, may sign, provided that it is within the physician ((assistant's))associate's scope of practice, and is consistent with the terms of the physician ((assistant's))associate's collaboration agreement as required by chapter 18.71A RCW. Consistent with the terms of this section, the authority of a physician ((assistant))associate to sign such certificates, cards, forms, or other documentation includes, but is not limited to, the execution of the certificate required in RCW 51.28.020. A physician ((assistant))associate may not rate a worker's permanent partial disability under RCW 51.32.055.Sec. 78. RCW 51.36.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5117 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislature finds that high quality medical treatment and adherence to occupational health best practices can prevent disability and reduce loss of family income for workers, and lower labor and insurance costs for employers. Injured workers deserve high quality medical care in accordance with current health care best practices. To this end, the department shall establish minimum standards for providers who treat workers from both state fund and self-insured employers. The department shall establish a health care provider network to treat injured workers, and shall accept providers into the network who meet those minimum standards. The department shall convene an advisory group made up of representatives from or designees of the workers' compensation advisory committee and the industrial insurance medical and chiropractic advisory committees to consider and advise the department related to implementation of this section, including development of best practices treatment guidelines for providers in the network. The department shall also seek the input of various health care provider groups and associations concerning the network's implementation. Network providers must be required to follow the department's evidence-based coverage decisions and treatment guidelines, policies, and must be expected to follow other national treatment guidelines appropriate for their patient. The department, in collaboration with the advisory group, shall also establish additional best practice standards for providers to qualify for a second tier within the network, based on demonstrated use of occupational health best practices. This second tier is separate from and in addition to the centers for occupational health and education established under subsection (5) of this section.(2)(a) Upon the occurrence of any injury to a worker entitled to compensation under the provisions of this title, he or she shall receive proper and necessary medical and surgical services at the hands of a physician, osteopathic physician, chiropractor, naturopath, podiatric physician, optometrist, dentist, licensed advanced practice registered nurse, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychologist in claims solely for mental health conditions, of his or her own choice, if conveniently located, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, and proper and necessary hospital care and services during the period of his or her disability from such injury.(b) Once the provider network is established in the worker's geographic area, an injured worker may receive care from a nonnetwork provider only for an initial office or emergency room visit. However, the department or self-insurer may limit reimbursement to the department's standard fee for the services. The provider must comply with all applicable billing policies and must accept the department's fee schedule as payment in full.(c) The department, in collaboration with the advisory group, shall adopt policies for the development, credentialing, accreditation, and continued oversight of a network of health care providers approved to treat injured workers. Health care providers shall apply to the network by completing the department's provider application which shall have the force of a contract with the department to treat injured workers. The advisory group shall recommend minimum network standards for the department to approve a provider's application, to remove a provider from the network, or to require peer review such as, but not limited to:(i) Current malpractice insurance coverage exceeding a dollar amount threshold, number, or seriousness of malpractice suits over a specific time frame;(ii) Previous malpractice judgments or settlements that do not exceed a dollar amount threshold recommended by the advisory group, or a specific number or seriousness of malpractice suits over a specific time frame;(iii) No licensing or disciplinary action in any jurisdiction or loss of treating or admitting privileges by any board, commission, agency, public or private health care payer, or hospital;(iv) For some specialties such as surgeons, privileges in at least one hospital;(v) Whether the provider has been credentialed by another health plan that follows national quality assurance guidelines; and(vi) Alternative criteria for providers that are not credentialed by another health plan.The department shall develop alternative criteria for providers that are not credentialed by another health plan or as needed to address access to care concerns in certain regions.(d) Network provider contracts will automatically renew at the end of the contract period unless the department provides written notice of changes in contract provisions or the department or provider provides written notice of contract termination. The industrial insurance medical advisory committee shall develop criteria for removal of a provider from the network to be presented to the department and advisory group for consideration in the development of contract terms.(e) In order to monitor quality of care and assure efficient management of the provider network, the department shall establish additional criteria and terms for network participation including, but not limited to, requiring compliance with administrative and billing policies.(f) The advisory group shall recommend best practices standards to the department to use in determining second tier network providers. The department shall develop and implement financial and nonfinancial incentives for network providers who qualify for the second tier. The department is authorized to certify and decertify second tier providers.(3) The department shall work with self-insurers and the department utilization review provider to implement utilization review for the self-insured community to ensure consistent quality, cost-effective care for all injured workers and employers, and to reduce administrative burden for providers.(4) The department for state fund claims shall pay, in accordance with the department's fee schedule, for any alleged injury for which a worker files a claim, any initial prescription drugs provided in relation to that initial visit, without regard to whether the worker's claim for benefits is allowed. In all accepted claims, treatment shall be limited in point of duration as follows:In the case of permanent partial disability, not to extend beyond the date when compensation shall be awarded him or her, except when the worker returned to work before permanent partial disability award is made, in such case not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease; in case of temporary disability not to extend beyond the time when monthly allowances to him or her shall cease: PROVIDED, That after any injured worker has returned to his or her work his or her medical and surgical treatment may be continued if, and so long as, such continuation is deemed necessary by the supervisor of industrial insurance to be necessary to his or her more complete recovery; in case of a permanent total disability not to extend beyond the date on which a lump sum settlement is made with him or her or he or she is placed upon the permanent pension roll: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the supervisor of industrial insurance, solely in his or her discretion, may authorize continued medical and surgical treatment for conditions previously accepted by the department when such medical and surgical treatment is deemed necessary by the supervisor of industrial insurance to protect such worker's life or provide for the administration of medical and therapeutic measures including payment of prescription medications, but not including those controlled substances currently scheduled by the pharmacy quality assurance commission as Schedule I, II, III, or IV substances under chapter 69.50 RCW, which are necessary to alleviate continuing pain which results from the industrial injury. In order to authorize such continued treatment the written order of the supervisor of industrial insurance issued in advance of the continuation shall be necessary.The supervisor of industrial insurance, the supervisor's designee, or a self-insurer, in his or her sole discretion, may authorize inoculation or other immunological treatment in cases in which a work-related activity has resulted in probable exposure of the worker to a potential infectious occupational disease. Authorization of such treatment does not bind the department or self-insurer in any adjudication of a claim by the same worker or the worker's beneficiary for an occupational disease.(5)(a) The legislature finds that the department and its business and labor partners have collaborated in establishing centers for occupational health and education to promote best practices and prevent preventable disability by focusing additional provider-based resources during the first twelve weeks following an injury. The centers for occupational health and education represent innovative accountable care systems in an early stage of development consistent with national health care reform efforts. Many Washington workers do not yet have access to these innovative health care delivery models.(b) To expand evidence-based occupational health best practices, the department shall establish additional centers for occupational health and education, with the goal of extending access to at least fifty percent of injured and ill workers by December 2013 and to all injured workers by December 2015. The department shall also develop additional best practices and incentives that span the entire period of recovery, not only the first twelve weeks.(c) The department shall certify and decertify centers for occupational health and education based on criteria including institutional leadership and geographic areas covered by the center for occupational health and education, occupational health leadership and education, mix of participating health care providers necessary to address the anticipated needs of injured workers, health services coordination to deliver occupational health best practices, indicators to measure the success of the center for occupational health and education, and agreement that the center's providers shall, if feasible, treat certain injured workers if referred by the department or a self-insurer.(d) Health care delivery organizations may apply to the department for certification as a center for occupational health and education. These may include, but are not limited to, hospitals and affiliated clinics and providers, multispecialty clinics, health maintenance organizations, and organized systems of network physicians.(e) The centers for occupational health and education shall implement benchmark quality indicators of occupational health best practices for individual providers, developed in collaboration with the department. A center for occupational health and education shall remove individual providers who do not consistently meet these quality benchmarks.(f) The department shall develop and implement financial and nonfinancial incentives for center for occupational health and education providers that are based on progressive and measurable gains in occupational health best practices, and that are applicable throughout the duration of an injured or ill worker's episode of care.(g) The department shall develop electronic methods of tracking evidence-based quality measures to identify and improve outcomes for injured workers at risk of developing prolonged disability. In addition, these methods must be used to provide systematic feedback to physicians regarding quality of care, to conduct appropriate objective evaluation of progress in the centers for occupational health and education, and to allow efficient coordination of services.(6) If a provider fails to meet the minimum network standards established in subsection (2) of this section, the department is authorized to remove the provider from the network or take other appropriate action regarding a provider's participation. The department may also require remedial steps as a condition for a provider to participate in the network. The department, with input from the advisory group, shall establish waiting periods that may be imposed before a provider who has been denied or removed from the network may reapply.(7) The department may permanently remove a provider from the network or take other appropriate action when the provider exhibits a pattern of conduct of low quality care that exposes patients to risk of physical or psychiatric harm or death. Patterns that qualify as risk of harm include, but are not limited to, poor health care outcomes evidenced by increased, chronic, or prolonged pain or decreased function due to treatments that have not been shown to be curative, safe, or effective or for which it has been shown that the risks of harm exceed the benefits that can be reasonably expected based on peer-reviewed opinion.(8) The department may not remove a health care provider from the network for an isolated instance of poor health and recovery outcomes due to treatment by the provider.(9) When the department terminates a provider from the network, the department or self-insurer shall assist an injured worker currently under the provider's care in identifying a new network provider or providers from whom the worker can select an attending or treating provider. In such a case, the department or self-insurer shall notify the injured worker that he or she must choose a new attending or treating provider.(10) The department may adopt rules related to this section.(11) The department shall report to the workers' compensation advisory committee and to the appropriate committees of the legislature on each December 1st, beginning in 2012 and ending in 2016, on the implementation of the provider network and expansion of the centers for occupational health and education. The reports must include a summary of actions taken, progress toward long-term goals, outcomes of key initiatives, access to care issues, results of disputes or controversies related to new provisions, and whether any changes are needed to further improve the occupational health best practices care of injured workers.Sec. 79. RCW 69.41.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5122 and 2025 c 26 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a legend drug whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:(a) A practitioner; or(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.(2) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.(3) "Community-based care settings" include: Community residential programs for persons with developmental disabilities, certified by the department of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities.(4) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of a legend drug, whether or not there is an agency relationship.(5) "Department" means the department of health.(6) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a legend drug and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.(7) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.(8) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a legend drug.(9) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.(10) "Drug" means:(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or animals;(c) Substances (other than food, minerals or vitamins) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of human beings or animals; and(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. It does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.(11) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization transmitted verbally by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.(12) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of temporary and permanent residence, but does not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care settings.(13) "Legend drugs" means any drugs which are required by state law or regulation of the pharmacy quality assurance commission to be dispensed on prescription only or are restricted to use by practitioners only.(14) "Legible prescription" means a prescription or medication order issued by a practitioner that is capable of being read and understood by the pharmacist filling the prescription or the nurse or other practitioner implementing the medication order. A prescription must be hand printed, typewritten, or electronically generated.(15) "Medication assistance" means assistance rendered by a nonpractitioner to an individual residing in a community-based care setting or in-home care setting to facilitate the individual's self-administration of a legend drug or legend drugs, which may include a controlled substance or controlled substances. It includes reminding or coaching the individual, handing the medication container to the individual, opening the individual's medication container, using an enabler, or placing the medication in the individual's hand, and such other means of medication assistance as defined by rule adopted by the department. A nonpractitioner may help in the preparation of legend drugs, including controlled substances, for self-administration where a practitioner has determined and communicated orally or by written direction that such medication preparation assistance is necessary and appropriate. Medication assistance shall not include assistance with intravenous medications or injectable medications, except setting up diabetic devices for self-administration or handling injectable medications to an individual for self-administration.(16) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity.(17) "Practitioner" means:(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner to the extent authorized under chapter 18.06 RCW and the rules adopted under RCW 18.06.010(1)(m), a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW, an optometrist under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a physician ((assistant))associate under chapter 18.71A RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a licensed athletic trainer to the extent authorized under chapter 18.250 RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, when acting under the required supervision of a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW, a dental hygienist licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW, a licensed dental therapist to the extent authorized under chapter 18.265 RCW, or a licensed midwife to the extent authorized under chapter 18.50 RCW;(b) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, or to administer a legend drug in the course of professional practice or research in this state; and(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery in any state, or province of Canada, which shares a common border with the state of Washington.(18) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.Sec. 80. RCW 69.41.030 and 2025 c 58 s 5123 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to sell or deliver any legend drug, or knowingly possess any legend drug, or knowingly use any legend drug in a public place, except upon the order or prescription of a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a licensed midwife to the extent authorized under chapter 18.50 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the board of nursing, a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW to the extent permitted by drug therapy guidelines or protocols established under RCW 18.64.011 and authorized by the commission and approved by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs, a physician ((assistant))associate under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the Washington medical commission, or any of the following professionals in any province of Canada that shares a common border with the state of Washington or in any state of the United States: A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed advanced practice registered nurse, a licensed physician ((assistant))associate, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or warehouse operator, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend drug is in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic that is under contract with the health care authority from selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter prohibits possession or delivery of legend drugs by an authorized collector or other person participating in the operation of a drug take-back program authorized in chapter 69.48 RCW.(2)(a) A violation of this section involving the sale, delivery, or possession with intent to sell or deliver is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.(b) A violation of this section involving knowing possession is a misdemeanor. The prosecutor is encouraged to divert such cases for assessment, treatment, or other services.(c) A violation of this section involving knowing use in a public place is a misdemeanor. The prosecutor is encouraged to divert such cases for assessment, treatment, or other services.(d) No person may be charged with both knowing possession and knowing use in a public place under this section relating to the same course of conduct.(e) In lieu of jail booking and referral to the prosecutor for a violation of this section involving knowing possession, or knowing use in a public place, law enforcement is encouraged to offer a referral to assessment and services available under RCW 10.31.110 or other program or entity responsible for receiving referrals in lieu of legal system involvement, which may include, but are not limited to, arrest and jail alternative programs established under RCW 36.28A.450, law enforcement assisted diversion programs established under RCW 71.24.589, and the recovery navigator program established under RCW 71.24.115.(3) For the purposes of this section, "public place" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 66.04.010, but the exclusions in RCW 66.04.011 do not apply.(4) For the purposes of this section, "use any legend drug" means to introduce the drug into the human body by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means.Sec. 81. RCW 69.45.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5125 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.(2) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor of such drug or substance, so designated under or pursuant to chapter 69.50 RCW, the uniform controlled substances act.(3) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of a drug or device, whether or not there is an agency relationship.(4) "Department" means the department of health.(5) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a drug, biological, or device and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.(6) "Distribute" means to deliver, other than by administering or dispensing, a legend drug.(7) "Drug samples" means any federal food and drug administration approved controlled substance, legend drug, or products requiring prescriptions in this state, which is distributed at no charge to a practitioner by a manufacturer or a manufacturer's representative, exclusive of drugs under clinical investigations approved by the federal food and drug administration.(8) "Legend drug" means any drug that is required by state law or by regulations of the commission to be dispensed on prescription only or is restricted to use by practitioners only.(9) "Manufacturer" means a person or other entity engaged in the manufacture or distribution of drugs or devices, but does not include a manufacturer's representative.(10) "Manufacturer's representative" means an agent or employee of a drug manufacturer who is authorized by the drug manufacturer to possess drug samples for the purpose of distribution in this state to appropriately authorized health care practitioners.(11) "Person" means any individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, or any other legal entity.(12) "Practitioner" means a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, a commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or the public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized to prescribe by the state board of nursing, or a physician ((assistant))associate under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the Washington medical commission.(13) "Reasonable cause" means a state of facts found to exist that would warrant a reasonably intelligent and prudent person to believe that a person has violated state or federal drug laws or regulations.(14) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.Sec. 82. RCW 69.50.101 and 2025 c 58 s 5126 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:(a) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or(b) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.(2) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.(3) "Board" means the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.(4) "Cannabis" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis during the growing cycle through harvest and usable cannabis. "Cannabis" does not include hemp or industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.140.020, or seeds used for licensed hemp production under chapter 15.140 RCW.(5) "Cannabis concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ten percent.(6) "Cannabis processor" means a person licensed by the board to process cannabis into cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products, package and label cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products at wholesale to cannabis retailers.(7) "Cannabis producer" means a person licensed by the board to produce and sell cannabis at wholesale to cannabis processors and other cannabis producers.(8)(a) "Cannabis products" means useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, and cannabis-infused products as defined in this section, including any product intended to be consumed or absorbed inside the body by any means including inhalation, ingestion, or insertion, with any detectable amount of THC.(b) "Cannabis products" also means any product containing only THC content.(c) "Cannabis products" does not include cannabis health and beauty aids as defined in RCW 69.50.575 or products approved by the United States food and drug administration.(9) "Cannabis researcher" means a person licensed by the board to produce, process, and possess cannabis for the purposes of conducting research on cannabis and cannabis-derived drug products.(10) "Cannabis retailer" means a person licensed by the board to sell cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products in a retail outlet.(11) "Cannabis-infused products" means products that contain cannabis or cannabis extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from cannabis as defined in subsection (4) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ten percent. The term "cannabis-infused products" does not include either useable cannabis or cannabis concentrates.(12) "CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(13) "CBD product" means any product containing or consisting of cannabidiol.(14) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.(15) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules, but does not include hemp or industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.140.020.(16)(a) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.(b) The term does not include:(i) a controlled substance;(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, or chapter 69.77 RCW to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.(17) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.(18) "Department" means the department of health.(19) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(20) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.(21) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.(22) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.(23) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.(24) "Drug" means (a) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (b) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (c) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (d) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.(25) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.(26) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.(27) "Immature plant or clone" means a plant or clone that has no flowers, is less than twelve inches in height, and is less than twelve inches in diameter.(28) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:(a) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;(b) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and(c) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.(29) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (33)(e) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(1) (l) and (hh), and 69.50.206(2)(d), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(1) (h) and (pp) and 69.50.210(3), the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(1)(ii), 69.50.204(3), and 69.50.208(1), the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.(30) "Lot" means a definite quantity of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.(31) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused product.(32) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:(a) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or(b) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.(33) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:(a) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.(b) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.(c) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.(d) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.(e) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.(f) Cocaine base.(g) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.(h) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in (a) through (g) of this subsection.(34) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.(35) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.(36) "Package" means a container that has a single unit or group of units.(37) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.(38) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(39) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.(40) "Practitioner" means:(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician ((assistant))associate under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.(b) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician ((assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant))associate specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical commission or equivalent and his or her participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, an advanced practice registered nurse licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.(41) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.(42) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.(43) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(44) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(45) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the board for the retail sale of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products.(46) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.(47) "Social equity plan" means a plan that addresses at least some of the elements outlined in this subsection (47), along with any additional plan components or requirements approved by the board following consultation with the task force created in RCW 69.50.336. The plan may include:(a) A statement that indicates how the cannabis licensee will work to promote social equity goals in their community;(b) A description of how the cannabis licensee will meet social equity goals as defined in RCW 69.50.335;(c) The composition of the workforce the licensee has employed or intends to hire; and(d) Business plans involving partnerships or assistance to organizations or residents with connections to populations with a history of high rates of enforcement of cannabis prohibition.(48) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.(49) "THC concentration" means percent of tetrahydrocannabinol content of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of cannabis product, or the combined percent of tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.(50) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.(51) "Unit" means an individual consumable item within a package of one or more consumable items in solid, liquid, gas, or any form intended for human consumption.(52) "Useable cannabis" means dried cannabis flowers. The term "useable cannabis" does not include either cannabis-infused products or cannabis concentrates.(53) "Youth access" means the level of interest persons under the age of twenty-one may have in a vapor product, as well as the degree to which the product is available or appealing to such persons, and the likelihood of initiation, use, or addiction by adolescents and young adults.Sec. 83. RCW 69.51A.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5127 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1)(a) "Authorization" means a form developed by the department that is completed and signed by a qualifying patient's health care professional and printed on tamper-resistant paper.(b) An authorization is not a prescription as defined in RCW 69.50.101.(2) "Cannabis" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.(3) "Cannabis concentrates" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.(4) "Cannabis processor" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.(5) "Cannabis producer" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.(6) "Cannabis retailer" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.(7) "Cannabis retailer with a medical cannabis endorsement" means a cannabis retailer that has been issued a medical cannabis endorsement by the state liquor and cannabis board pursuant to RCW 69.50.375.(8) "Cannabis-infused products" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.(9) "CBD concentration" means the percent of cannabidiol content per dry weight of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of cannabis product.(10) "Department" means the department of health.(11) "Designated provider" means a person who is twenty-one years of age or older and:(a)(i) Is the parent or guardian of a qualifying patient who is under the age of eighteen and holds a recognition card; or(ii) Has been designated in writing by a qualifying patient to serve as the designated provider for that patient;(b)(i) Has an authorization from the qualifying patient's health care professional; or(ii)(A) Has been entered into the medical cannabis authorization database as being the designated provider to a qualifying patient; and(B) Has been provided a recognition card;(c) Is prohibited from consuming cannabis obtained for the personal, medical use of the qualifying patient for whom the individual is acting as designated provider;(d) Provides cannabis to only the qualifying patient that has designated him or her;(e) Is in compliance with the terms and conditions of this chapter; and(f) Is the designated provider to only one patient at any one time.(12) "Health care professional," for purposes of this chapter only, means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, a physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, an osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.(13) "Housing unit" means a house, an apartment, a mobile home, a group of rooms, or a single room that is occupied as separate living quarters, in which the occupants live and eat separately from any other persons in the building, and which have direct access from the outside of the building or through a common hall.(14) "Low THC, high CBD" means products determined by the department to have a low THC, high CBD ratio under RCW 69.50.375. Low THC, high CBD products must be inhalable, ingestible, or absorbable.(15) "Medical cannabis authorization database" means the secure and confidential database established in RCW 69.51A.230.(16) "Medical use of cannabis" means the manufacture, production, possession, transportation, delivery, ingestion, application, or administration of cannabis for the exclusive benefit of a qualifying patient in the treatment of his or her terminal or debilitating medical condition.(17) "Plant" means a cannabis plant having at least three distinguishable and distinct leaves, each leaf being at least three centimeters in diameter, and a readily observable root formation consisting of at least two separate and distinct roots, each being at least two centimeters in length. Multiple stalks emanating from the same root ball or root system is considered part of the same single plant.(18) "Public place" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.160.020.(19) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:(a)(i) Is a patient of a health care professional;(ii) Has been diagnosed by that health care professional as having a terminal or debilitating medical condition;(iii) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time of such diagnosis;(iv) Has been advised by that health care professional about the risks and benefits of the medical use of cannabis;(v) Has been advised by that health care professional that they may benefit from the medical use of cannabis;(vi)(A) Has an authorization from his or her health care professional; or(B) Has been entered into the medical cannabis authorization database and has been provided a recognition card; and(vii) Is otherwise in compliance with the terms and conditions established in this chapter.(b) "Qualifying patient" does not include a person who is actively being supervised for a criminal conviction by a corrections agency or department that has determined that the terms of this chapter are inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision and all related processes and procedures related to that supervision.(20) "Recognition card" means a card issued to qualifying patients and designated providers by a cannabis retailer with a medical cannabis endorsement that has entered them into the medical cannabis authorization database.(21) "Retail outlet" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.(22) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.(23) "Tamper-resistant paper" means paper that meets one or more of the following industry-recognized features:(a) One or more features designed to prevent copying of the paper;(b) One or more features designed to prevent the erasure or modification of information on the paper; or(c) One or more features designed to prevent the use of counterfeit authorization.(24) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means a condition severe enough to significantly interfere with the patient's activities of daily living and ability to function, which can be objectively assessed and evaluated and limited to the following:(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis, epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders;(b) Intractable pain, limited for the purpose of this chapter to mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications;(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic, limited for the purpose of this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by standard treatments and medications;(d) Crohn's disease with debilitating symptoms unrelieved by standard treatments or medications;(e) Hepatitis C with debilitating nausea or intractable pain unrelieved by standard treatments or medications;(f) Diseases, including anorexia, which result in nausea, vomiting, wasting, appetite loss, cramping, seizures, muscle spasms, or spasticity, when these symptoms are unrelieved by standard treatments or medications;(g) Posttraumatic stress disorder; or(h) Traumatic brain injury.(25) "THC concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.(26) "Useable cannabis" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.Sec. 84. RCW 70.05.030 and 2025 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, for counties without a home rule charter, the board of county commissioners and the members selected under (a) and (e) of this subsection, shall constitute the local board of health, unless the county is part of a health district pursuant to chapter 70.46 RCW. For counties without a home rule charter where the board of county commissioners is comprised of five commissioners, the board of county commissioners may adopt an ordinance reducing the number of county commissioners that are members of the local board of health, provided that the board of health includes at least one county commissioner. The jurisdiction of the local board of health shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the county.(a) The remaining board members must be persons who are not elected officials and must be selected from the following categories consistent with the requirements of this section and the rules adopted by the state board of health under RCW 43.20.300:(i) Public health, health care facilities, and providers. This category consists of persons practicing or employed in the county who are:(A) Medical ethicists;(B) Epidemiologists;(C) Experienced in environmental public health, such as a registered sanitarian;(D) Community health workers;(E) Holders of master's degrees or higher in public health or the equivalent;(F) Employees of a hospital located in the county; or(G) Any of the following providers holding an active or retired license in good standing under Title 18 RCW:(I) Physicians or osteopathic physicians;(II) Advanced practice registered nurses;(III) Physician ((assistants or osteopathic physician assistants))associates;(IV) Registered nurses;(V) Dentists;(VI) Naturopaths; or(VII) Pharmacists;(ii) Consumers of public health. This category consists of county residents who have self-identified as having faced significant health inequities or as having lived experiences with public health-related programs such as: The special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children; the supplemental nutrition program; home visiting; or treatment services. It is strongly encouraged that individuals from historically marginalized and underrepresented communities are given preference. These individuals may not be elected officials and may not have any fiduciary obligation to a health facility or other health agency, and may not have a material financial interest in the rendering of health services; and(iii) Other community stakeholders. This category consists of persons representing the following types of organizations located in the county:(A) Community-based organizations or nonprofits that work with populations experiencing health inequities in the county;(B) Active, reserve, or retired armed services members;(C) The business community; or(D) The environmental public health regulated community.(b) The board members selected under (a) of this subsection must be approved by a majority vote of the board of county commissioners.(c) If the number of board members selected under (a) of this subsection is evenly divisible by three, there must be an equal number of members selected from each of the three categories. If there are one or two members over the nearest multiple of three, those members may be selected from any of the three categories. However, if the board of health demonstrates that it attempted to recruit members from all three categories and was unable to do so, the board may select members only from the other two categories.(d) There may be no more than one member selected under (a) of this subsection from one type of background or position.(e) If a federally recognized Indian tribe holds reservation or trust lands within the county, or if an urban Indian organization recognized by the Indian health service and registered as a 501(c)(3) organization in Washington that serves American Indian and Alaska Native people provides services within the county, the board of health must allow a tribal representative from each tribe and each organization, as selected by such tribe or organization, to serve as a member and must notify the American Indian health commission.(f) The board of county commissioners may, at its discretion, adopt an ordinance expanding the size and composition of the board of health to include elected officials from cities and towns and persons other than elected officials as members so long as the city and county elected officials do not constitute a majority of the total membership of the board.(g) Except as provided in (a) and (e) of this subsection, an ordinance adopted under this section shall include provisions for the appointment, term, and compensation, or reimbursement of expenses.(h) The jurisdiction of the local board of health shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the county.(i) The local health officer, as described in RCW 70.05.050, shall be appointed by the official designated under the provisions of the county charter. The same official designated under the provisions of the county charter may appoint an administrative officer, as described in RCW 70.05.045.(j) The number of members selected or included under (a) and (e) of this subsection must equal the number of city and county elected officials on the board of health. If a member is added under (e) of this subsection, the board of county commissioners shall modify the membership of the board:(i) In compliance with timelines established by the state board of health in rule once such rules are in effect; and(ii) Until the rules in (j)(i) of this subsection are in effect, within 60 days of receipt of notice of the selection of a tribal representative.(k) At the first meeting of a district board of health the members shall elect a chair to serve for a period of one year.(l) Any decision by the board of health related to the setting or modification of permit, licensing, and application fees may only be determined by the city and county elected officials on the board.(2) A local board of health comprised solely of elected officials may retain this composition if the local health jurisdiction had a public health advisory committee or board with its own bylaws established on January 1, 2021. By January 1, 2022, the public health advisory committee or board must meet the requirements established in RCW 70.46.140 for community health advisory boards. Any future changes to local board of health composition must meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.Sec. 85. RCW 70.05.035 and 2025 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, for home rule charter counties, the county legislative authority shall establish a local board of health and may prescribe the membership and selection process for the board. The membership of the local board of health must also include the members selected under (a) and (e) of this subsection.(a) The remaining board members must be persons who are not elected officials and must be selected from the following categories consistent with the requirements of this section and the rules adopted by the state board of health under RCW 43.20.300:(i) Public health, health care facilities, and providers. This category consists of persons practicing or employed in the county who are:(A) Medical ethicists;(B) Epidemiologists;(C) Experienced in environmental public health, such as a registered sanitarian;(D) Community health workers;(E) Holders of master's degrees or higher in public health or the equivalent;(F) Employees of a hospital located in the county; or(G) Any of the following providers holding an active or retired license in good standing under Title 18 RCW:(I) Physicians or osteopathic physicians;(II) Advanced practice registered nurses;(III) Physician ((assistants or osteopathic physician assistants))associates;(IV) Registered nurses;(V) Dentists;(VI) Naturopaths; or(VII) Pharmacists;(ii) Consumers of public health. This category consists of county residents who have self-identified as having faced significant health inequities or as having lived experiences with public health-related programs such as: The special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children; the supplemental nutrition program; home visiting; or treatment services. It is strongly encouraged that individuals from historically marginalized and underrepresented communities are given preference. These individuals may not be elected officials and may not have any fiduciary obligation to a health facility or other health agency, and may not have a material financial interest in the rendering of health services; and(iii) Other community stakeholders. This category consists of persons representing the following types of organizations located in the county:(A) Community-based organizations or nonprofits that work with populations experiencing health inequities in the county;(B) Active, reserve, or retired armed services members;(C) The business community; or(D) The environmental public health regulated community.(b) The board members selected under (a) of this subsection must be approved by a majority vote of the board of county commissioners.(c) If the number of board members selected under (a) of this subsection is evenly divisible by three, there must be an equal number of members selected from each of the three categories. If there are one or two members over the nearest multiple of three, those members may be selected from any of the three categories. However, if the board of health demonstrates that it attempted to recruit members from all three categories and was unable to do so, the board may select members only from the other two categories.(d) There may be no more than one member selected under (a) of this subsection from one type of background or position.(e) If a federally recognized Indian tribe holds reservation or trust lands within the county, or if an urban Indian organization recognized by the Indian health service and registered as a 501(c)(3) organization in Washington that serves American Indian and Alaska Native people provides services within the county, the board of health must allow a tribal representative from each tribe and each organization, as selected by such tribe or organization, to serve as a member and must notify the American Indian health commission.(f) The county legislative authority may appoint to the board of health elected officials from cities and towns and persons other than elected officials as members so long as the city and county elected officials do not constitute a majority of the total membership of the board.(g) Except as provided in (a) and (e) of this subsection, the county legislative authority shall specify the appointment, term, and compensation or reimbursement of expenses.(h) The jurisdiction of the local board of health shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the county.(i) The local health officer, as described in RCW 70.05.050, shall be appointed by the official designated under the provisions of the county charter. The same official designated under the provisions of the county charter may appoint an administrative officer, as described in RCW 70.05.045.(j) The number of members selected or included under (a) and (e) of this subsection must equal the number of city and county elected officials on the board of health. If a member is added under (e) of this subsection, the county legislative authority shall modify the membership of the board:(i) In compliance with timelines established by the state board of health in rule once such rules are in effect; and(ii) Until the rules in (j)(i) of this subsection are in effect, within 60 days of receipt of notice of the selection of a tribal representative.(k) At the first meeting of a district board of health the members shall elect a chair to serve for a period of one year.(l) Any decision by the board of health related to the setting or modification of permit, licensing, and application fees may only be determined by the city and county elected officials on the board.(2) A local board of health comprised solely of elected officials may retain this composition if the local health jurisdiction had a public health advisory committee or board with its own bylaws established on January 1, 2021. By January 1, 2022, the public health advisory committee or board must meet the requirements established in RCW 70.46.140 for community health advisory boards. Any future changes to local board of health composition must meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.Sec. 86. RCW 70.30.061 and 2025 c 58 s 5131 are each amended to read as follows:Any person residing in the state and needing treatment for tuberculosis may apply in person to the local health officer or to any licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed physician ((assistant))associate for examination and if that health care provider has reasonable cause to believe that the person is suffering from tuberculosis in any form he or she may apply to the local health officer or designee for admission of the person to an appropriate facility for the care and treatment of tuberculosis.Sec. 87. RCW 70.41.210 and 2020 c 80 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The chief administrator or executive officer of a hospital shall report to the department when the practice of a health care practitioner as defined in subsection (2) of this section is restricted, suspended, limited, or terminated based upon a conviction, determination, or finding by the hospital that the health care practitioner has committed an action defined as unprofessional conduct under RCW 18.130.180. The chief administrator or executive officer shall also report any voluntary restriction or termination of the practice of a health care practitioner as defined in subsection (2) of this section while the practitioner is under investigation or the subject of a proceeding by the hospital regarding unprofessional conduct, or in return for the hospital not conducting such an investigation or proceeding or not taking action. The department will forward the report to the appropriate disciplining authority.(2) The reporting requirements apply to the following health care practitioners: Pharmacists as defined in chapter 18.64 RCW; advanced practice registered nurses((practitioners)) as defined in chapter 18.79 RCW; dentists as defined in chapter 18.32 RCW; naturopaths as defined in chapter 18.36A RCW; optometrists as defined in chapter 18.53 RCW; osteopathic physicians and surgeons as defined in chapter 18.57 RCW; physicians as defined in chapter 18.71 RCW; physician ((assistants))associates as defined in chapter 18.71A RCW; podiatric physicians and surgeons as defined in chapter 18.22 RCW; and psychologists as defined in chapter 18.83 RCW.(3) Reports made under subsection (1) of this section shall be made within fifteen days of the date: (a) A conviction, determination, or finding is made by the hospital that the health care practitioner has committed an action defined as unprofessional conduct under RCW 18.130.180; or (b) the voluntary restriction or termination of the practice of a health care practitioner, including his or her voluntary resignation, while under investigation or the subject of proceedings regarding unprofessional conduct under RCW 18.130.180 is accepted by the hospital.(4) Failure of a hospital to comply with this section is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars.(5) A hospital, its chief administrator, or its executive officer who files a report under this section is immune from suit, whether direct or derivative, in any civil action related to the filing or contents of the report, unless the conviction, determination, or finding on which the report and its content are based is proven to not have been made in good faith. The prevailing party in any action brought alleging the conviction, determination, finding, or report was not made in good faith, shall be entitled to recover the costs of litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees.(6) The department shall forward reports made under subsection (1) of this section to the appropriate disciplining authority designated under Title 18 RCW within fifteen days of the date the report is received by the department. The department shall notify a hospital that has made a report under subsection (1) of this section of the results of the disciplining authority's case disposition decision within fifteen days after the case disposition. Case disposition is the decision whether to issue a statement of charges, take informal action, or close the complaint without action against a practitioner. In its biennial report to the legislature under RCW 18.130.310, the department shall specifically identify the case dispositions of reports made by hospitals under subsection (1) of this section.(7) The department shall not increase hospital license fees to carry out this section before July 1, 2008.Sec. 88. RCW 70.41.230 and 2025 c 58 s 5132 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, prior to granting or renewing clinical privileges or association of any physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse or hiring a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse who will provide clinical care under his or her license, a hospital or facility approved pursuant to this chapter shall request from the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse and the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse shall provide the following information:(a) The name of any hospital or facility with or at which the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse had or has any association, employment, privileges, or practice during the prior five years: PROVIDED, That the hospital may request additional information going back further than five years, and the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse shall use his or her best efforts to comply with such a request for additional information;(b) Whether the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse has ever been or is in the process of being denied, revoked, terminated, suspended, restricted, reduced, limited, sanctioned, placed on probation, monitored, or not renewed for any professional activity listed in (b)(i) through (x) of this subsection, or has ever voluntarily or involuntarily relinquished, withdrawn, or failed to proceed with an application for any professional activity listed in (b)(i) through (x) of this subsection in order to avoid an adverse action or to preclude an investigation or while under investigation relating to professional competence or conduct:(i) License to practice any profession in any jurisdiction;(ii) Other professional registration or certification in any jurisdiction;(iii) Specialty or subspecialty board certification;(iv) Membership on any hospital medical staff;(v) Clinical privileges at any facility, including hospitals, ambulatory surgical centers, or skilled nursing facilities;(vi) Medicare, medicaid, the food and drug administration, the national institutes of health (office of human research protection), governmental, national, or international regulatory agency, or any public program;(vii) Professional society membership or fellowship;(viii) Participation or membership in a health maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, independent practice association, physician-hospital organization, or other entity;(ix) Academic appointment;(x) Authority to prescribe controlled substances (drug enforcement agency or other authority);(c) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any pending medical malpractice actions in this state or another state, the substance of the allegations in the proceedings or actions, and any additional information concerning the proceedings or actions as the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse deems appropriate;(d) The substance of the findings in the actions or proceedings and any additional information concerning the actions or proceedings as the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse deems appropriate;(e) A waiver by the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse of any confidentiality provisions concerning the information required to be provided to hospitals pursuant to this subsection; and(f) A verification by the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse that the information provided by the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse is accurate and complete.(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, prior to granting privileges or association to any physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse or hiring a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse who will provide clinical care under his or her license, a hospital or facility approved pursuant to this chapter shall request from any hospital with or at which the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse had or has privileges, was associated, or was employed, during the preceding five years, the following information concerning the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse:(a) Any pending professional medical misconduct proceedings or any pending medical malpractice actions, in this state or another state;(b) Any judgment or settlement of a medical malpractice action and any finding of professional misconduct in this state or another state by a licensing or disciplinary board; and(c) Any information required to be reported by hospitals pursuant to RCW 18.71.0195.(3) In lieu of the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, when granting or renewing credentials and privileges or association of any physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse providing telemedicine or store and forward services, an originating site hospital may rely on a distant site hospital's decision to grant or renew credentials and clinical privileges or association of the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse if the originating site hospital obtains reasonable assurances, through a written agreement with the distant site hospital, that all of the following provisions are met:(a) The distant site hospital providing the telemedicine or store and forward services is a medicare participating hospital;(b) Any physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse providing telemedicine or store and forward services at the distant site hospital will be fully credentialed and privileged to provide such services by the distant site hospital;(c) Any physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse providing telemedicine or store and forward services will hold and maintain a valid license to perform such services issued or recognized by the state of Washington; and(d) With respect to any distant site physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse who holds current credentials and privileges at the originating site hospital whose patients are receiving the telemedicine or store and forward services, the originating site hospital has evidence of an internal review of the distant site physician's, physician ((assistant's))associate's, or advanced practice registered nurse's performance of these credentials and privileges and sends the distant site hospital such performance information for use in the periodic appraisal of the distant site physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse. At a minimum, this information must include all adverse events, as defined in RCW 70.56.010, that result from the telemedicine or store and forward services provided by the distant site physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse to the originating site hospital's patients and all complaints the originating site hospital has received about the distant site physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse.(4)(a) The Washington medical commission or the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery shall be advised within thirty days of the name of any physician or physician ((assistant))associate denied staff privileges, association, or employment on the basis of adverse findings under subsection (1) of this section.(b) The state board of nursing shall be advised within thirty days of the name of any advanced practice registered nurse denied staff privileges, association, or employment on the basis of adverse findings under subsection (1) of this section.(5) A hospital or facility that receives a request for information from another hospital or facility pursuant to subsections (1) through (3) of this section shall provide such information concerning the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse in question to the extent such information is known to the hospital or facility receiving such a request, including the reasons for suspension, termination, or curtailment of employment or privileges at the hospital or facility. A hospital, facility, or other person providing such information in good faith is not liable in any civil action for the release of such information.(6) Information and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a quality improvement committee are not subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information or documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or the documents and information prepared specifically for the committee. This subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of the civil action whose involvement was independent of any quality improvement activity; (b) in any civil action, the testimony of any person concerning the facts which form the basis for the institution of such proceedings of which the person had personal knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of that individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action, disclosure of the fact that staff privileges were terminated or restricted, including the specific restrictions imposed, if any and the reasons for the restrictions; or (e) in any civil action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the patient's medical records required by regulation of the department of health to be made regarding the care and treatment received.(7) Hospitals shall be granted access to information held by the Washington medical commission, the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, and the state board of nursing pertinent to decisions of the hospital regarding credentialing and recredentialing of practitioners.(8) Violation of this section shall not be considered negligence per se.Sec. 89. RCW 70.46.020 and 2025 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, health districts consisting of two or more counties may be created whenever two or more boards of county commissioners shall by resolution establish a district for such purpose. Such a district shall consist of all the area of the combined counties. The district board of health of such a district shall consist of not less than five members for districts of two counties and seven members for districts of more than two counties, including two representatives from each county who are members of the board of county commissioners and who are appointed by the board of county commissioners of each county within the district, and members selected under (a) and (e) of this subsection, and shall have a jurisdiction coextensive with the combined boundaries.(a) The remaining board members must be persons who are not elected officials and must be selected from the following categories consistent with the requirements of this section and the rules adopted by the state board of health under RCW 43.20.300:(i) Public health, health care facilities, and providers. This category consists of persons practicing or employed in the health district who are:(A) Medical ethicists;(B) Epidemiologists;(C) Experienced in environmental public health, such as a registered sanitarian;(D) Community health workers;(E) Holders of master's degrees or higher in public health or the equivalent;(F) Employees of a hospital located in the health district; or(G) Any of the following providers holding an active or retired license in good standing under Title 18 RCW:(I) Physicians or osteopathic physicians;(II) Advanced practice registered nurses;(III) Physician ((assistants or osteopathic physician assistants))associates;(IV) Registered nurses;(V) Dentists;(VI) Naturopaths; or(VII) Pharmacists;(ii) Consumers of public health. This category consists of health district residents who have self-identified as having faced significant health inequities or as having lived experiences with public health-related programs such as: The special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children; the supplemental nutrition program; home visiting; or treatment services. It is strongly encouraged that individuals from historically marginalized and underrepresented communities are given preference. These individuals may not be elected officials, and may not have any fiduciary obligation to a health facility or other health agency, and may not have a material financial interest in the rendering of health services; and(iii) Other community stakeholders. This category consists of persons representing the following types of organizations located in the health district:(A) Community-based organizations or nonprofits that work with populations experiencing health inequities in the health district;(B) Active, reserve, or retired armed services members;(C) The business community; or(D) The environmental public health regulated community.(b) The board members selected under (a) of this subsection must be approved by a majority vote of the board of county commissioners.(c) If the number of board members selected under (a) of this subsection is evenly divisible by three, there must be an equal number of members selected from each of the three categories. If there are one or two members over the nearest multiple of three, those members may be selected from any of the three categories. However, if the board of health demonstrates that it attempted to recruit members from all three categories and was unable to do so, the board may select members only from the other two categories.(d) There may be no more than one member selected under (a) of this subsection from one type of background or position.(e) If a federally recognized Indian tribe holds reservation or trust lands within the health district, or if an urban Indian organization recognized by the Indian health service and registered as a 501(c)(3) organization in Washington that serves American Indian and Alaska Native people provides services within the health district, the board of health must allow a tribal representative from each tribe and each organization, as selected by such tribe or organization, to serve as a member and must notify the American Indian health commission.(f) The boards of county commissioners may by resolution or ordinance provide for elected officials from cities and towns and persons other than elected officials as members of the district board of health so long as the city and county elected officials do not constitute a majority of the total membership of the board.(g) Except as provided in (a) and (e) of this subsection, a resolution or ordinance adopted under this section must specify the provisions for the appointment, term, and compensation, or reimbursement of expenses.(h) At the first meeting of a district board of health the members shall elect a chair to serve for a period of one year.(i) The jurisdiction of the local board of health shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the county.(j) The local health officer, as described in RCW 70.05.050, shall be appointed by the official designated under the provisions of the county charter. The same official designated under the provisions of the county charter may appoint an administrative officer, as described in RCW 70.05.045.(k) The number of members selected or included under (a) and (e) of this subsection must equal the number of city and county elected officials on the board of health. If a member is added under (e) of this subsection, the boards of county commissioners shall modify the membership of the district:(i) In compliance with timelines established by the state board of health in rule once such rules are in effect; and(ii) Until the rules in (k)(i) of this subsection are in effect, within 60 days of receipt of notice of the selection of a tribal representative.(l) Any decision by the board of health related to the setting or modification of permit, licensing, and application fees may only be determined by the city and county elected officials on the board.(2) A local board of health comprised solely of elected officials may retain this composition if the local health jurisdiction had a public health advisory committee or board with its own bylaws established on January 1, 2021. By January 1, 2022, the public health advisory committee or board must meet the requirements established in RCW 70.46.140 for community health advisory boards. Any future changes to local board of health composition must meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.(3) A local board of health comprised solely of elected officials and made up of three counties east of the Cascade mountains may retain their current composition if the local health jurisdiction has a public health advisory committee or board that meets the requirements established in RCW 70.46.140 for community health advisory boards by July 1, 2022. If such a local board of health does not establish the required community health advisory board by July 1, 2022, it must comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section. Any future changes to local board of health composition must meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.Sec. 90. RCW 70.46.031 and 2025 c 260 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a health district to consist of one county may be created whenever the county legislative authority of the county shall pass a resolution or ordinance to organize such a health district under chapter 70.05 RCW and this chapter. The resolution or ordinance may specify the membership, representation on the district health board, or other matters relative to the formation or operation of the health district. In addition to the membership of the district health board determined through resolution or ordinance, the district health board must also include the members selected under (a) and (e) of this subsection.(a) The remaining board members must be persons who are not elected officials and must be selected from the following categories consistent with the requirements of this section and the rules adopted by the state board of health under RCW 43.20.300:(i) Public health, health care facilities, and providers. This category consists of persons practicing or employed in the county who are:(A) Medical ethicists;(B) Epidemiologists;(C) Experienced in environmental public health, such as a registered sanitarian;(D) Community health workers;(E) Holders of master's degrees or higher in public health or the equivalent;(F) Employees of a hospital located in the county; or(G) Any of the following providers holding an active or retired license in good standing under Title 18 RCW:(I) Physicians or osteopathic physicians;(II) Advanced practice registered nurses;(III) Physician ((assistants or osteopathic physician assistants))associates;(IV) Registered nurses;(V) Dentists;(VI) Naturopaths; or(VII) Pharmacists;(ii) Consumers of public health. This category consists of county residents who have self-identified as having faced significant health inequities or as having lived experiences with public health-related programs such as: The special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children; the supplemental nutrition program; home visiting; or treatment services. It is strongly encouraged that individuals from historically marginalized and underrepresented communities are given preference. These individuals may not be elected officials and may not have any fiduciary obligation to a health facility or other health agency, and may not have a material financial interest in the rendering of health services; and(iii) Other community stakeholders. This category consists of persons representing the following types of organizations located in the county:(A) Community-based organizations or nonprofits that work with populations experiencing health inequities in the county;(B) The business community; or(C) The environmental public health regulated community.(b) The board members selected under (a) of this subsection must be approved by a majority vote of the board of county commissioners.(c) If the number of board members selected under (a) of this subsection is evenly divisible by three, there must be an equal number of members selected from each of the three categories. If there are one or two members over the nearest multiple of three, those members may be selected from any of the three categories. If there are two members over the nearest multiple of three, each member over the nearest multiple of three must be selected from a different category. However, if the board of health demonstrates that it attempted to recruit members from all three categories and was unable to do so, the board may select members only from the other two categories.(d) There may be no more than one member selected under (a) of this subsection from one type of background or position.(e) If a federally recognized Indian tribe holds reservation or trust lands within the county, or if an urban Indian organization recognized by the Indian health service and registered as a 501(c)(3) organization in Washington that serves American Indian and Alaska Native people provides services within the county, the board of health must allow a tribal representative from each tribe and each organization, as selected by such tribe or organization, to serve as a member and must notify the American Indian health commission.(f) The county legislative authority may appoint elected officials from cities and towns and persons other than elected officials as members of the health district board so long as the city and county elected officials do not constitute a majority of the total membership of the board.(g) Except as provided in (a) and (e) of this subsection, a resolution or ordinance adopted under this section must specify the provisions for the appointment, term, and compensation, or reimbursement of expenses.(h) The jurisdiction of the local board of health shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the county.(i) The local health officer, as described in RCW 70.05.050, shall be appointed by the official designated under the provisions of the resolution or ordinance. The same official designated under the provisions of the resolution or ordinance may appoint an administrative officer, as described in RCW 70.05.045.(j) At the first meeting of a district board of health the members shall elect a chair to serve for a period of one year.(k) The number of members selected or included under (a) and (e) of this subsection must equal the number of city and county elected officials on the board of health. If a member is added under (e) of this subsection, the county legislative authority shall modify the membership of the district:(i) In compliance with timelines established by the state board of health in rule once such rules are in effect; and(ii) Until the rules in (k)(i) of this subsection are in effect, within 60 days of receipt of notice of the selection of a tribal representative.(l) Any decision by the board of health related to the setting or modification of permit, licensing, and application fees may only be determined by the city and county elected officials on the board.(2) A local board of health comprised solely of elected officials may retain this composition if the local health jurisdiction had a public health advisory committee or board with its own bylaws established on January 1, 2021. By January 1, 2022, the public health advisory committee or board must meet the requirements established in RCW 70.46.140 for community health advisory boards. Any future changes to local board of health composition must meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.Sec. 91. RCW 70.47.210 and 2025 c 58 s 5134 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any schedule of benefits established or renewed by the Washington basic health plan after December 31, 2006, shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening, provided that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate.(2) This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard policy provisions applicable to other benefits, such as deductible or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the health care authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the delivery of prostate cancer screening services.Sec. 92. RCW 70.54.400 and 2025 c 58 s 5137 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For purposes of this section:(a) "Customer" means an individual who is lawfully on the premises of a retail establishment.(b) "Eligible medical condition" means:(i) Crohn's disease, ulcerative colitis, or any other inflammatory bowel disease;(ii) Irritable bowel syndrome;(iii) Any condition requiring use of an ostomy device; or(iv) Any permanent or temporary medical condition that requires immediate access to a restroom.(c) "Employee restroom" means a restroom intended for employees only in a retail facility and not intended for customers.(d) "Health care provider" means an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, an osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, a physician or surgeon licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, or a physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.(e) "Retail establishment" means a place of business open to the general public for the sale of goods or services. Retail establishment does not include any structure such as a filling station, service station, or restaurant of eight hundred square feet or less that has an employee restroom located within that structure.(2) A retail establishment that has an employee restroom must allow a customer with an eligible medical condition to use that employee restroom during normal business hours if:(a) The customer requesting the use of the employee restroom provides in writing either:(i) A signed statement by the customer's health care provider on a form that has been prepared by the department of health under subsection (4) of this section; or(ii) An identification card that is issued by a nonprofit organization whose purpose includes serving individuals who suffer from an eligible medical condition; and(b) One of the following conditions are met:(i) The employee restroom is reasonably safe and is not located in an area where providing access would create an obvious health or safety risk to the customer; or(ii) Allowing the customer to access the restroom facility does not pose a security risk to the retail establishment or its employees.(3) A retail establishment that has an employee restroom must allow a customer to use that employee restroom during normal business hours if:(a)(i) Three or more employees of the retail establishment are working at the time the customer requests use of the employee restroom; and(ii) The retail establishment does not normally make a restroom available to the public; and(b)(i) The employee restroom is reasonably safe and is not located in an area where providing access would create an obvious health or safety risk to the customer; or(ii) Allowing the customer to access the employee restroom does not pose a security risk to the retail establishment or its employees.(4) The department of health shall develop a standard electronic form that may be signed by a health care provider as evidence of the existence of an eligible medical condition as required by subsection (2) of this section. The form shall include a brief description of a customer's rights under this section and shall be made available for a customer or his or her health care provider to access by computer. Nothing in this section requires the department to distribute printed versions of the form.(5) Fraudulent use of a form as evidence of the existence of an eligible medical condition is a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.010.(6) For a first violation of this section, the city or county attorney shall issue a warning letter to the owner or operator of the retail establishment, and to any employee of a retail establishment who denies access to an employee restroom in violation of this section, informing the owner or operator of the establishment and employee of the requirements of this section. A retail establishment or an employee of a retail establishment that violates this section after receiving a warning letter is guilty of a class 2 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.(7) A retail establishment is not required to make any physical changes to an employee restroom under this section and may require that an employee accompany a customer or a customer with an eligible medical condition to the employee restroom.(8) A retail establishment or an employee of a retail establishment is not civilly liable for any act or omission in allowing a customer or a customer with an eligible medical condition to use an employee restroom if the act or omission meets all of the following:(a) It is not willful or grossly negligent;(b) It occurs in an area of the retail establishment that is not accessible to the public; and(c) It results in an injury to or death of the customer or the customer with an eligible medical condition or any individual other than an employee accompanying the customer or the customer with an eligible medical condition.Sec. 93. RCW 70.128.120 and 2025 c 58 s 5141 are each amended to read as follows:Each adult family home provider, applicant, and each resident manager shall have the following minimum qualifications, except that only applicants are required to meet the provisions of subsections (10) and (11) of this section:(1) Twenty-one years of age or older;(2) For those applying after September 1, 2001, to be licensed as providers, and for resident managers whose employment begins after September 1, 2001, a United States high school diploma or high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 or any English or translated government documentation of the following:(a) Successful completion of government-approved public or private school education in a foreign country that includes an annual average of one thousand hours of instruction over twelve years or no less than twelve thousand hours of instruction;(b) A foreign college, foreign university, or United States community college two-year diploma;(c) Admission to, or completion of coursework at, a foreign university or college for which credit was granted;(d) Admission to, or completion of coursework at, a United States college or university for which credits were awarded;(e) Admission to, or completion of postgraduate coursework at, a United States college or university for which credits were awarded; or(f) Successful passage of the United States board examination for registered nursing, or any professional medical occupation for which college or university education preparation was required;(3) Good moral and responsible character and reputation;(4) Literacy and the ability to communicate in the English language;(5) Management and administrative ability to carry out the requirements of this chapter;(6) Satisfactory completion of department-approved basic training and continuing education training as required by RCW 74.39A.074, and in rules adopted by the department;(7) Satisfactory completion of department-approved, or equivalent, special care training before a provider may provide special care services to a resident;(8) Not be disqualified by a department background check;(9) For those applying to be licensed as providers, and for resident managers whose employment begins after August 24, 2011, at least one thousand hours in the previous sixty months of successful, direct caregiving experience obtained after age eighteen to vulnerable adults in a licensed or contracted setting prior to operating or managing an adult family home. The applicant or resident manager must have credible evidence of the successful, direct caregiving experience or, currently hold one of the following professional licenses: Physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;(10) For applicants, proof of financial solvency, as defined in rule; and(11) Applicants must successfully complete an adult family home administration and business planning class, prior to being granted a license. The class must be a minimum of forty-eight hours of classroom time and approved by the department. The department shall promote and prioritize bilingual capabilities within available resources and when materials are available for this purpose. Under exceptional circumstances, such as the sudden and unexpected death of a provider, the department may consider granting a license to an applicant who has not completed the class but who meets all other requirements. If the department decides to grant the license due to exceptional circumstances, the applicant must have enrolled in or completed the class within four months of licensure.Sec. 94. RCW 70.180.005 and 1991 c 332 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:The legislature finds that a health care access problem exists in rural areas of the state because rural health care providers are unable to leave the community for short-term periods of time to attend required continuing education training or for personal matters because their absence would leave the community without adequate medical care coverage. The lack of adequate medical coverage in geographically remote rural communities constitutes a threat to the health and safety of the people in those communities.The legislature declares that it is in the public interest to recruit and maintain a pool of physicians, physician ((assistants))associates, pharmacists, and advanced practice registered nurses((practitioners)) willing and able on short notice to practice in rural communities on a short-term basis to meet the medical needs of the community.Sec. 95. RCW 70.180.009 and 1990 c 271 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:The legislature finds that a shortage of physicians, nurses, pharmacists, and physician ((assistants))associates exists in rural areas of the state. In addition, many education programs to train these health care providers do not include options for practical training experience in rural settings. As a result, many health care providers find their current training does not prepare them for the unique demands of rural practice.The legislature declares that the availability of rural training opportunities as a part of professional medical, nursing, pharmacist, and physician ((assistant))associate education would provide needed practical experience, serve to attract providers to rural areas, and help address the current shortage of these providers in rural Washington.Sec. 96. RCW 70.180.020 and 2025 c 58 s 5142 are each amended to read as follows:The department shall establish or contract for a health professional temporary substitute resource pool. The purpose of the pool is to provide short-term physician, physician ((assistant))associate, pharmacist, and advanced practice registered nurse personnel to rural communities where these health care providers:(1) Are unavailable due to provider shortages;(2) Need time off from practice to attend continuing education and other training programs; and(3) Need time off from practice to attend to personal matters or recover from illness.The health professional temporary substitute resource pool is intended to provide short-term assistance and should complement active health provider recruitment efforts by rural communities where shortages exist.Sec. 97. RCW 70.180.030 and 2020 c 80 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department, in cooperation with the University of Washington school of medicine, the state's registered nursing programs, the state's pharmacy programs, and other appropriate public and private agencies and associations, shall develop and keep current a register of physicians, physician ((assistants))associates, pharmacists, and advanced practice registered nurses((practitioners)) who are available to practice on a short-term basis in rural communities of the state. The department shall list only individuals who have a valid license to practice. The register shall be compiled and made available to all rural hospitals, public health departments and districts, rural pharmacies, and other appropriate public and private agencies and associations.(2) Eligible health care professionals are those licensed under chapters 18.57, 18.64, 18.71, and 18.71A RCW and advanced practice registered nurses((practitioners)) licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.(3) Participating sites may:(a) Receive reimbursement for substitute provider travel to and from the rural community and for lodging at a rate determined under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060; and(b) Receive reimbursement for the cost of malpractice insurance if the services provided are not covered by the substitute provider's or local provider's existing medical malpractice insurance. Reimbursement for malpractice insurance shall only be made available to sites that incur additional costs for substitute provider coverage.(4) The department may require rural communities to participate in health professional recruitment programs as a condition for providing a temporary substitute health care professional if the community does not have adequate permanent health care personnel. To the extent deemed appropriate and subject to funding, the department may also require communities to participate in other programs or projects, such as the rural health system project authorized in chapter 70.175 RCW, that are designed to assist communities to reorganize the delivery of rural health care services.(5) A participating site may receive reimbursement for substitute provider assistance as provided for in subsection (3) of this section for up to ninety days during any twelve-month period. The department may modify or waive this limitation should it determine that the health and safety of the community warrants a waiver or modification.(6) Participating sites shall:(a) Be responsible for all salary expenses for the temporary substitute provider.(b) Provide the temporary substitute provider with referral and backup coverage information.Sec. 98. RCW 70.180.040 and 2025 c 58 s 5143 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Requests for a temporary substitute health care professional may be made to the department by the certified health plan, local rural hospital, public health department or district, community health clinic, local practicing physician, physician ((assistant))associate, pharmacist, or advanced practice registered nurse, or local city or county government.(2) The department may provide directly or contract for services to:(a) Establish a manner and form for receiving requests;(b) Minimize paperwork and compliance requirements for participant health care professionals and entities requesting assistance; and(c) Respond promptly to all requests for assistance.(3) The department may apply for, receive, and accept gifts and other payments, including property and services, from any governmental or other public or private entity or person, and may make arrangements as to the use of these receipts to operate the pool. The department shall make available upon request to the appropriate legislative committees information concerning the source, amount, and use of such gifts or payments.Sec. 99. RCW 70.225.040 and 2020 c 80 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All information submitted to the prescription monitoring program is confidential, exempt from public inspection, copying, and disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW, not subject to subpoena or discovery in any civil action, and protected under federal health care information privacy requirements, except as provided in subsections (3) through (6) of this section. Such confidentiality and exemption from disclosure continues whenever information from the prescription monitoring program is provided to a requestor under subsection (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section except when used in proceedings specifically authorized in subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section.(2) The department must maintain procedures to ensure that the privacy and confidentiality of all information collected, recorded, transmitted, and maintained including, but not limited to, the prescriber, requestor, dispenser, patient, and persons who received prescriptions from dispensers, is not disclosed to persons except as in subsections (3) through (6) of this section.(3) The department may provide data in the prescription monitoring program to the following persons:(a) Persons authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled substances or legend drugs, for the purpose of providing medical or pharmaceutical care for their patients;(b) An individual who requests the individual's own prescription monitoring information;(c) A health professional licensing, certification, or regulatory agency or entity in this or another jurisdiction. Consistent with current practice, the data provided may be used in legal proceedings concerning the license;(d) Appropriate law enforcement or prosecutorial officials, including local, state, and federal officials and officials of federally recognized tribes, who are engaged in a bona fide specific investigation involving a designated person;(e) The director or the director's designee within the health care authority regarding medicaid recipients and members of the health care authority self-funded or self-insured health plans;(f) The director or director's designee within the department of labor and industries regarding workers' compensation claimants;(g) The director or the director's designee within the department of corrections regarding offenders committed to the department of corrections;(h) Other entities under grand jury subpoena or court order;(i) Personnel of the department for purposes of:(i) Assessing prescribing and treatment practices and morbidity and mortality related to use of controlled substances and developing and implementing initiatives to protect the public health including, but not limited to, initiatives to address opioid use disorder;(ii) Providing quality improvement feedback to prescribers, including comparison of their respective data to aggregate data for prescribers with the same type of license and same specialty; and(iii) Administration and enforcement of this chapter or chapter 69.50 RCW;(j) Personnel of a test site that meet the standards under RCW 70.225.070 pursuant to an agreement between the test site and a person identified in (a) of this subsection to provide assistance in determining which medications are being used by an identified patient who is under the care of that person;(k) A health care facility or entity for the purpose of providing medical or pharmaceutical care to the patients of the facility or entity, or for quality improvement purposes if the facility or entity is licensed by the department or is licensed or certified under chapter 71.24, 71.34, or 71.05 RCW or is an entity deemed for purposes of chapter 71.24 RCW to meet state minimum standards as a result of accreditation by a recognized behavioral health accrediting body, or is operated by the federal government or a federally recognized Indian tribe;(l) A health care provider group of five or more prescribers or dispensers for purposes of providing medical or pharmaceutical care to the patients of the provider group, or for quality improvement purposes if all the prescribers or dispensers in the provider group are licensed by the department or the provider group is operated by the federal government or a federally recognized Indian tribe;(m) The local health officer of a local health jurisdiction for the purposes of patient follow-up and care coordination following a controlled substance overdose event. For the purposes of this subsection "local health officer" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.05.010; and(n) The coordinated care electronic tracking program developed in response to section 213, chapter 7, Laws of 2012 2nd sp. sess., commonly referred to as the seven best practices in emergency medicine, for the purposes of providing:(i) Prescription monitoring program data to emergency department personnel when the patient registers in the emergency department; and(ii) Notice to local health officers who have made opioid-related overdose a notifiable condition under RCW 70.05.070 as authorized by rules adopted under RCW 43.20.050, providers, appropriate care coordination staff, and prescribers listed in the patient's prescription monitoring program record that the patient has experienced a controlled substance overdose event. The department shall determine the content and format of the notice in consultation with the Washington state hospital association, Washington state medical association, and Washington state health care authority, and the notice may be modified as necessary to reflect current needs and best practices.(4) The department shall, on at least a quarterly basis, and pursuant to a schedule determined by the department, provide a facility or entity identified under subsection (3)(k) of this section or a provider group identified under subsection (3)(l) of this section with facility or entity and individual prescriber information if the facility, entity, or provider group:(a) Uses the information only for internal quality improvement and individual prescriber quality improvement feedback purposes and does not use the information as the sole basis for any medical staff sanction or adverse employment action; and(b) Provides to the department a standardized list of current prescribers of the facility, entity, or provider group. The specific facility, entity, or provider group information provided pursuant to this subsection and the requirements under this subsection must be determined by the department in consultation with the Washington state hospital association, Washington state medical association, and Washington state health care authority, and may be modified as necessary to reflect current needs and best practices.(5)(a) The department may publish or provide data to public or private entities for statistical, research, or educational purposes after removing information that could be used directly or indirectly to identify individual patients, requestors, dispensers, prescribers, and persons who received prescriptions from dispensers. Direct and indirect patient identifiers may be provided for research that has been approved by the Washington state institutional review board and by the department through a data-sharing agreement.(b)(i) The department may provide dispenser and prescriber data and data that includes indirect patient identifiers to the Washington state hospital association for use solely in connection with its coordinated quality improvement program maintained under RCW 43.70.510 after entering into a data use agreement as specified in RCW 43.70.052(((8))) with the association. The department may provide dispenser and prescriber data and data that includes indirect patient identifiers to the Washington state medical association for use solely in connection with its coordinated quality improvement program maintained under RCW 43.70.510 after entering into a data use agreement with the association.(ii) The department may provide data including direct and indirect patient identifiers to the department of social and health services office of research and data analysis, the department of labor and industries, and the health care authority for research that has been approved by the Washington state institutional review board and, with a data-sharing agreement approved by the department, for public health purposes to improve the prevention or treatment of substance use disorders.(iii) The department may provide a prescriber feedback report to the largest health professional association representing each of the prescribing professions. The health professional associations must distribute the feedback report to prescribers engaged in the professions represented by the associations for quality improvement purposes, so long as the reports contain no direct patient identifiers that could be used to identify individual patients, dispensers, and persons who received prescriptions from dispensers, and the association enters into a written data-sharing agreement with the department. However, reports may include indirect patient identifiers as agreed to by the department and the association in a written data-sharing agreement.(c) For the purposes of this subsection:(i) "Indirect patient identifiers" means data that may include: Hospital or provider identifiers, a five-digit zip code, county, state, and country of resident; dates that include month and year; age in years; and race and ethnicity; but does not include the patient's first name; middle name; last name; social security number; control or medical record number; zip code plus four digits; dates that include day, month, and year; or admission and discharge date in combination; and(ii) "Prescribing professions" include:(A) Allopathic physicians and physician ((assistants))associates;(B) Osteopathic physicians;(C) Podiatric physicians;(D) Dentists; and(E) Advanced practice registered nurses((practitioners)).(6) The department may enter into agreements to exchange prescription monitoring program data with established prescription monitoring programs in other jurisdictions. Under these agreements, the department may share prescription monitoring system data containing direct and indirect patient identifiers with other jurisdictions through a clearinghouse or prescription monitoring program data exchange that meets federal health care information privacy requirements. Data the department receives from other jurisdictions must be retained, used, protected, and destroyed as provided by the agreements to the extent consistent with the laws in this state.(7) Persons authorized in subsections (3) through (6) of this section to receive data in the prescription monitoring program from the department, acting in good faith, are immune from any civil, criminal, disciplinary, or administrative liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed for acting under this chapter.Sec. 100. RCW 70.245.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5144 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Adult" means an individual who is 18 years of age or older.(2) "Attending qualified medical provider" means the qualified medical provider who has primary responsibility for the care of the patient and treatment of the patient's terminal disease.(3) "Competent" means that, in the opinion of a court or in the opinion of the patient's attending qualified medical provider, consulting qualified medical provider, psychiatrist, or psychologist, a patient has the ability to make and communicate an informed decision to health care providers, including communication through persons familiar with the patient's manner of communicating if those persons are available.(4) "Consulting qualified medical provider" means a qualified medical provider who is qualified by specialty or experience to make a professional diagnosis and prognosis regarding the patient's disease.(5) "Counseling" means one or more consultations as necessary between a state licensed psychiatrist, psychologist, independent clinical social worker, advanced social worker, mental health counselor, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse and a patient for the purpose of determining that the patient is competent and not suffering from a psychiatric or psychological disorder or depression causing impaired judgment.(6) "Health care provider" means a person licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law to administer health care or dispense medication in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession, and includes a health care facility.(7) "Informed decision" means a decision by a qualified patient, to request and obtain a prescription for medication that the qualified patient may self-administer to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner, that is based on an appreciation of the relevant facts and after being fully informed by the attending qualified medical provider of:(a) His or her medical diagnosis;(b) His or her prognosis;(c) The potential risks associated with taking the medication to be prescribed;(d) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed; and(e) The feasible alternatives including, but not limited to, comfort care, hospice care, and pain control.(8) "Medically confirmed" means the medical opinion of the attending qualified medical provider has been confirmed by a consulting qualified medical provider who has examined the patient and the patient's relevant medical records.(9) "Patient" means a person who is under the care of an attending qualified medical provider.(10) "Qualified medical provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW, a physician ((assistant))associate licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.(11) "Qualified patient" means a competent adult who is a resident of Washington state and has satisfied the requirements of this chapter in order to obtain a prescription for medication that the qualified patient may self-administer to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner.(12) "Self-administer" means a qualified patient's act of ingesting medication to end his or her life in a humane and dignified manner.(13) "Terminal disease" means an incurable and irreversible disease that has been medically confirmed and will, within reasonable medical judgment, produce death within six months.Sec. 101. RCW 71.05.020 and 2025 c 226 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" has the same meaning as under RCW 71.24.025;(2) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;(7) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;(8) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder;(9) "Behavioral health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health, substance use disorder, or co-occurring disorder services to persons with behavioral health disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to: Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section; community mental health service delivery systems or community behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025; licensed or certified behavioral health agencies under RCW 71.24.037; an entity with a tribal attestation that it meets minimum standards or a licensed or certified behavioral health agency as defined in RCW 71.24.025; facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW; approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section; secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities as defined in this section; and correctional facilities operated by state, local, and tribal governments;(10) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105;(11) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;(12) "Community behavioral health agency" has the same meaning as "licensed or certified behavioral health agency" defined in RCW 71.24.025;(13) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;(14) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual;(15) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;(16) "Department" means the department of health;(17) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county, by an entity appointed by the county, or by the authority in consultation with a tribe or after meeting and conferring with an Indian health care provider, to perform the duties specified in this chapter;(18) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;(19) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;(20) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(6);(21) "Director" means the director of the authority;(22) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;(23) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;(24) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;(25) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;(26) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;(27) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.05.820;(28) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a behavioral health facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;(29) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;(30) "In need of assisted outpatient treatment" refers to a person who meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment established under RCW 71.05.148;(31) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;(32) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;(33) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;(34) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130;(35) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585. This term includes: Treatment pursuant to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320; treatment pursuant to a conditional release under RCW 71.05.340; and treatment pursuant to an assisted outpatient treatment order under RCW 71.05.148;(36) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;(37) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;(38) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder;(39) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;(40) "Mental health professional" means an individual practicing within the mental health professional's statutory scope of practice who is:(a) A psychiatrist, psychologist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, as defined in this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW;(b) A mental health counselor, mental health counselor associate, marriage and family therapist, or marriage and family therapist associate, as defined in chapter 18.225 RCW;(c) A certified or licensed agency affiliated counselor, as defined in chapter 18.19 RCW; or(d) A licensed psychological associate as described in chapter 18.83 RCW;(41) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;(42) "Physician ((assistant))associate" means a person licensed as a physician ((assistant))associate under chapter 18.71A RCW;(43) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders;(44) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;(45) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse ((practitioner)) pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;(46) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;(47) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;(48) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;(49) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;(50) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;(51) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;(52) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:(a) Provide the following services:(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;(ii) Clinical stabilization services;(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health;(53) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;(54) "State facility" means:(a) The center for behavioral health and learning located on the University of Washington medical center northwest campus; and(b) Facilities owned or operated by the department of social and health services that are not state hospitals that provide inpatient services to individuals under this chapter;(55) "State hospital" means a hospital designated under RCW 72.23.020;(56) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;(57) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW;(58) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;(59) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for behavioral health disorders, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;(60) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025;(61) "Video," unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology. "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment;(62) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.Sec. 102. RCW 71.05.020 and 2025 c 226 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" has the same meaning as under RCW 71.24.025;(2) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;(3) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;(4) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical antipsychotic medications;(5) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for persons with a substance use disorder provided by a treatment program certified by the department as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW;(6) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a patient;(7) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority;(8) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder;(9) "Behavioral health service provider" means a public or private agency that provides mental health, substance use disorder, or co-occurring disorder services to persons with behavioral health disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from public sources. This includes, but is not limited to: Hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW; evaluation and treatment facilities as defined in this section; community mental health service delivery systems or community behavioral health programs as defined in RCW 71.24.025; licensed or certified behavioral health agencies under RCW 71.24.037; an entity with a tribal attestation that it meets minimum standards or a licensed or certified behavioral health agency as defined in RCW 71.24.025; facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration under chapter 10.77 RCW; approved substance use disorder treatment programs as defined in this section; secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities as defined in this section; and correctional facilities operated by state, local, and tribal governments;(10) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105;(11) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;(12) "Community behavioral health agency" has the same meaning as "licensed or certified behavioral health agency" defined in RCW 71.24.025;(13) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;(14) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual;(15) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment;(16) "Department" means the department of health;(17) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health professional appointed by the county, by an entity appointed by the county, or by the authority in consultation with a tribe or after meeting and conferring with an Indian health care provider, to perform the duties specified in this chapter;(18) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter;(19) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services;(20) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW 71A.10.020(6);(21) "Director" means the director of the authority;(22) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order;(23) "Drug addiction" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on psychoactive chemicals, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning;(24) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care, and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a mental disorder, and which is licensed or certified as such by the department. The authority may certify single beds as temporary evaluation and treatment beds under RCW 71.05.745. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility which is part of, or operated by, the department of social and health services or any federal agency will not require certification. No correctional institution or facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter;(25) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration from safe behavior evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;(26) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged criminal conduct;(27) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.05.820;(28) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a behavioral health facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction;(29) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;(30) "In need of assisted outpatient treatment" refers to a person who meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment established under RCW 71.05.148;(31) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences;(32) "Intoxicated person" means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals;(33) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;(34) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130;(35) "Less restrictive alternative treatment" means a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.05.585. This term includes: Treatment pursuant to a less restrictive alternative treatment order under RCW 71.05.240 or 71.05.320; treatment pursuant to a conditional release under RCW 71.05.340; and treatment pursuant to an assisted outpatient treatment order under RCW 71.05.148;(36) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington;(37) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced by behavior which has caused harm, substantial pain, or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of harm to themselves or others; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts;(38) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder;(39) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's cognitive or volitional functions;(40) "Mental health professional" means an individual practicing within the mental health professional's statutory scope of practice who is:(a) A psychiatrist, psychologist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or social worker, as defined in this chapter and chapter 71.34 RCW;(b) A mental health counselor, mental health counselor associate, marriage and family therapist, or marriage and family therapist associate, as defined in chapter 18.225 RCW;(c) A certified or licensed agency affiliated counselor, as defined in chapter 18.19 RCW; or(d) A licensed psychological associate as described in chapter 18.83 RCW;(41) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment;(42) "Physician ((assistant))associate" means a person licensed as a physician ((assistant))associate under chapter 18.71A RCW;(43) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders;(44) "Professional person" means a mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or designated crisis responder and shall also mean a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;(45) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a person who is licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse ((practitioner)) pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;(46) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American medical association or the American osteopathic association and is certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology;(47) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;(48) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, approved substance use disorder treatment program, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders, if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments;(49) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter;(50) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW;(51) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health, or his or her designee;(52) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:(a) Provide the following services:(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;(ii) Clinical stabilization services;(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health;(53) "Severe deterioration from safe behavior" means that a person will, if not treated, suffer or continue to suffer severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress, and this distress is associated with significant impairment of judgment, reason, or behavior;(54) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010;(55) "State facility" means:(a) The center for behavioral health and learning located on the University of Washington medical center northwest campus; and(b) Facilities owned or operated by the department of social and health services that are not state hospitals that provide inpatient services to individuals under this chapter;(56) "State hospital" means a hospital designated under RCW 72.23.020;(57) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances;(58) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW;(59) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties;(60) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for behavioral health disorders, which are maintained by the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations and their staffs, managed care organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department of social and health services, the department, the authority, behavioral health administrative services organizations, managed care organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;(61) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025;(62) "Video," unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology. "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment;(63) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.Sec. 103. RCW 71.05.148 and 2025 c 58 s 5145 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment if the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence pursuant to a petition filed under this section that:(a) The person has a behavioral health disorder;(b) Based on a clinical determination and in view of the person's treatment history and current behavior, at least one of the following is true:(i) The person is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision and the person's condition is substantially deteriorating; or(ii) The person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in grave disability or a likelihood of serious harm to the person or to others;(c) The person has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for his or her behavioral health disorder that has:(i) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating hospitalization of the person, or the person's receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a state or tribal correctional facility or local correctional facility, provided that the 36-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred within the 36-month period;(ii) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating emergency medical care or hospitalization for behavioral health-related medical conditions including overdose, infected abscesses, sepsis, endocarditis, or other maladies, or a significant factor in behavior which resulted in the person's incarceration in a state, tribal, or local correctional facility; or(iii) Resulted in one or more violent acts, threats, or attempts to cause serious physical harm to the person or another within the 48 months prior to the filing of the petition, provided that the 48-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred during the 48-month period;(d) Participation in an assisted outpatient treatment program would be the least restrictive alternative necessary to ensure the person's recovery and stability; and(e) The person will benefit from assisted outpatient treatment.(2) The following individuals may directly file a petition for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that a person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment:(a) The director of a hospital where the person is hospitalized or the director's designee;(b) The director of a behavioral health service provider providing behavioral health care or residential services to the person or the director's designee;(c) The person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional or one who has evaluated the person;(d) A designated crisis responder;(e) A release planner from a corrections facility; or(f) An emergency room physician.(3) A court order for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment may be effective for up to 18 months. The petitioner must personally interview the person, unless the person refuses an interview, to determine whether the person will voluntarily receive appropriate treatment.(4) The petitioner must allege specific facts based on personal observation, evaluation, or investigation, and must consider the reliability or credibility of any person providing information material to the petition.(5) The petition must include:(a) A statement of the circumstances under which the person's condition was made known and the basis for the opinion, from personal observation or investigation, that the person is in need of assisted outpatient treatment. The petitioner must state which specific facts come from personal observation and specify what other sources of information the petitioner has relied upon to form this belief;(b) A declaration from a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, advanced practice registered nurse, or the person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, who has examined the person no more than 10 days prior to the submission of the petition and who is willing to testify in support of the petition, or who alternatively has made appropriate attempts to examine the person within the same period but has not been successful in obtaining the person's cooperation, and who is willing to testify to the reasons they believe that the person meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment. If the declaration is provided by the person's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, it must be cosigned by a supervising physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse who certifies that they have reviewed the declaration;(c) The declarations of additional witnesses, if any, supporting the petition for assisted outpatient treatment;(d) The name of an agency, provider, or facility that agrees to provide less restrictive alternative treatment if the petition is granted by the court; and(e) If the person is detained in a state hospital, inpatient treatment facility, jail, or correctional facility at the time the petition is filed, the anticipated release date of the person and any other details needed to facilitate successful reentry and transition into the community.(6)(a) Upon receipt of a petition meeting all requirements of this section, the court shall fix a date for a hearing:(i) No sooner than three days or later than seven days after the date of service or as stipulated by the parties or, upon a showing of good cause, no later than 30 days after the date of service; or(ii) If the respondent is hospitalized at the time of filing of the petition, before discharge of the respondent and in sufficient time to arrange for a continuous transition from inpatient treatment to assisted outpatient treatment.(b) A copy of the petition and notice of hearing shall be served, in the same manner as a summons, on the petitioner, the respondent, the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, a current provider, if any, and a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW, if any.(c) If the respondent has a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW who wishes to provide testimony at the hearing, the court shall afford the surrogate decision maker or agent an opportunity to testify.(d) The respondent shall be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings.(e) If the respondent fails to appear at the hearing after notice, the court may conduct the hearing in the respondent's absence; provided that the respondent's counsel is present.(f) If the respondent has refused to be examined by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, the court may order a mental examination of the respondent. The examination of the respondent may be performed by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition. If the examination is performed by another qualified professional, the examining qualified professional shall be authorized to consult with the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition.(g) If the respondent has refused to be examined by a qualified professional and the court finds reasonable grounds to believe that the allegations of the petition are true, the court may issue a written order directing a peace officer who has completed crisis intervention training to detain and transport the respondent to a provider for examination by a qualified professional. A respondent detained pursuant to this subsection shall be detained no longer than necessary to complete the examination and in no event longer than 24 hours.(7) If the petition involves a person whom the petitioner or behavioral health administrative services organization knows, or has reason to know, is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the petitioner or behavioral health administrative services organization shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible, but before the hearing and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider must include a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the petitioner or the behavioral health administrative services organization to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section.(8) A petition for assisted outpatient treatment filed under this section shall be adjudicated under RCW 71.05.240.(9) After January 1, 2023, a petition for assisted outpatient treatment must be filed on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts.Sec. 104. RCW 71.05.154 and 2025 c 58 s 5146 are each amended to read as follows:If a person subject to evaluation under RCW 71.05.150 or 71.05.153 is located in an emergency room at the time of evaluation, the designated crisis responder conducting the evaluation shall take serious consideration of observations and opinions by an examining emergency room physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate in determining whether detention under this chapter is appropriate. The designated crisis responder must document his or her consultation with this professional, if the professional is available, or his or her review of the professional's written observations or opinions regarding whether detention of the person is appropriate.Sec. 105. RCW 71.05.210 and 2025 c 58 s 5147 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each person involuntarily detained and accepted or admitted at an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program:(a) Shall, within twenty-four hours of his or her admission or acceptance at the facility, not counting time periods prior to medical clearance, be examined and evaluated by:(i) One physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse; and(ii) One mental health professional. If the person is detained for substance use disorder evaluation and treatment, the person may be examined by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional; and(b) Shall receive such treatment and care as his or her condition requires including treatment on an outpatient basis for the period that he or she is detained, except that, beginning twenty-four hours prior to a trial or hearing pursuant to RCW 71.05.215, 71.05.240, 71.05.310, 71.05.320, 71.05.590, or 71.05.217, the individual may refuse psychiatric medications, but may not refuse: (i) Any other medication previously prescribed by a person licensed under Title 18 RCW; or (ii) emergency lifesaving treatment, and the individual shall be informed at an appropriate time of his or her right of such refusal. The person shall be detained up to one hundred twenty hours, if, in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee, the person presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled. A person who has been detained for one hundred twenty hours shall no later than the end of such period be released, unless referred for further care on a voluntary basis, or detained pursuant to court order for further treatment as provided in this chapter.(2) If, at any time during the involuntary treatment hold and following the initial examination and evaluation, the mental health professional or substance use disorder professional and licensed physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse determine that the initial needs of the person, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, or, if detained to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility then the person shall be referred to the more appropriate placement for the remainder of the current commitment period without any need for further court review.(3) An evaluation and treatment center, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admitting or accepting any person pursuant to this chapter whose physical condition reveals the need for hospitalization shall assure that such person is transferred to an appropriate hospital for evaluation or admission for treatment. Notice of such fact shall be given to the court, the designated attorney, and the designated crisis responder and the court shall order such continuance in proceedings under this chapter as may be necessary, but in no event may this continuance be more than fourteen days.Sec. 106. RCW 71.05.215 and 2025 c 58 s 5148 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person found to be gravely disabled or to present a likelihood of serious harm as a result of a behavioral health disorder has a right to refuse antipsychotic medication unless it is determined that the failure to medicate may result in a likelihood of serious harm or substantial deterioration or substantially prolong the length of involuntary commitment and there is no less intrusive course of treatment than medication in the best interest of that person.(2) The authority shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this chapter. These rules shall include:(a) An attempt to obtain the informed consent of the person prior to administration of antipsychotic medication.(b) For short-term treatment up to thirty days, the right to refuse antipsychotic medications unless there is an additional concurring medical opinion approving medication by a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or physician or physician ((assistant))associate in consultation with a mental health professional with prescriptive authority.(c) For continued treatment beyond thirty days through the hearing on any petition filed under RCW 71.05.217, the right to periodic review of the decision to medicate by the medical director or designee.(d) Administration of antipsychotic medication in an emergency and review of this decision within twenty-four hours. An emergency exists if the person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, and medically acceptable alternatives to administration of antipsychotic medications are not available or are unlikely to be successful; and in the opinion of the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, the person's condition constitutes an emergency requiring the treatment be instituted prior to obtaining a second medical opinion.(e) Documentation in the medical record of the attempt by the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse to obtain informed consent and the reasons why antipsychotic medication is being administered over the person's objection or lack of consent.Sec. 107. RCW 71.05.217 and 2025 c 58 s 5149 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Insofar as danger to the individual or others is not created, each person involuntarily detained, treated in a less restrictive alternative course of treatment, or committed for treatment and evaluation pursuant to this chapter shall have, in addition to other rights not specifically withheld by law, the following rights, a list of which shall be prominently posted in all facilities, institutions, and hospitals providing such services:(a) To wear his or her own clothes and to keep and use his or her own personal possessions, except when deprivation of same is essential to protect the safety of the resident or other persons;(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of his or her own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;(c) To have access to individual storage space for his or her private use;(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls;(f) To have ready access to letter writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;(g) To have the right to individualized care and adequate treatment;(h) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with professional persons;(i) To not be denied access to treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination in addition to the treatment otherwise proposed;(j) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(4) or the performance of electroconvulsant therapy or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the following standards and procedures:(i) The administration of antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy shall not be ordered unless the petitioning party proves by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that there exists a compelling state interest that justifies overriding the patient's lack of consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications or electroconvulsant therapy, that the proposed treatment is necessary and effective, and that medically acceptable alternative forms of treatment are not available, have not been successful, or are not likely to be effective.(ii) The court shall make specific findings of fact concerning: (A) The existence of one or more compelling state interests; (B) the necessity and effectiveness of the treatment; and (C) the person's desires regarding the proposed treatment. If the patient is unable to make a rational and informed decision about consenting to or refusing the proposed treatment, the court shall make a substituted judgment for the patient as if he or she were competent to make such a determination.(iii) The person shall be present at any hearing on a request to administer antipsychotic medication or electroconvulsant therapy filed pursuant to this subsection. The person has the right: (A) To be represented by an attorney; (B) to present evidence; (C) to cross-examine witnesses; (D) to have the rules of evidence enforced; (E) to remain silent; (F) to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file; and (G) to be given reasonable notice and an opportunity to prepare for the hearing. The court may appoint a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, psychologist within their scope of practice, physician ((assistant))associate, or physician to examine and testify on behalf of such person. The court shall appoint a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, psychologist within their scope of practice, physician ((assistant))associate, or physician designated by such person or the person's counsel to testify on behalf of the person in cases where an order for electroconvulsant therapy is sought.(iv) An order for the administration of antipsychotic medications entered following a hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be effective for the period of the current involuntary treatment order, and any interim period during which the person is awaiting trial or hearing on a new petition for involuntary treatment or involuntary medication.(v) Any person detained pursuant to RCW 71.05.320(4), who subsequently refuses antipsychotic medication, shall be entitled to the procedures set forth in this subsection.(vi) Antipsychotic medication may be administered to a nonconsenting person detained or committed pursuant to this chapter without a court order pursuant to RCW 71.05.215(2) or under the following circumstances:(A) A person presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm;(B) Medically acceptable alternatives to administration of antipsychotic medications are not available, have not been successful, or are not likely to be effective; and(C)(I) In the opinion of the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse with responsibility for treatment of the person, or his or her designee, the person's condition constitutes an emergency requiring the treatment be instituted before a judicial hearing as authorized pursuant to this section can be held.(II) If antipsychotic medications are administered over a person's lack of consent pursuant to this subsection, a petition for an order authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medications shall be filed on the next judicial day. The hearing shall be held within two judicial days. If deemed necessary by the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse with responsibility for the treatment of the person, administration of antipsychotic medications may continue until the hearing is held;(k) To dispose of property and sign contracts unless such person has been adjudicated an incompetent in a court proceeding directed to that particular issue;(l) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances;(m) To not be denied access to treatment by cultural or spiritual means through practices that are in accordance with a tribal or cultural tradition in addition to the treatment otherwise proposed.(2) Every person involuntarily detained or committed under the provisions of this chapter is entitled to all the rights set forth in this chapter and retains all rights not denied him or her under this chapter except as limited by chapter 9.41 RCW.(3) No person may be presumed incompetent as a consequence of receiving evaluation or treatment for a behavioral health disorder. Competency may not be determined or withdrawn except under the provisions of chapter 10.77 RCW.(4) Subject to RCW 71.05.745 and related regulations, persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this chapter must be given a reasonable choice of an available physician, physician ((assistant))associate, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or other professional person qualified to provide such services.(5) Whenever any person is detained under this chapter, the person must be advised that unless the person is released or voluntarily admits himself or herself for treatment within 120 hours of the initial detention, a judicial hearing must be held in a superior court within 120 hours to determine whether there is probable cause to detain the person for up to an additional 14 days based on an allegation that because of a behavioral health disorder the person presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled, and that at the probable cause hearing the person has the following rights:(a) To communicate immediately with an attorney; to have an attorney appointed if the person is indigent; and to be told the name and address of the attorney that has been designated;(b) To remain silent, and to know that any statement the person makes may be used against him or her;(c) To present evidence on the person's behalf;(d) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;(e) To be proceeded against by the rules of evidence;(f) To have the court appoint a reasonably available independent professional person to examine the person and testify in the hearing, at public expense unless the person is able to bear the cost;(g) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file; and(h) To refuse psychiatric medications, including antipsychotic medication beginning 24 hours prior to the probable cause hearing.(6) The judicial hearing described in subsection (5) of this section must be held according to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section and rules promulgated by the supreme court.(7)(a) Privileges between patients and physicians, physician ((assistants))associates, psychologists, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurses are deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges are waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained person or the public.(b) The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained person for purposes of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained person or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.(c) The record maker may not be required to testify in order to introduce medical or psychological records of the detained person so long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions of the record which contain opinions as to the detained person's mental state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such conclusions is available for cross-examination.(8) Nothing contained in this chapter prohibits the patient from petitioning by writ of habeas corpus for release.(9) Nothing in this section permits any person to knowingly violate a no-contact order or a condition of an active judgment and sentence or an active condition of supervision by the department of corrections.(10) The rights set forth under this section apply equally to 90-day or 180-day hearings under RCW 71.05.310.Sec. 108. RCW 71.05.230 and 2025 c 58 s 5150 are each amended to read as follows:A person detained for one hundred twenty hours of evaluation and treatment may be committed for not more than fourteen additional days of involuntary intensive treatment or ninety additional days of a less restrictive alternative treatment. A petition may only be filed if the following conditions are met:(1) The professional staff of the facility providing evaluation services has analyzed the person's condition and finds that the condition is caused by a behavioral health disorder and results in: (a) A likelihood of serious harm; or (b) the person being gravely disabled; and are prepared to testify those conditions are met; and(2) The person has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment and the professional staff of the facility has evidence that he or she has not in good faith volunteered; and(3) The facility providing intensive treatment is certified to provide such treatment by the department or under RCW 71.05.745; and(4)(a)(i) The professional staff of the facility or the designated crisis responder has filed a petition with the court for a fourteen day involuntary detention or a ninety day less restrictive alternative. The petition must be signed by:(A) One physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse; and(B) One physician, physician ((assistant))associate, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or mental health professional.(ii) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced practice registered nurse instead of a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse. The persons signing the petition must have examined the person.(b) If involuntary detention is sought the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled and that there are no less restrictive alternatives to detention in the best interest of such person or others. The petition shall state specifically that less restrictive alternative treatment was considered and specify why treatment less restrictive than detention is not appropriate. If an involuntary less restrictive alternative is sought, the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled and shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services; and(5) A copy of the petition has been served on the detained person, his or her attorney, and his or her guardian, if any, prior to the probable cause hearing; and(6) The court at the time the petition was filed and before the probable cause hearing has appointed counsel to represent such person if no other counsel has appeared; and(7) The petition reflects that the person was informed of the loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed for mental health treatment; and(8) At the conclusion of the initial commitment period, the professional staff of the agency or facility or the designated crisis responder may petition for an additional period of either 90 days of less restrictive alternative treatment or 90 days of involuntary intensive treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.290; and(9) If the hospital or facility designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary treatment, the outpatient facility so designated to provide less restrictive alternative treatment has agreed to assume such responsibility.Sec. 109. RCW 71.05.290 and 2025 c 58 s 5151 are each amended to read as follows:(1) At any time during a person's 14-day intensive treatment period, the professional person in charge of a treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the designated crisis responder may petition the superior court for an order requiring such person to undergo an additional period of treatment. Such petition must be based on one or more of the grounds set forth in RCW 71.05.280.(2)(a)(i) The petition shall summarize the facts which support the need for further commitment and shall be supported by affidavits based on an examination of the patient and signed by:(A) One physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse; and(B) One physician, physician ((assistant))associate, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or mental health professional.(ii) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced practice registered nurse instead of a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse.(b) The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained person which supports the petition and shall explain what, if any, less restrictive treatments which are alternatives to detention are available to such person, and shall state the willingness of the affiant to testify to such facts in subsequent judicial proceedings under this chapter. If less restrictive alternative treatment is sought, the petition shall set forth any recommendations for less restrictive alternative treatment services.(3) If a person has been determined to be incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.645(7), then the professional person in charge of the treatment facility or his or her professional designee or the designated crisis responder may directly file a petition for 180-day treatment under RCW 71.05.280(3), or for 90-day treatment under RCW 71.05.280 (1), (2), or (4). No petition for initial detention or 14-day detention is required before such a petition may be filed.Sec. 110. RCW 71.05.300 and 2025 c 58 s 5152 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The petition for ninety day treatment shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court at least three days before expiration of the fourteen-day period of intensive treatment. The clerk shall set a trial setting date as provided in RCW 71.05.310 on the next judicial day after the date of filing the petition and notify the designated crisis responder. The designated crisis responder shall immediately notify the person detained, his or her attorney, if any, and his or her guardian or conservator, if any, the prosecuting attorney, and the behavioral health administrative services organization administrator, and provide a copy of the petition to such persons as soon as possible. The behavioral health administrative services organization administrator or designee may review the petition and may appear and testify at the full hearing on the petition.(2) The attorney for the detained person shall advise him or her of his or her right to be represented by an attorney, his or her right to a jury trial, and, if the petition is for commitment for mental health treatment, his or her loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed. If the detained person is not represented by an attorney, or is indigent or is unwilling to retain an attorney, the court shall immediately appoint an attorney to represent him or her. The court shall, if requested, appoint a reasonably available licensed physician, physician ((assistant))associate, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, psychologist, psychiatrist, or other professional person, designated by the detained person to examine and testify on behalf of the detained person.(3) The court may, if requested, also appoint a professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 to seek less restrictive alternative courses of treatment and to testify on behalf of the detained person. In the case of a person with a developmental disability who has been determined to be incompetent pursuant to RCW 10.77.645(7), the appointed professional person under this section shall be a developmental disabilities professional.Sec. 111. RCW 71.05.585 and 2025 c 58 s 5153 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Less restrictive alternative treatment, at a minimum, includes the following services:(a) Assignment of a care coordinator;(b) An intake evaluation with the provider of the less restrictive alternative treatment;(c) A psychiatric evaluation, a substance use disorder evaluation, or both;(d) A schedule of regular contacts with the provider of the treatment services for the duration of the order;(e) A transition plan addressing access to continued services at the expiration of the order;(f) An individual crisis plan;(g) Consultation about the formation of a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW; and(h) Notification to the care coordinator assigned in (a) of this subsection if reasonable efforts to engage the client fail to produce substantial compliance with court-ordered treatment conditions.(2) Less restrictive alternative treatment may additionally include requirements to participate in the following services:(a) Medication management;(b) Psychotherapy;(c) Nursing;(d) Substance use disorder counseling;(e) Residential treatment;(f) Partial hospitalization;(g) Intensive outpatient treatment;(h) Support for housing, benefits, education, and employment; and(i) Periodic court review.(3) If the person was provided with involuntary medication under RCW 71.05.215 or pursuant to a judicial order during the involuntary commitment period, the less restrictive alternative treatment order may authorize the less restrictive alternative treatment provider or its designee to administer involuntary antipsychotic medication to the person if the provider has attempted and failed to obtain the informed consent of the person and there is a concurring medical opinion approving the medication by a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or physician or physician ((assistant))associate in consultation with an independent mental health professional with prescribing authority.(4) Less restrictive alternative treatment must be administered by a provider that is certified or licensed to provide or coordinate the full scope of services required under the less restrictive alternative order and that has agreed to assume this responsibility.(5) The care coordinator assigned to a person ordered to less restrictive alternative treatment must submit an individualized plan for the person's treatment services to the court that entered the order. An initial plan must be submitted as soon as possible following the intake evaluation and a revised plan must be submitted upon any subsequent modification in which a type of service is removed from or added to the treatment plan.(6) A care coordinator may disclose information and records related to mental health services pursuant to RCW 70.02.230(2)(k) for purposes of implementing less restrictive alternative treatment.(7) For the purpose of this section, "care coordinator" means a clinical practitioner who coordinates the activities of less restrictive alternative treatment. The care coordinator coordinates activities with the designated crisis responders that are necessary for enforcement and continuation of less restrictive alternative orders and is responsible for coordinating service activities with other agencies and establishing and maintaining a therapeutic relationship with the individual on a continuing basis.Sec. 112. RCW 71.05.660 and 2016 sp.s. c 29 s 420 and 2016 c 155 s 9 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Nothing in this chapter or chapter 70.02 or 71.34 RCW shall be construed to interfere with communications between physicians, physician ((assistants))associates, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners, or psychologists and patients and attorneys and clients.Sec. 113. RCW 71.06.040 and 2016 c 155 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:At a preliminary hearing upon the charge of sexual psychopathy, the court may require the testimony of two duly licensed physicians, physician ((assistants))associates, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners who have examined the defendant. If the court finds that there are reasonable grounds to believe the defendant is a sexual psychopath, the court shall order said defendant confined at the nearest state hospital for observation as to the existence of sexual psychopathy. Such observation shall be for a period of not to exceed ninety days. The defendant shall be detained in the county jail or other county facilities pending execution of such observation order by the department.Sec. 114. RCW 71.12.540 and 2025 c 58 s 5154 are each amended to read as follows:The authorities of each establishment as defined in this chapter shall place on file in the office of the establishment the recommendations made by the department of health as a result of such visits, for the purpose of consultation by such authorities, and for reference by the department representatives upon their visits. Every such establishment shall keep records of every person admitted thereto as follows and shall furnish to the department, when required, the following data: Name, age, sex, marital status, date of admission, voluntary or other commitment, name of physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, diagnosis, and date of discharge.Sec. 115. 2021 c 170 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:The legislature finds that there is a compelling and urgent need for coordinated investments in the state's behavioral health workforce. The demand for a qualified behavioral health workforce continues to grow as the availability of services throughout the state does not meet the need. According to the workforce training and education coordinating board's "behavioral health workforce: Barriers and solutions report," Washington ranks 31 out of the 50 states when comparing prevalence of mental illness to access to care. In addition, behavioral health needs have increased since the COVID-19 pandemic began and the need is expected to rise as economic and social hardships continue. Despite increased demand, the legislature finds that there continues to be difficulties in recruiting and retaining professionals who are adequately trained to meet behavioral health needs. Many of these professions require years of training, ranging from some postsecondary education to medical degrees. In addition, the legislature finds that there is significant variation in the geographic distribution of behavioral health providers across the state. Rural and underserved areas face disparities in access to care. High student loan debt loads, better pay, and lighter caseloads can drive behavioral health professionals into private practice or hospital-based settings rather than community-based settings which typically have a higher percentage of medicaid-funded services and higher caseloads.The legislature finds that there are professions and areas within the behavioral health workforce that are most in need of state investment. The legislature intends to focus coordinated efforts and investments on these areas of greatest need including, but not limited to:(1) Behavioral health apprenticeships;(2) Children's mental health professionals;(3) Peer counselors;(4) Crisis hotline agents;(5) Behavioral health residencies for professionals such as psychiatrists, advanced registered nurse practitioners, physician ((assistants))associates, and pharmacists;(6) Substance use disorder professionals;(7) Community mental health workers;(8) Clinical social workers;(9) Licensed mental health counselors;(10) Licensed marriage and family therapists; and(11) Clinical psychologists.The legislature also recognizes existing programs that have helped recruit, retain, and grow the behavioral health workforce, such as the Washington health corps, which provides loan repayment to behavioral health professionals, and the Washington state opportunity scholarship, which utilizes a public-private match to fund scholarships for students pursing health fields. Therefore, the legislature intends to increase the behavioral health workforce by expanding on successful existing programs, establishing new ones, and by focusing the efforts of the workforce education investment act.Sec. 116. RCW 71.32.110 and 2025 c 58 s 5156 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For the purposes of this chapter, a principal, agent, professional person, or health care provider may seek a determination whether the principal is incapacitated or has regained capacity.(2)(a) For the purposes of this chapter, no adult may be declared an incapacitated person except by:(i) A court, if the request is made by the principal or the principal's agent;(ii) One mental health professional or substance use disorder professional and one health care provider; or(iii) Two health care providers.(b) One of the persons making the determination under (a)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection must be a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychologist, or a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse.(3) When a professional person or health care provider requests a capacity determination, he or she shall promptly inform the principal that:(a) A request for capacity determination has been made; and(b) The principal may request that the determination be made by a court.(4) At least one mental health professional, substance use disorder professional, or health care provider must personally examine the principal prior to making a capacity determination.(5)(a) When a court makes a determination whether a principal has capacity, the court shall, at a minimum, be informed by the testimony of one mental health professional or substance use disorder professional familiar with the principal and shall, except for good cause, give the principal an opportunity to appear in court prior to the court making its determination.(b) To the extent that local court rules permit, any party or witness may testify telephonically.(6) When a court has made a determination regarding a principal's capacity and there is a subsequent change in the principal's condition, subsequent determinations whether the principal is incapacitated may be made in accordance with any of the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.Sec. 117. RCW 71.32.140 and 2025 c 58 s 5157 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A principal who:(a) Chose not to be able to revoke his or her directive during any period of incapacity;(b) Consented to voluntary admission to inpatient behavioral health treatment, or authorized an agent to consent on the principal's behalf; and(c) At the time of admission to inpatient treatment, refuses to be admitted, may only be admitted into inpatient behavioral health treatment under subsection (2) of this section.(2) A principal may only be admitted to inpatient behavioral health treatment under his or her directive if, prior to admission, a member of the treating facility's professional staff who is a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse:(a) Evaluates the principal's mental condition, including a review of reasonably available psychiatric and psychological history, diagnosis, and treatment needs, and determines, in conjunction with another health care provider, mental health professional, or substance use disorder professional, that the principal is incapacitated;(b) Obtains the informed consent of the agent, if any, designated in the directive;(c) Makes a written determination that the principal needs an inpatient evaluation or is in need of inpatient treatment and that the evaluation or treatment cannot be accomplished in a less restrictive setting; and(d) Documents in the principal's medical record a summary of the physician's, physician ((assistant's))associate's, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse's findings and recommendations for treatment or evaluation.(3) In the event the admitting physician is not a psychiatrist, the admitting physician ((assistant))associate is not working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, or the advanced practice registered nurse is not a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, the principal shall receive a complete behavioral health assessment by a mental health professional or substance use disorder professional within 24 hours of admission to determine the continued need for inpatient evaluation or treatment.(4)(a) If it is determined that the principal has capacity, then the principal may only be admitted to, or remain in, inpatient treatment if he or she consents at the time, is admitted for family-initiated treatment under chapter 71.34 RCW, or is detained under the involuntary treatment provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.(b) If a principal who is determined by two health care providers or one mental health professional or substance use disorder professional and one health care provider to be incapacitated continues to refuse inpatient treatment, the principal may immediately seek injunctive relief for release from the facility.(5) If, at the end of the period of time that the principal or the principal's agent, if any, has consented to voluntary inpatient treatment, but no more than 14 days after admission, the principal has not regained capacity or has regained capacity but refuses to consent to remain for additional treatment, the principal must be released during reasonable daylight hours, unless detained under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.(6)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any principal who is voluntarily admitted to inpatient behavioral health treatment under this chapter shall have all the rights provided to individuals who are voluntarily admitted to inpatient treatment under chapter 71.05, 71.34, or 72.23 RCW.(b) Notwithstanding RCW 71.05.050 regarding consent to inpatient treatment for a specified length of time, the choices an incapacitated principal expressed in his or her directive shall control, provided, however, that a principal who takes action demonstrating a desire to be discharged, in addition to making statements requesting to be discharged, shall be discharged, and no principal shall be restrained in any way in order to prevent his or her discharge. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent detention and evaluation for civil commitment under chapter 71.05 RCW.(7) Consent to inpatient admission in a directive is effective only while the professional person, health care provider, and health care facility are in substantial compliance with the material provisions of the directive related to inpatient treatment.Sec. 118. RCW 71.32.250 and 2025 c 58 s 5158 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If a principal who is a resident of a long-term care facility is admitted to inpatient behavioral health treatment pursuant to his or her directive, the principal shall be allowed to be readmitted to the same long-term care facility as if his or her inpatient admission had been for a physical condition on the same basis that the principal would be readmitted under state or federal statute or rule when:(a) The treating facility's professional staff determine that inpatient behavioral health treatment is no longer medically necessary for the resident. The determination shall be made in writing by a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, or a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or (i) one physician and a mental health professional or substance use disorder professional; (ii) one physician ((assistant))associate and a mental health professional or substance use disorder professional; or (iii) one psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse and a mental health professional or substance use disorder professional; or(b) The person's consent to admission in his or her directive has expired.(2)(a) If the long-term care facility does not have a bed available at the time of discharge, the treating facility may discharge the resident, in consultation with the resident and agent if any, and in accordance with a medically appropriate discharge plan, to another long-term care facility.(b) This section shall apply to inpatient behavioral health treatment admission of long-term care facility residents, regardless of whether the admission is directly from a facility, hospital emergency room, or other location.(c) This section does not restrict the right of the resident to an earlier release from the inpatient treatment facility. This section does not restrict the right of a long-term care facility to initiate transfer or discharge of a resident who is readmitted pursuant to this section, provided that the facility has complied with the laws governing the transfer or discharge of a resident.(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct an evaluation of the operation and impact of this section. The committee shall report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2004.Sec. 119. RCW 71.32.260 and 2025 c 58 s 5159 are each amended to read as follows:The directive shall be in substantially the following form:Mental Health Advance Directive of (client name)With Appointment of (agent name) asAgent for Mental Health DecisionsPART I.STATEMENT OF INTENT TO CREATE AMENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVEI, (Client name), being a person with capacity, willfully and voluntarily execute this mental health advance directive so that my choices regarding my mental health care will be carried out in circumstances when I am unable to express my instructions and preferences regarding my mental health care.PART II.MY CARE NEEDS â WHAT WORKS FOR MEIn order to assist in carrying out my directive I would like my providers and my agent to know the following information:I have been diagnosed with (client illnesses both mental health and physical diagnoses) for which I take (list medications).I am also on the following other medications: (list any other medications for other conditions).The best treatment method for my illness is (give general overview of what works best for client).I have/do not have a history of substance abuse. My preferences and treatment options around medication management related to substance abuse are:PART III.WHEN THIS DIRECTIVE IS EFFECTIVE(You must complete this part for your directive to be valid.)I intend that this directive become effective (YOU MUST CHOOSE ONLY ONE):. . . . . . Immediately upon my signing of this directive.. . . . . . If I become incapacitated.. . . . . . When the following circumstances, symptoms, or behaviors occur:PART IV.DURATION OF THIS DIRECTIVE(You must complete this part for your directive to be valid.)I want this directive to (YOU MUST CHOOSE ONLY ONE):. . . . . . Remain valid and in effect for an indefinite period of time.. . . . . . Automatically expire . . . . . . years from the date it was created.PART V.WHEN I MAY REVOKE THIS DIRECTIVE(You must complete this part for this directive to be valid.)I intend that I be able to revoke this directive (YOU MUST CHOOSE ONLY ONE):. . . . . . Only when I have capacity.I understand that choosing this option means I may only revoke this directive if I have capacity. I further understand that if I choose this option and become incapacitated while this directive is in effect, I may receive treatment that I specify in this directive, even if I object at the time.. . . . . . Even if I am incapacitated.I understand that choosing this option means that I may revoke this directive even if I am incapacitated. I further understand that if I choose this option and revoke this directive while I am incapacitated I may not receive treatment that I specify in this directive, even if I want the treatment.PART VI.PREFERENCES AND INSTRUCTIONS ABOUT TREATMENT, FACILITIES, AND PHYSICIANS, PHYSICIAN ((ASSISTANTS))ASSOCIATES, OR ADVANCED PRACTICE REGISTERED NURSESA. Preferences and Instructions About Physician(s), Physician ((Assistant(s)))Associate(s), or Advanced Practice Registered Nurse(s) to be Involved in My TreatmentI would like the physician(s), physician ((assistant(s)))associate(s), or advanced practice registered nurse(s) named below to be involved in my treatment decisions:I do not wish to be treated byB. Preferences and Instructions About Other ProvidersI am receiving other treatment or care from providers who I feel have an impact on my mental health care. I would like the following treatment provider(s) to be contacted when this directive is effective:C. Preferences and Instructions About Medications for Psychiatric Treatment (check all that apply). . . . . . I consent, and authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the following medications:. . . . . . I do not consent, and I do not authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the administration of the following medications:. . . . . . I am willing to take the medications excluded above if my only reason for excluding them is the side effects which include:and these side effects can be eliminated by dosage adjustment or other means. . . . . . I am willing to try any other medication the hospital doctor, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse recommends.. . . . . . I am willing to try any other medications my outpatient doctor, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse recommends.. . . . . . I do not want to try any other medications.Medication Allergies.I have allergies to, or severe side effects from, the following:Other Medication Preferences or Instructions. . . . . . I have the following other preferences or instructions about medications:D. Preferences and Instructions About Hospitalization and Alternatives(check all that apply and, if desired, rank "1" for first choice, "2" for second choice, and so on). . . . . . In the event my psychiatric condition is serious enough to require 24-hour care and I have no physical conditions that require immediate access to emergency medical care, I prefer to receive this care in programs/facilities designed as alternatives to psychiatric hospitalizations.. . . . . . I would also like the interventions below to be tried before hospitalization is considered:. . . . . . Calling someone or having someone call me when needed.Name:. . . . Telephone/text:. . . . Email:. . . .. . . . . . Staying overnight with someoneName:. . . . Telephone/text:. . . . Email:. . . .. . . . . . Having a mental health service provider come to see me.. . . . . . Going to a crisis triage center or emergency room.. . . . . . Staying overnight at a crisis respite (temporary) bed.. . . . . . Seeing a service provider for help with psychiatric medications.. . . . . . Other, specify:Authority to Consent to Inpatient TreatmentI consent, and authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to voluntary admission to inpatient mental health treatment for ...... days (not to exceed 14 days).(Sign one): . . . .Â . . . . . .Â If deemed appropriate by my agent (if appointed) and treating physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse. . . .(Signature)Â OrÂ . . . . . . Under the following circumstances (specify symptoms, behaviors, or circumstances that indicate the need for hospitalization). . . .(Signature)Â . . . . . . I do not consent, or authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to inpatient treatment. . . .(Signature)Â Hospital Preferences and InstructionsIf hospitalization is required, I prefer the following hospitals:I do not consent to be admitted to the following hospitals:E. Preferences and Instructions About PreemergencyI would like the interventions below to be tried before use of seclusion or restraint is considered (check all that apply):. . . . . . "Talk me down" one-on-one. . . . . . More medication. . . . . . Time out/privacy. . . . . . Show of authority/force. . . . . . Shift my attention to something else. . . . . . Set firm limits on my behavior. . . . . . Help me to discuss/vent feelings. . . . . . Decrease stimulation. . . . . . Offer to have neutral person settle dispute. . . . . . Other:F. Preferences and Instructions About Seclusion, Restraint, and Emergency MedicationsIf it is determined that I am engaging in behavior that requires seclusion, physical restraint, and/or emergency use of medication, I prefer these interventions in the order I have chosen (choose "1" for first choice, "2" for second choice, and so on):. . . . . . Seclusion. . . . . . Seclusion and physical restraint (combined). . . . . . Medication by injection. . . . . .Â Medication in pill or liquid formIn the event that my attending physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse decides to use medication in response to an emergency situation after due consideration of my preferences and instructions for emergency treatments stated above, I expect the choice of medication to reflect any preferences and instructions I have expressed in Part VI C. of this form. The preferences and instructions I express in this section regarding medication in emergency situations do not constitute consent to use of the medication for nonemergency treatment.G. Preferences and Instructions About Electroconvulsive Therapy(ECT or Shock Therapy)My wishes regarding electroconvulsive therapy are (sign one):. . . . . .I do not consent, nor authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the administration of electroconvulsive therapy. . . .(Signature)Â . . . . . . I consent, and authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the administration of electroconvulsive therapy. . . .(Signature)Â . . . . . . I consent, and authorize my agent (if appointed) to consent, to the administration of electroconvulsive therapy, but only under the following conditions:. . . .(Signature)Â H. Preferences and Instructions About Who is Permitted to VisitIf I have been admitted to a mental health treatment facility, the following people are not permitted to visit me there:Name: . . . .Â Name: . . . .Â I understand that persons not listed above may be permitted to visit me.I. Additional Instructions About My Mental Health CareOther instructions about my mental health care:In case of emergency, please contact:Name: . . . .Work telephone: . . . .Physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse: . . . .Telephone: . . . .Address: . . . .Home telephone: . . . .Address: . . . .Email: . . . .The following may help me to avoid a hospitalization:I generally react to being hospitalized as follows:Staff of the hospital or crisis unit can help me by doing the following:J. Refusal of TreatmentI do not consent to any mental health treatment.. . . .(Signature)Â PART VII.DURABLE POWER OF ATTORNEY (APPOINTMENT OF MY AGENT)(Fill out this part only if you wish to appoint an agent or nominate a guardian.)I authorize an agent to make mental health treatment decisions on my behalf. The authority granted to my agent includes the right to consent, refuse consent, or withdraw consent to any mental health care, treatment, service, or procedure, consistent with any instructions and/or limitations I have set forth in this directive. I intend that those decisions should be made in accordance with my expressed wishes as set forth in this document. If I have not expressed a choice in this document and my agent does not otherwise know my wishes, I authorize my agent to make the decision that my agent determines is in my best interest. This agency shall not be affected by my incapacity. Unless I state otherwise in this durable power of attorney, I may revoke it unless prohibited by other state law.HIPAA Release Authority.Â In addition to the other powers granted by this document, I grant to my Attorney-in-Fact the power and authority to serve as my personal representative for all purposes under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) of 1996, as amended from time to time, and its regulations.Â My Attorney-in-Fact will serve as my "HIPAA personal representative" and will exercise this authority at any time that my Attorney-in-Fact is exercising authority under this document.A. Designation of an AgentName: . . . .Address: . . . .Work phone: . . . .Home/cell phone: . . . .Relationship: . . . .Email: . . . .B. Designation of Alternate AgentIf the person named above is unavailable, unable, or refuses to serve as my agent, or I revoke that person's authority to serve as my agent, I hereby appoint the following person as my alternate agent and request that this person be notified immediately when this directive becomes effective or when my original agent is no longer my agent:Name: . . . .Address: . . . .Work phone: . . . .Home phone: . . . .Relationship: . . . .Email: . . . .C. Limitations on My Agent's AuthorityI do not grant my agent the authority to consent on my behalf to the following:D. Limitations on My Ability to Revoke this Durable Power of AttorneyI choose to limit my ability to revoke this durable power of attorney as follows:E. Preference as to Court-Appointed GuardianIn the event a court appoints a guardian who will make decisions regarding my mental health treatment, I nominate my then-serving agent (or name someone else) as my guardian:Name and contact information (if someone other than agent or alternate):Â The appointment of a guardian of my estate or my person or any other decision maker shall not give the guardian or decision maker the power to revoke, suspend, or terminate this directive or the powers of my agent, except as authorized by law.PART VIII.OTHER DOCUMENTS(Initial all that apply)I have executed the following documents that include the power to make decisions regarding health care services for myself:. . . . . . Health care power of attorney (chapter 11.125 RCW). . . . . . "Living will" (Health care directive; chapter 70.122 RCW). . . . . . I have appointed more than one agent. I understand that the most recently appointed agent controls except as stated below:PART IX.NOTIFICATION OF OTHERS AND CARE OF PERSONAL AFFAIRS(Fill out this part only if you wish to provide nontreatment instructions.)I understand the preferences and instructions in this part are NOT the responsibility of my treatment provider and that no treatment provider is required to act on them.A. Who Should Be NotifiedI desire my agent to notify the following individuals as soon as possible if I am admitted to a mental health facility:Name: . . . .Address: . . . .Day telephone: . . . .Evening telephone: . . . .Name: . . . .Address: . . . .Day telephone: . . . .Evening telephone: . . . .Name: . . . .Address: . . . .Day telephone: . . . .Evening telephone: . . . .B. Preferences or Instructions About Personal AffairsI have the following preferences or instructions about my personal affairs (e.g., care of dependents, pets, household) if I am admitted to a mental health treatment facility:C. Additional Preferences and Instructions:PART X.SIGNATUREBy signing here, I indicate that I understand the purpose and effect of this document and that I am giving my informed consent to the treatments and/or admission to which I have consented or authorized my agent to consent in this directive. I intend that my consent in this directive be construed as being consistent with the elements of informed consent under chapter 7.70 RCW.In witness of this, I have signed on this . . . . . . day of . . . . . ., 20. . . .Signature: . . . .Â STATE OF WASHINGTON )) ss.COUNTY OF . . . .)I certify that I know or have satisfactory evidence that (client name) is the person who appeared before me, and said person acknowledged that he or she signed this Durable Power of Attorney and acknowledged it to be his or her free and voluntary act for the uses and purposes mentioned in this instrument.SUBSCRIBED and SWORN to before me this . . . . . . day of . . . . . ., 20. . . .Â . . . .SIGNATURE OF NOTARY. . . .PRINT NAME OF NOTARYNOTARY PUBLIC for the State of Washington at . . . .My commission expires . . . .OR have two witnesses:Name: . . . .Â Â This directive was signed and declared by the "Principal," to be his or her directive, in our presence who, at his or her request, have signed our names below as witnesses. We declare that, at the time of the creation of this instrument, the Principal is personally known to us, and, according to our best knowledge and belief, has capacity at this time and does not appear to be acting under duress, undue influence, or fraud. We further declare that none of us is:(A) A person designated to make medical decisions on the principal's behalf;(B) A health care provider or professional person directly involved with the provision of care to the principal at the time the directive is executed;(C) An owner, operator, employee, or relative of an owner or operator of a health care facility or long-term care facility in which the principal is a patient or resident;(D) A person who is related by blood, marriage, or adoption to the person, or with whom the principal has a dating relationship as defined in RCW 7.105.010;(E) An incapacitated person;(F) A person who would benefit financially if the principal undergoes mental health treatment; or(G) A minor.Witness 1 Signature: . . . .Date: . . . .Printed Name: . . . .Address: . . . .Telephone: . . . .Â Witness 2 Signature: . . . .Date: . . . .Printed Name: . . . .Address: . . . .Telephone: . . . .Â PART XI.RECORD OF DIRECTIVEI have given a copy of this directive to the following persons:Name: . . . .Address: . . . .Day telephone: . . . .Evening telephone: . . . .Name: . . . .Address: . . . .Day telephone: . . . .Evening telephone: . . . .DO NOT FILL OUT PART XII UNLESS YOU INTEND TO REVOKE THIS DIRECTIVE IN PART OR IN WHOLEÂ PART XII.REVOCATION OF THIS DIRECTIVE(Initial any that apply):. . . . . . I am revoking the following part(s) of this directive (specify):Â Date: . . . . . . . . .. . . . . . I am revoking all of this directive.By signing here, I indicate that I understand the purpose and effect of my revocation and that no person is bound by any revoked provision(s). I intend this revocation to be interpreted as if I had never completed the revoked provision(s).. . . .(Signature)Â Printed Name: . . . .Â DO NOT SIGN THIS PART UNLESS YOU INTEND TO REVOKE THISDIRECTIVE IN PART OR IN WHOLESec. 120. RCW 71.34.020 and 2025 c 226 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(2) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a minor should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital.(3) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.(4) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.(5) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to, atypical antipsychotic medications.(6) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.(7) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a minor patient.(8) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.(9) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(10) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder.(11) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.(12) "Children's mental health specialist" means:(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.(13) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.(14) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.(15) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.(16) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department of health under RCW 71.24.035, such as a residential treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual.(17) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment.(18) "Department" means the department of social and health services.(19) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.(20) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter.(21) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department.(22) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.(23) "Director" means the director of the authority.(24) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order.(25) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.(26) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.(27) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, (a) is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or (b) manifests severe deterioration in routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.(28) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist minors in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, behavioral, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy.(29) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.34.910.(30) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time five years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term substance use disorder treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.(31) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which states:(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences.(32)(a) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "inpatient treatment" has the meaning included in (a) of this subsection and any other residential treatment facility licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.(33) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.(34) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.(35) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031.(36) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130.(37) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor as a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.34.755, including residential treatment.(38) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.(39) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon another individual, as evidenced by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or(b) The minor has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts.(40) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(41) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder.(42) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a disability, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.(43) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.(44) "Mental health professional" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.(45) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.(46) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.(47)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).(48) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.(49) "Physician ((assistant))associate" means a person licensed as a physician ((assistant))associate under chapter 18.71A RCW.(50) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.(51) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.(52) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.(53) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.(54) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.(55) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.(56) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter.(57) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW.(58) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.(59) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.(60) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:(a) Provide the following services:(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;(ii) Clinical stabilization services;(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.(61) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.(62) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.(63) "State hospital" means a hospital designated under RCW 72.23.020.(64) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.(65) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.(66) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.(67) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.(68) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.(69) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025.(70) "Video" means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology.(71) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.Sec. 121. RCW 71.34.020 and 2025 c 226 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "23-hour crisis relief center" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(2) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a minor should be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital.(3) "Adolescent" means a minor thirteen years of age or older.(4) "Alcoholism" means a disease, characterized by a dependency on alcoholic beverages, loss of control over the amount and circumstances of use, symptoms of tolerance, physiological or psychological withdrawal, or both, if use is reduced or discontinued, and impairment of health or disruption of social or economic functioning.(5) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to, atypical antipsychotic medications.(6) "Approved substance use disorder treatment program" means a program for minors with substance use disorders provided by a treatment program licensed or certified by the department of health as meeting standards adopted under chapter 71.24 RCW.(7) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a minor patient.(8) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.(9) "Behavioral health administrative services organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(10) "Behavioral health disorder" means either a mental disorder as defined in this section, a substance use disorder as defined in this section, or a co-occurring mental disorder and substance use disorder.(11) "Child psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician and surgeon in this state, who has had graduate training in child psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and who is board eligible or board certified in child psychiatry.(12) "Children's mental health specialist" means:(a) A mental health professional who has completed a minimum of one hundred actual hours, not quarter or semester hours, of specialized training devoted to the study of child development and the treatment of children; and(b) A mental health professional who has the equivalent of one year of full-time experience in the treatment of children under the supervision of a children's mental health specialist.(13) "Commitment" means a determination by a judge or court commissioner, made after a commitment hearing, that the minor is in need of inpatient diagnosis, evaluation, or treatment or that the minor is in need of less restrictive alternative treatment.(14) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms.(15) "Co-occurring disorder specialist" means an individual possessing an enhancement granted by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW that certifies the individual to provide substance use disorder counseling subject to the practice limitations under RCW 18.205.105.(16) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a portion of a facility licensed or certified by the department of health under RCW 71.24.035, such as a residential treatment facility or a hospital, which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term hospitalization, or to determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual.(17) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing involuntary care and treatment.(18) "Department" means the department of social and health services.(19) "Designated crisis responder" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.(20) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a person, under the provisions of this chapter.(21) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who has specialized training and three years of experience in directly treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a supervising psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary of the department.(22) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.(23) "Director" means the director of the authority.(24) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be amended by court order.(25) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means a public or private facility or unit that is licensed or certified by the department of health to provide emergency, inpatient, residential, or outpatient mental health evaluation and treatment services for minors. A physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors. A facility which is part of or operated by the state or federal agency does not require licensure or certification. No correctional institution or facility, juvenile court detention facility, or jail may be an evaluation and treatment facility within the meaning of this chapter.(26) "Evaluation and treatment program" means the total system of services and facilities coordinated and approved by a county or combination of counties for the evaluation and treatment of minors under this chapter.(27) "Gravely disabled minor" means a minor who, as a result of a behavioral health disorder, (a) is in danger of serious physical harm resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human needs of health or safety, or (b) manifests severe deterioration from safe behavior evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.(28) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by program personnel to assist minors in acquiring and maintaining life skills and in raising their levels of physical, behavioral, social, and vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy.(29) "Hearing" means any proceeding conducted in open court that conforms to the requirements of RCW 71.34.910.(30) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of time five years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter, excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a mental health facility, a long-term substance use disorder treatment facility, or in confinement as a result of a criminal conviction.(31) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which states:(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation;(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve those intermediate and long-range goals;(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person and possible future types of residences.(32)(a) "Inpatient treatment" means twenty-four-hour-per-day mental health care provided within a general hospital, psychiatric hospital, residential treatment facility licensed or certified by the department of health as an evaluation and treatment facility for minors, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility for minors, or approved substance use disorder treatment program for minors.(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "inpatient treatment" has the meaning included in (a) of this subsection and any other residential treatment facility licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW.(33) "Intoxicated minor" means a minor whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or other psychoactive chemicals.(34) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.(35) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in RCW 74.13.031.(36) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their capacity as legal representatives of public behavioral health service providers under RCW 71.05.130.(37) "Less restrictive alternative" or "less restrictive setting" means outpatient treatment provided to a minor as a program of individualized treatment in a less restrictive setting than inpatient treatment that includes the services described in RCW 71.34.755, including residential treatment.(38) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery in the state of Washington.(39) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon another individual, as evidenced by behavior which has caused harm, substantial pain, or which places another person or persons in reasonable fear of harm to themselves or others; or (iii) physical harm will be inflicted by a minor upon the property of others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or damage to the property of others; or(b) The minor has threatened the physical safety of another and has a history of one or more violent acts.(40) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.24.025.(41) "Medical clearance" means a physician or other health care provider, including an Indian health care provider, has determined that a person is medically stable and ready for referral to the designated crisis responder or facility. For a person presenting in the community, no medical clearance is required prior to investigation by a designated crisis responder.(42) "Medical necessity" for inpatient care means a requested service which is reasonably calculated to: (a) Diagnose, correct, cure, or alleviate a mental disorder or substance use disorder; or (b) prevent the progression of a mental disorder or substance use disorder that endangers life or causes suffering and pain, or results in illness or infirmity or threatens to cause or aggravate a disability, or causes physical deformity or malfunction, and there is no adequate less restrictive alternative available.(43) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on an individual's cognitive or volitional functions. The presence of alcohol abuse, drug abuse, juvenile criminal history, antisocial behavior, or intellectual disabilities alone is insufficient to justify a finding of "mental disorder" within the meaning of this section.(44) "Mental health professional" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 71.05.020.(45) "Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.(46) "Outpatient treatment" means any of the nonresidential services mandated under chapter 71.24 RCW and provided by licensed or certified behavioral health agencies as identified by RCW 71.24.025.(47)(a) "Parent" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 26.26A.010, including either parent if custody is shared under a joint custody agreement, or a person or agency judicially appointed as legal guardian or custodian of the child.(b) For purposes of family-initiated treatment under RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, "parent" also includes a person to whom a parent defined in (a) of this subsection has given a signed authorization to make health care decisions for the adolescent, a stepparent who is involved in caring for the adolescent, a kinship caregiver who is involved in caring for the adolescent, or another relative who is responsible for the health care of the adolescent, who may be required to provide a declaration under penalty of perjury stating that he or she is a relative responsible for the health care of the adolescent pursuant to chapter 5.50 RCW. If a dispute arises between individuals authorized to act as a parent for the purpose of RCW 71.34.600 through 71.34.670, the disagreement must be resolved according to the priority established under RCW 7.70.065(2)(a).(48) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial order of appointment.(49) "Physician ((assistant))associate" means a person licensed as a physician ((assistant))associate under chapter 18.71A RCW.(50) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation, or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in whole or in part by public funds, that constitutes an evaluation and treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program, that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders.(51) "Professional person in charge" or "professional person" means a physician, other mental health professional, or other person empowered by an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program with authority to make admission and discharge decisions on behalf of that facility.(52) "Psychiatric nurse" means a registered nurse who has experience in the direct treatment of persons who have a mental illness or who are emotionally disturbed, such experience gained under the supervision of a mental health professional.(53) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician in this state who has completed residency training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American Medical Association or the American Osteopathic Association, and is board eligible or board certified in psychiatry.(54) "Psychologist" means a person licensed as a psychologist under chapter 18.83 RCW.(55) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or institution, or hospital, or approved substance use disorder treatment program that is conducted for, or includes a distinct unit, floor, or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons with mental illness, substance use disorders, or both mental illness and substance use disorders if the agency is operated directly by federal, state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such governments.(56) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the provisions of this chapter.(57) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in chapter 71.24 RCW.(58) "Responsible other" means the minor, the minor's parent or estate, or any other person legally responsible for support of the minor.(59) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or secretary's designee.(60) "Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility" means a facility operated by either a public or private agency or by the program of an agency which provides care to voluntary individuals and individuals involuntarily detained and committed under this chapter for whom there is a likelihood of serious harm or who are gravely disabled due to the presence of a substance use disorder. Secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities must:(a) Provide the following services:(i) Assessment and treatment, provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists;(ii) Clinical stabilization services;(iii) Acute or subacute detoxification services for intoxicated individuals; and(iv) Discharge assistance provided by certified substance use disorder professionals or co-occurring disorder specialists, including facilitating transitions to appropriate voluntary or involuntary inpatient services or to less restrictive alternatives as appropriate for the individual;(b) Include security measures sufficient to protect the patients, staff, and community; and(c) Be licensed or certified as such by the department of health.(61) "Severe deterioration from safe behavior" means that a person will, if not treated, suffer or continue to suffer severe and abnormal mental, emotional, or physical distress, and this distress is associated with significant impairment of judgment, reason, or behavior.(62) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further advanced degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010.(63) "Start of initial detention" means the time of arrival of the minor at the first evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program offering inpatient treatment if the minor is being involuntarily detained at the time. With regard to voluntary patients, "start of initial detention" means the time at which the minor gives notice of intent to leave under the provisions of this chapter.(64) "State hospital" means a hospital designated under RCW 72.23.020.(65) "Store and forward technology" means use of an asynchronous transmission of a person's medical information from a mental health service provider to the designated crisis responder which results in medical diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.(66) "Substance use disorder" means a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms indicating that an individual continues using the substance despite significant substance-related problems. The diagnosis of a substance use disorder is based on a pathological pattern of behaviors related to the use of the substances.(67) "Substance use disorder professional" means a person certified as a substance use disorder professional by the department of health under chapter 18.205 RCW.(68) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic court duties.(69) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations and their staffs, and by treatment facilities. Treatment records include mental health information contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing treatment services for the department, the department of health, the authority, behavioral health organizations, or a treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others.(70) "Tribe" has the same meaning as in RCW 71.24.025.(71) "Video" means the delivery of behavioral health services through the use of interactive audio and video technology, permitting real-time communication between a person and a designated crisis responder, for the purpose of evaluation. "Video" does not include the use of audio-only telephone, facsimile, email, or store and forward technology.(72) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in homicide, attempted suicide, injury, or substantial loss or damage to property.Sec. 122. RCW 71.34.355 and 2020 c 302 s 68 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Absent a risk to self or others, minors treated under this chapter have the following rights, which shall be prominently posted in the evaluation and treatment facility:(a) To wear their own clothes and to keep and use personal possessions;(b) To keep and be allowed to spend a reasonable sum of their own money for canteen expenses and small purchases;(c) To have individual storage space for private use;(d) To have visitors at reasonable times;(e) To have reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls;(f) To have ready access to letter-writing materials, including stamps, and to send and receive uncensored correspondence through the mails;(g) To discuss treatment plans and decisions with mental health professionals;(h) To have the right to adequate care and individualized treatment;(i) To not be denied access to treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a church or religious denomination in addition to the treatment otherwise proposed;(j) Not to consent to the administration of antipsychotic medications beyond the hearing conducted pursuant to RCW 71.34.750 or the performance of electroconvulsive treatment or surgery, except emergency lifesaving surgery, upon him or her, unless ordered by a court under procedures described in RCW 71.05.217(1)(j). The minor's parent may exercise this right on the minor's behalf, and must be informed of any impending treatment;(k) Not to have psychosurgery performed on him or her under any circumstances.(2)(a) Privileges between minors and physicians, physician ((assistants))associates, psychologists, or psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners are deemed waived in proceedings under this chapter relating to the administration of antipsychotic medications. As to other proceedings under this chapter, the privileges are waived when a court of competent jurisdiction in its discretion determines that such waiver is necessary to protect either the detained minor or the public.(b) The waiver of a privilege under this section is limited to records or testimony relevant to evaluation of the detained minor for purposes of a proceeding under this chapter. Upon motion by the detained minor or on its own motion, the court shall examine a record or testimony sought by a petitioner to determine whether it is within the scope of the waiver.(c) The record maker may not be required to testify in order to introduce medical or psychological records of the detained minor so long as the requirements of RCW 5.45.020 are met except that portions of the record which contain opinions as to the detained minor's mental state must be deleted from such records unless the person making such conclusions is available for cross-examination.(3) No minor may be presumed incompetent as a consequence of receiving an evaluation or voluntary or involuntary treatment for a mental disorder or substance use disorder, under this chapter or any prior laws of this state dealing with mental illness or substance use disorders.Sec. 123. RCW 71.34.720 and 2025 c 58 s 5160 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each minor approved by the facility for inpatient admission shall be examined and evaluated by a children's mental health specialist, for minors admitted as a result of a mental disorder, or by a substance use disorder professional or co-occurring disorder specialist, for minors admitted as a result of a substance use disorder, as to the child's mental condition and by a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse as to the child's physical condition within twenty-four hours of admission. Reasonable measures shall be taken to ensure medical treatment is provided for any condition requiring immediate medical attention.(2) If, at any time during the involuntary treatment hold and following the initial examination and evaluation, the children's mental health specialist or substance use disorder specialist and the physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse determine that the initial needs of the minor, if detained to an evaluation and treatment facility, would be better served by placement in a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program or, if detained to a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility or approved substance use disorder treatment program, would be better served in an evaluation and treatment facility, then the minor shall be referred to the more appropriate placement for the remainder of the current commitment period without any need for further court review.(3) The admitting facility shall take reasonable steps to notify immediately the minor's parent of the admission.(4) During the initial one hundred twenty hour treatment period, the minor has a right to associate or receive communications from parents or others unless the professional person in charge determines that such communication would be seriously detrimental to the minor's condition or treatment and so indicates in the minor's clinical record, and notifies the minor's parents of this determination. A minor must not be denied the opportunity to consult an attorney unless there is an immediate risk of harm to the minor or others.(5) If the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program admits the minor, it may detain the minor for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed one hundred twenty hours from the time of provisional acceptance. The computation of such one hundred twenty hour period shall exclude Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. This initial treatment period shall not exceed one hundred twenty hours except when an application for voluntary inpatient treatment is received or a petition for fourteen-day commitment is filed.(6) Within twelve hours of the admission, the facility shall advise the minor of his or her rights as set forth in this chapter.Sec. 124. RCW 71.34.730 and 2025 c 58 s 5161 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The professional person in charge of an evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program where a minor has been admitted involuntarily for the initial one hundred twenty hour treatment period under this chapter may petition to have a minor committed to an evaluation and treatment facility, a secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or an approved substance use disorder treatment program for fourteen-day diagnosis, evaluation, and treatment.If the professional person in charge of the facility does not petition to have the minor committed, the parent who has custody of the minor may seek review of that decision in court. The parent shall file notice with the court and provide a copy of the treatment and evaluation facility's report.(2) A petition for commitment of a minor under this section shall be filed with the superior court in the county where the minor is being detained.(a) A petition for a fourteen-day commitment shall be signed by:(i) One physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse; and(ii) One physician, physician ((assistant))associate, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or mental health professional.(b) If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced practice registered nurse instead of a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse. The person signing the petition must have examined the minor, and the petition must contain the following:(i) The name and address of the petitioner;(ii) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for fourteen-day commitment;(iii) The name, telephone number, and address if known of every person believed by the petitioner to be legally responsible for the minor;(iv) A statement that the petitioner has examined the minor and finds that the minor's condition meets required criteria for fourteen-day commitment and the supporting facts therefor;(v) A statement that the minor has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment but has been unwilling or unable to consent to necessary treatment;(vi) If the petition is for mental health treatment, a statement that the minor has been advised of the loss of firearm rights if involuntarily committed;(vii) A statement recommending the appropriate facility or facilities to provide the necessary treatment; and(viii) A statement concerning whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.(c) A copy of the petition shall be personally served on the minor by the petitioner or petitioner's designee. A copy of the petition shall be provided to the minor's attorney and the minor's parent.Sec. 125. RCW 71.34.750 and 2025 c 58 s 5162 are each amended to read as follows:(1) At any time during the minor's period of fourteen-day commitment, the professional person in charge may petition the court for an order requiring the minor to undergo an additional one hundred eighty-day period of treatment. The evidence in support of the petition shall be presented by the county prosecutor unless the petition is filed by the professional person in charge of a state-operated facility in which case the evidence shall be presented by the attorney general.(2) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall contain the following:(a) The name and address of the petitioner or petitioners;(b) The name of the minor alleged to meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment;(c) A statement that the petitioner is the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility, secure withdrawal management and stabilization facility, or approved substance use disorder treatment program responsible for the treatment of the minor;(d) The date of the fourteen-day commitment order; and(e) A summary of the facts supporting the petition.(3) The petition shall be supported by accompanying affidavits signed by: (a) Two examining physicians, one of whom shall be a child psychiatrist, or two psychiatric advanced practice registered nurses, one of whom shall be a child and adolescent or family psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse. If the petition is for substance use disorder treatment, the petition may be signed by a substance use disorder professional instead of a mental health professional and by an advanced practice registered nurse instead of a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or two physician ((assistants))associates, one of whom must be supervised by or collaborating with a child psychiatrist; (b) one children's mental health specialist and either an examining physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse; or (c) two among an examining physician, physician ((assistant))associate, and a psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, one of which needs to be a child psychiatrist, a physician ((assistant))associate supervised by or collaborating with a child psychiatrist, or a child and adolescent psychiatric nurse practitioner. The affidavits shall describe in detail the behavior of the detained minor which supports the petition and shall state whether a less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment is in the best interests of the minor.(4) The petition for one hundred eighty-day commitment shall be filed with the clerk of the court at least three days before the expiration of the fourteen-day commitment period. The petitioner or the petitioner's designee shall within twenty-four hours of filing serve a copy of the petition on the minor and notify the minor's attorney and the minor's parent. A copy of the petition shall be provided to such persons at least twenty-four hours prior to the hearing.(5) At the time of filing, the court shall set a date within seven days for the hearing on the petition. If the hearing is not commenced within thirty days after the filing of the petition, including extensions of time requested by the detained person or his or her attorney or the court in the administration of justice under RCW 71.34.735, the minor must be released. The minor or the parents shall be afforded the same rights as in a fourteen-day commitment hearing. Treatment of the minor shall continue pending the proceeding.(6) For one hundred eighty-day commitment, the court must find by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that the minor:(a) Is suffering from a mental disorder or substance use disorder;(b) Presents a likelihood of serious harm or is gravely disabled; and(c) Is in need of further treatment that only can be provided in a one hundred eighty-day commitment.(7) In determining whether an inpatient or less restrictive alternative commitment is appropriate, great weight must be given to evidence of a prior history or pattern of decompensation and discontinuation of treatment resulting in: (a) Repeated hospitalizations; or (b) repeated peace officer interventions resulting in juvenile charges. Such evidence may be used to provide a factual basis for concluding that the minor would not receive, if released, such care as is essential for his or her health or safety.(8)(a) If the court finds that the criteria for commitment are met and that less restrictive treatment in a community setting is not appropriate or available, the court shall order the minor committed to the custody of the director for further inpatient mental health treatment, to an approved substance use disorder treatment program for further substance use disorder treatment, or to a private treatment and evaluation facility for inpatient mental health or substance use disorder treatment if the minor's parents have assumed responsibility for payment for the treatment. If the court finds that a less restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the minor, the court shall order less restrictive alternative treatment upon such conditions as necessary.(b) If the court determines that the minor does not meet the criteria for one hundred eighty-day commitment, the minor shall be released.(9) Successive one hundred eighty-day commitments are permissible on the same grounds and under the same procedures as the original one hundred eighty-day commitment. Such petitions shall be filed at least three days prior to the expiration of the previous one hundred eighty-day commitment order.Sec. 126. RCW 71.34.755 and 2025 c 58 s 5163 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Less restrictive alternative treatment, at a minimum, must include the following services:(a) Assignment of a care coordinator;(b) An intake evaluation with the provider of the less restrictive alternative treatment;(c) A psychiatric evaluation, a substance use disorder evaluation, or both;(d) A schedule of regular contacts with the provider of the less restrictive alternative treatment services for the duration of the order;(e) A transition plan addressing access to continued services at the expiration of the order;(f) An individual crisis plan;(g) Consultation about the formation of a mental health advance directive under chapter 71.32 RCW; and(h) Notification to the care coordinator assigned in (a) of this subsection if reasonable efforts to engage the client fail to produce substantial compliance with court-ordered treatment conditions.(2) Less restrictive alternative treatment may include the following additional services:(a) Medication management;(b) Psychotherapy;(c) Nursing;(d) Substance use disorder counseling;(e) Residential treatment;(f) Partial hospitalization;(g) Intensive outpatient treatment;(h) Support for housing, benefits, education, and employment; and(i) Periodic court review.(3) If the minor was provided with involuntary medication during the involuntary commitment period, the less restrictive alternative treatment order may authorize the less restrictive alternative treatment provider or its designee to administer involuntary antipsychotic medication to the person if the provider has attempted and failed to obtain the informed consent of the person and there is a concurring medical opinion approving the medication by a psychiatrist, physician ((assistant))associate working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or physician or physician ((assistant))associate in consultation with an independent mental health professional with prescribing authority.(4) Less restrictive alternative treatment must be administered by a provider that is certified or licensed to provide or coordinate the full scope of services required under the less restrictive alternative order and that has agreed to assume this responsibility.(5) The care coordinator assigned to a minor ordered to less restrictive alternative treatment must submit an individualized plan for the minor's treatment services to the court that entered the order. An initial plan must be submitted as soon as possible following the intake evaluation and a revised plan must be submitted upon any subsequent modification in which a type of service is removed from or added to the treatment plan.(6) A care coordinator may disclose information and records related to mental health services pursuant to RCW 70.02.230(2)(k) for purposes of implementing less restrictive alternative treatment.(7) For the purpose of this section, "care coordinator" means a clinical practitioner who coordinates the activities of less restrictive alternative treatment. The care coordinator coordinates activities with the designated crisis responders that are necessary for enforcement and continuation of less restrictive alternative treatment orders and is responsible for coordinating service activities with other agencies and establishing and maintaining a therapeutic relationship with the individual on a continuing basis.Sec. 127. RCW 71.34.770 and 2025 c 58 s 5164 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The professional person in charge of the inpatient treatment facility may authorize release for the minor under such conditions as appropriate. Conditional release may be revoked pursuant to RCW 71.34.780 if leave conditions are not met or the minor's functioning substantially deteriorates.(2) Minors may be discharged prior to expiration of the commitment period if the treating physician, physician ((assistant))associate, psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or professional person in charge concludes that the minor no longer meets commitment criteria.Sec. 128. RCW 71.34.815 and 2025 c 58 s 5165 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment if the court finds by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence in response to a petition filed under this section that:(a) The adolescent has a behavioral health disorder;(b) Based on a clinical determination and in view of the adolescent's treatment history and current behavior, at least one of the following is true:(i) The adolescent is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision and the adolescent's condition is substantially deteriorating; or(ii) The adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in grave disability or a likelihood of serious harm to the adolescent or to others;(c) The adolescent has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for his or her behavioral health disorder that has:(i) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating hospitalization of the adolescent, or the adolescent's receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a state, local, or tribal correctional facility, provided that the 36-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the adolescent that occurred within the 36-month period;(ii) At least twice within the 36 months prior to the filing of the petition been a significant factor in necessitating emergency medical care or hospitalization for behavioral health-related medical conditions including overdose, infected abscesses, sepsis, endocarditis, or other maladies, or a significant factor in behavior which resulted in the adolescent's incarceration in a state, local, or tribal correctional facility; or(iii) Resulted in one or more violent acts, threats, or attempts to cause serious physical harm to the adolescent or another within the 48 months prior to the filing of the petition, provided that the 48-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred during the 48-month period;(d) Participation in an assisted outpatient treatment program would be the least restrictive alternative necessary to ensure the adolescent's recovery and stability; and(e) The adolescent will benefit from assisted outpatient treatment.(2) The following individuals may directly file a petition for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that an adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment:(a) The director of a hospital where the adolescent is hospitalized or the director's designee;(b) The director of a behavioral health service provider providing behavioral health care or residential services to the adolescent or the director's designee;(c) The adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional or one who has evaluated the person;(d) A designated crisis responder;(e) A release planner from a juvenile detention or rehabilitation facility; or(f) An emergency room physician.(3) A court order for less restrictive alternative treatment on the basis that the adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment may be effective for up to 18 months. The petitioner must personally interview the adolescent, unless the adolescent refuses an interview, to determine whether the adolescent will voluntarily receive appropriate treatment.(4) The petitioner must allege specific facts based on personal observation, evaluation, or investigation, and must consider the reliability or credibility of any person providing information material to the petition.(5) The petition must include:(a) A statement of the circumstances under which the adolescent's condition was made known and the basis for the opinion, from personal observation or investigation, that the adolescent is in need of assisted outpatient treatment. The petitioner must state which specific facts come from personal observation and specify what other sources of information the petitioner has relied upon to form this belief;(b) A declaration from a physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse, or the adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, who has examined the adolescent no more than 10 days prior to the submission of the petition and who is willing to testify in support of the petition, or who alternatively has made appropriate attempts to examine the adolescent within the same period but has not been successful in obtaining the adolescent's cooperation, and who is willing to testify to the reasons they believe that the adolescent meets the criteria for assisted outpatient treatment. If the declaration is provided by the adolescent's treating mental health professional or substance use disorder professional, it must be cosigned by a supervising physician, physician ((assistant))associate, or advanced practice registered nurse who certifies that they have reviewed the declaration;(c) The declarations of additional witnesses, if any, supporting the petition for assisted outpatient treatment;(d) The name of an agency, provider, or facility that agrees to provide less restrictive alternative treatment if the petition is granted by the court; and(e) If the adolescent is detained in a state hospital, inpatient treatment facility, or juvenile detention or rehabilitation facility at the time the petition is filed, the anticipated release date of the adolescent and any other details needed to facilitate successful reentry and transition into the community.(6)(a) Upon receipt of a petition meeting all requirements of this section, the court shall fix a date for a hearing:(i) No sooner than three days or later than seven days after the date of service or as stipulated by the parties or, upon a showing of good cause, no later than 30 days after the date of service; or(ii) If the adolescent is hospitalized at the time of filing of the petition, before discharge of the adolescent and in sufficient time to arrange for a continuous transition from inpatient treatment to assisted outpatient treatment.(b) A copy of the petition and notice of hearing shall be served, in the same manner as a summons, on the petitioner, the adolescent, the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, a current provider, if any, and a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW, if any.(c) If the adolescent has a surrogate decision maker or agent under chapter 71.32 RCW who wishes to provide testimony at the hearing, the court shall afford the surrogate decision maker or agent an opportunity to testify.(d) The adolescent shall be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings.(e) If the adolescent fails to appear at the hearing after notice, the court may conduct the hearing in the adolescent's absence; provided that the adolescent's counsel is present.(f) If the adolescent has refused to be examined by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition, the court may order a mental examination of the adolescent. The examination of the adolescent may be performed by the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition. If the examination is performed by another qualified professional, the examining qualified professional shall be authorized to consult with the qualified professional whose affidavit accompanied the petition.(g) If the adolescent has refused to be examined by a qualified professional and the court finds reasonable grounds to believe that the allegations of the petition are true, the court may issue a written order directing a peace officer who has completed crisis intervention training to detain and transport the adolescent to a provider for examination by a qualified professional. An adolescent detained pursuant to this subsection shall be detained no longer than necessary to complete the examination and in no event longer than 24 hours. All papers in the court file must be provided to the adolescent's designated attorney.(7) If the petition involves an adolescent whom the petitioner or behavioral health administrative services organization knows, or has reason to know, is an American Indian or Alaska Native who receives medical or behavioral health services from a tribe within this state, the petitioner or behavioral health administrative services organization shall notify the tribe and Indian health care provider. Notification shall be made in person or by telephonic or electronic communication to the tribal contact listed in the authority's tribal crisis coordination plan as soon as possible, but before the hearing and no later than 24 hours from the time the petition is served upon the person and the person's guardian. The notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider must include a copy of the petition, together with any orders issued by the court and a notice of the tribe's right to intervene. The court clerk shall provide copies of any court orders necessary for the petitioner or the behavioral health administrative services organization to provide notice to the tribe or Indian health care provider under this section.(8) A petition for assisted outpatient treatment filed under this section shall be adjudicated under RCW 71.34.740.(9) After January 1, 2023, a petition for assisted outpatient treatment must be filed on forms developed by the administrative office of the courts.Sec. 129. RCW 74.09.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5167 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.(2) "Bidirectional integration" means integrating behavioral health services into primary care settings and integrating primary care services into behavioral health settings.(3) "Children's health program" means the health care services program provided to children under eighteen years of age and in households with incomes at or below the federal poverty level as annually defined by the federal department of health and human services as adjusted for family size, and who are not otherwise eligible for medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically needy.(4) "Chronic care management" means the health care management within a health home of persons identified with, or at high risk for, one or more chronic conditions. Effective chronic care management:(a) Actively assists patients to acquire self-care skills to improve functioning and health outcomes, and slow the progression of disease or disability;(b) Employs evidence-based clinical practices;(c) Coordinates care across health care settings and providers, including tracking referrals;(d) Provides ready access to behavioral health services that are, to the extent possible, integrated with primary care; and(e) Uses appropriate community resources to support individual patients and families in managing chronic conditions.(5) "Chronic condition" means a prolonged condition and includes, but is not limited to:(a) A mental health condition;(b) A substance use disorder;(c) Asthma;(d) Diabetes;(e) Heart disease; and(f) Being overweight, as evidenced by a body mass index over twenty-five.(6) "County" means the board of county commissioners, county council, county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee.(7) "Department" means the department of social and health services.(8) "Department of health" means the Washington state department of health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.(9) "Director" means the director of the Washington state health care authority.(10) "Full benefit dual eligible beneficiary" means an individual who, for any month: Has coverage for the month under a medicare prescription drug plan or medicare advantage plan with part D coverage; and is determined eligible by the state for full medicaid benefits for the month under any eligibility category in the state's medicaid plan or a section 1115 demonstration waiver that provides pharmacy benefits.(11) "Health home" or "primary care health home" means coordinated health care provided by a licensed primary care provider coordinating all medical care services, and a multidisciplinary health care team comprised of clinical and nonclinical staff. The term "coordinating all medical care services" shall not be construed to require prior authorization by a primary care provider in order for a patient to receive treatment for covered services by an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW. Primary care health home services shall include those services defined as health home services in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396w-4 and, in addition, may include, but are not limited to:(a) Comprehensive care management including, but not limited to, chronic care treatment and management;(b) Extended hours of service;(c) Multiple ways for patients to communicate with the team, including electronically and by phone;(d) Education of patients on self-care, prevention, and health promotion, including the use of patient decision aids;(e) Coordinating and assuring smooth transitions and follow-up from inpatient to other settings;(f) Individual and family support including authorized representatives;(g) The use of information technology to link services, track tests, generate patient registries, and provide clinical data; and(h) Ongoing performance reporting and quality improvement.(12) "Limited casualty program" means the medical care program provided to medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the federal social security act, and to medically indigent persons who are without income or resources sufficient to secure necessary medical services.(13) "Managed care organization" means any health care organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care service contractors, health maintenance organizations, health insuring organizations, or any other entity or combination thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care services covered under this chapter and rendered by licensed providers, on a prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section 1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act.(14) "Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care program provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the federal social security act.(15) "Medical care services" means the limited scope of care financed by state funds and provided to persons who are not eligible for medicaid under RCW 74.09.510 and who are eligible for the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program authorized in RCW 74.62.030 or the essential needs and housing support program pursuant to RCW 74.04.805.(16) "Multidisciplinary health care team" means an interdisciplinary team of health professionals which may include, but is not limited to, medical specialists, nurses, pharmacists, nutritionists, dieticians, social workers, behavioral and mental health providers including substance use disorder prevention and treatment providers, doctors of chiropractic, physical therapists, licensed complementary and alternative medicine practitioners, home care and other long-term care providers, and physicians' ((assistants))associates.(17) "Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.(18) "Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined annually by the United States department of health and human services, or successor agency.(19) "Primary care behavioral health" means a health care integration model in which behavioral health care is colocated, collaborative, and integrated within a primary care setting.(20) "Primary care provider" means a general practice physician, family practitioner, internist, pediatrician, osteopathic physician, naturopath, physician ((assistant))associate, and advanced practice registered nurse licensed under Title 18 RCW.(21) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.(22) "Whole-person care in behavioral health" means a health care integration model in which primary care services are integrated into a behavioral health setting either through colocation or community-based care management.Sec. 130. RCW 74.09.328 and 2023 c 51 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In order to protect patients and ensure that they benefit from seamless quality care when contracted providers are absent from their practices or when there is a temporary vacancy in a position while a hospital, rural health clinic, or rural provider is recruiting to meet patient demand, hospitals, rural health clinics, and rural providers may use substitute providers to provide services. Medicaid managed care organizations must allow for the use of substitute providers and provide payment consistent with the provisions in this section.(2) Hospitals, rural health clinics, and rural providers that are contracted with a medicaid managed care organization may use substitute providers that are not contracted with a managed care organization when:(a) A contracted provider is absent for a limited period of time due to vacation, illness, disability, continuing medical education, or other short-term absence; or(b) A contracted hospital, rural health clinic, or rural provider is recruiting to fill an open position.(3) For a substitute provider providing services under subsection (2)(a) of this section, a contracted hospital, rural health clinic, or rural provider may bill and receive payment for services at the contracted rate under its contract with the managed care organization for up to sixty days.(4) To be eligible for reimbursement under this section for services provided on behalf of a contracted provider for greater than sixty days, a substitute provider must enroll in a medicaid managed care organization. Enrollment of a substitute provider in a medicaid managed care organization is effective on the later of:(a) The date the substitute provider filed an enrollment application that was subsequently approved; or(b) The date the substitute provider first began providing services at the hospital, rural health clinic, or rural provider.(5) A substitute provider who enrolls with a medicaid managed care organization may not bill under subsection (4) of this section for any services billed to the medicaid managed care organization pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.(6) Nothing in this section obligates a managed care organization to enroll any substitute provider who requests enrollment if they do not meet the organizations enrollment criteria.(7) For purposes of this section:(a) "Circumstances precluded enrollment" means that the provider has met all program requirements including state licensure during the thirty-day period before an application was submitted and no final adverse determination precluded enrollment. If a final adverse determination precluded enrollment during this thirty-day period, the contractor shall only establish an effective billing date the day after the date that the final adverse action was resolved, as long as it is not more than thirty days prior to the date on which the application was submitted.(b) "Contracted provider" means a provider who is contracted with a medicaid managed care organization.(c) "Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 or 71.12 RCW.(d) "Rural health clinic" means a federally designated rural health clinic.(e) "Rural provider" means physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, osteopathic physicians and surgeons licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, podiatric physicians and surgeons licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, physician ((assistants))associates licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, ((osteopathic physician assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW,)) and advanced practice registered nurses((practitioners)) licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, who are located in a rural county as defined in RCW 82.14.370.(f) "Substitute provider" includes physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, osteopathic physicians and surgeons licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, podiatric physicians and surgeons licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, physician ((assistants))associates licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, ((osteopathic physician assistants licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW,)) and advanced practice registered nurses((practitioners)) licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.Sec. 131. RCW 74.09.497 and 2024 c 62 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:(1) By August 1, 2017, the authority must complete a review of payment codes available to health plans and providers related to primary care and behavioral health. The review must include adjustments to payment rules if needed to facilitate bidirectional integration. The review must involve stakeholders and include consideration of the following principles to the extent allowed by federal law:(a) Payment rules must allow professionals to operate within the full scope of their practice;(b) Payment rules should allow medically necessary behavioral health services for covered patients to be provided in any setting;(c) Payment rules should allow medically necessary primary care services for covered patients to be provided in any setting;(d) Payment rules and provider communications related to payment should facilitate integration of physical and behavioral health services through multifaceted models, including primary care behavioral health, whole-person care in behavioral health, collaborative care, and other models;(e) Payment rules should be designed liberally to encourage innovation and ease future transitions to more integrated models of payment and more integrated models of care;(f) Payment rules should allow health and behavior codes to be reimbursed for all patients in primary care settings as provided by any licensed behavioral health professional operating within their scope of practice, including but not limited to psychiatrists, psychologists, psychiatric advanced registered nurse professionals, physician ((assistants))associates working with a psychiatrist who is acting as a participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, psychiatric nurses, mental health counselors, social workers, chemical dependency professionals, chemical dependency professional trainees, marriage and family therapists, and mental health counselor associates under the supervision of a licensed clinician;(g) Payment rules should allow health and behavior codes to be reimbursed for all patients in behavioral health settings as provided by any licensed health care provider within the provider's scope of practice;(h) Payment rules which limit same-day billing for providers using the same provider number, require prior authorization for low-level or routine behavioral health care, or prohibit payment when the patient is not present should be implemented only when consistent with national coding conventions and consonant with accepted best practices in the field.(2) Concurrent with the review described in subsection (1) of this section, the authority must create matrices listing the following codes available for provider payment through medical assistance programs: All behavioral health-related codes; and all physical health-related codes available for payment when provided in licensed behavioral health agencies. The authority must clearly explain applicable payment rules in order to increase awareness among providers, standardize billing practices, and reduce common and avoidable billing errors. The authority must disseminate this information in a manner calculated to maximally reach all relevant plans and providers. The authority must update the provider billing guide to maintain consistency of information.(3) The authority must inform the governor and relevant committees of the legislature by letter of the steps taken pursuant to this section and results achieved once the work has been completed.Sec. 132. RCW 74.09.725 and 2025 c 58 s 5168 are each amended to read as follows:The authority shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening under this chapter, provided that the screening is delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician ((assistant))associate.Sec. 133. RCW 74.42.010 and 2025 c 58 s 5169 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Department" means the department of social and health services and the department's employees.(2) "Direct care staff" means the staffing domain identified and defined in the centers for medicare and medicaid services' five-star quality rating system and as reported through the centers for medicare and medicaid services' payroll-based journal. For purposes of calculating hours per resident day minimum staffing standards for facilities with sixty-one or more licensed beds, the director of nursing services classification (job title code five), as identified in the centers for medicare and medicaid services' payroll-based journal, shall not be used. For facilities with sixty or fewer beds the director of nursing services classification (job title code five) shall be included in calculating hours per resident day minimum staffing standards.(3) "Facility" refers to a nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.(4) "Geriatric behavioral health worker" means a person with a bachelor's or master's degree in social work, behavioral health, or other related areas, or a person who has received specialized training devoted to mental illness and treatment of older adults.(5) "Licensed practical nurse" means a person licensed to practice practical nursing under chapter 18.79 RCW.(6) "Medicaid" means Title XIX of the Social Security Act enacted by the social security amendments of 1965 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396; 79 Stat. 343), as amended.(7) "Nurse practitioner" means a person licensed to practice advanced practice registered nursing under chapter 18.79 RCW.(8) "Nursing care" means that care provided by a registered nurse, an advanced practice registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, or a nursing assistant in the regular performance of their duties.(9) "Physician" means a person practicing pursuant to chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW, including, but not limited to, a physician employed by the facility as provided in chapter 18.51 RCW.(10) "Physician ((assistant))associate" means a person practicing pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.(11) "Qualified therapist" means:(a) An activities specialist who has specialized education, training, or experience specified by the department.(b) An audiologist who is eligible for a certificate of clinical competence in audiology or who has the equivalent education and clinical experience.(c) A mental health professional as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW.(d) An intellectual disabilities professional who is a qualified therapist or a therapist approved by the department and has specialized training or one year experience in treating or working with persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities.(e) An occupational therapist who is a graduate of a program in occupational therapy or who has equivalent education or training.(f) A physical therapist as defined in chapter 18.74 RCW.(g) A social worker as defined in RCW 18.320.010(2).(h) A speech pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of clinical competence in speech pathology or who has equivalent education and clinical experience.(12) "Registered nurse" means a person licensed to practice registered nursing under chapter 18.79 RCW.(13) "Resident" means an individual residing in a nursing home, as defined in RCW 18.51.010.Sec. 134. RCW 74.42.230 and 2025 c 58 s 5057 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The resident's attending or staff physician or authorized practitioner approved by the attending physician shall order all medications for the resident. The order may be oral or written and shall continue in effect until discontinued by a physician or other authorized prescriber, unless the order is specifically limited by time. An "authorized practitioner," as used in this section, is a registered nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the state board of nursing, a physician ((assistant))associate under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by the Washington medical commission, or a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW when authorized by the pharmacy quality assurance commission.(2) An oral order shall be given only to a licensed nurse, pharmacist, or another physician. The oral order shall be recorded and physically or electronically signed immediately by the person receiving the order. The attending physician shall sign the record of the oral order in a manner consistent with good medical practice.(3) A licensed nurse, pharmacist, or another physician receiving and recording an oral order may, if so authorized by the physician or authorized practitioner, communicate that order to a pharmacy on behalf of the physician or authorized practitioner. The order may be communicated verbally by telephone, by facsimile manually signed by the person receiving the order pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, or by electronic transmission pursuant to RCW 69.41.055. The communication of a resident's order to a pharmacy by a licensed nurse, pharmacist, or another physician acting at the prescriber's direction has the same force and effect as if communicated directly by the delegating physician or authorized practitioner. Nothing in this provision limits the authority of a licensed nurse, pharmacist, or physician to delegate to an authorized agent, including but not limited to delegation of operation of a facsimile machine by credentialed facility staff, to the extent consistent with his or her professional license.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 135. RCW 18.71A.140 (Licenses issued under chapter 18.57A RCW) and 2020 c 80 s 10 are each repealed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 136. Sections 5 through 58, 60 through 101, 103 through 120, and 122 through 135 of this act take effect June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 137. Section 58 of this act expires October 1, 2035.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 138. Section 59 of this act takes effect October 1, 2035.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 139. Section 101 of this act expires when section 102 of this act takes effect.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 140. Section 102 of this act takes effect when the contingency in section 26, chapter 433, Laws of 2023 takes effect.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 141. Section 120 of this act expires when section 121 of this act takes effect.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 142. Section 121 of this act takes effect when the contingency in section 27, chapter 433, Laws of 2023 takes effect.--- END ---